5702
Channel_Tunnel
 lowelevation The Channel Tunnel (; also referred to as the Chunnel)()() is a  undersea rail tunnel linking Folkestone, Kent in the Kingdom with Coquelles, Pas-de-Calais near Calais in northern France beneath the Channel at the of Dover. At its lowest point, it is  deep.()(() At , the Channel Tunnel possesses the longest undersea portion of any tunnel in the world, although the Tunnel in Japan is both longer overall at , and deeper at  below sea level.The tunnel carries high-speed Eurostar passenger trains, Shuttle roll-on/roll-off vehicle transportthe largest in the worldand international rail trains.( The tunnel connects end-to-end with the Nord and Speed 1 high-speed railway lines. In 1996 the Society of Civil Engineers identified the tunnel as one of the Seven Wonders of the Modern World.(Ideas for a cross-Channel fixed link appeared as early as 1802,(() but British political and press pressure over compromised national security stalled attempts to construct a tunnel.( However, the eventual successful project, organised by Eurotunnel, began construction in 1988 and opened in 1994. The project came in 80% over its predicted budget.( Since its construction, the tunnel has faced several problems. Fires have disrupted operation of the tunnel. Illegal immigrants and asylum seekers have attempted to use the tunnel to enter the UK,() causing a minor diplomatic disagreement over the siting of the Sangatte camp, which was eventually closed in 2002.( accessdate 19 July 2009} ) Origins  Proposals and attempts In 1802, French mining engineer Mathieu put forward a proposal to tunnel under the English Channel, with illumination from oil lamps, horse-drawn coaches, and an artificial island mid-Channel for changing horses.(Whiteside p. 17)In the 1830s, Frenchman Thom de Gamond performed the first geological and hydrographical surveys on the Channel, between Calais and Dover. Thom de Gamond explored several schemes and, in 1856, he presented a proposal to III for a mined railway tunnel from Cap Gris-Nez to Point with a port/airshaft on the sandbank(Whiteside pp. 1823) at a cost of 170 million francs, or less than 7 million.()File:Channel Tunnel 1856 idea from Gamond 1a.png|thumb|left|Thom de Gamonds 1856 plan for a cross-Channel link, with a port/airshaft on the sandbank mid-ChannelIn 1865, a deputation led by Ward Hunt proposed the idea of a tunnel to the of the Exchequer of the day, Ewart Gladstone.()After 1867, Low and Sir John Clarke Hawkshaw promoted ideas, but none were implemented. An official Anglo-French protocol was established in 1876 for a cross-Channel railway tunnel. In 1881, British railway entrepreneur Sir William Watkin and French Canal contractor Lavalley were in the Submarine Railway Company that conducted exploratory work on both sides of the Channel. On the English side a  diameter Beaumont-English boring machine dug a  pilot tunnel from Cliff. On the French side, a similar machine dug  from Sangatte. The project was abandoned in May 1882, owing to British political and press campaigns advocating that a tunnel would compromise Britains national defences.( These early works were encountered more than a century later during the TML project.In 1919, during the Paris Peace Conference, British Prime Minister Lloyd George repeatedly brought up the idea of a Channel tunnel as a way of reassuring France about British willingness to defend against another German attack. The French did not take the idea seriously and nothing came of Lloyd Georges proposal.(MacMillan, Margaret. Paris 1919. Random House, 2002, p. 174, 194)In 1929 there was another proposal for the building a channel tunnel, but nothing came of this discussion and the idea was shelved. Proponents estimated construction to be about US$150 million. The engineers addressed the concerns of both nations military leaders by designing two sumpsone near the coast of each countrythat could be flooded at will to block the tunnel. This design feature did not override the concerns of both nations military leaders, and other concerns for hordes of undesirable tourists who would disrupt English habits of living.(New Plan for Channel Tunnel Popular Mechanics, May 1929, pp. 767-768)In 1955, defence arguments were accepted to be irrelevant because of the dominance of air power; thus, both the British and French governments supported technical and geological surveys. A detailed geological survey was carried out in 196465.(  Online presentation of a 196465 film documentary of a geological survey of the Channel, with a brief summary.) Construction work commenced on both sides of the Channel in 1974, a government-funded project using twin tunnels on either side of a service tunnel, with capability for car shuttle wagons. In January 1975, to the dismay of the French partners, the British government cancelled the project. The government had changed to the Labour Party and there was uncertainty about EEC membership, cost estimates had ballooned to 200% and the national economy was troubled. By this time the British Priestly tunnel boring machine was ready and the Ministry of Transport was able to do a  experimental drive.( This short tunnel would however be reused as the starting and access point for tunnelling operations from the British side.In 1979, the Mouse-hole Project was suggested when the Conservatives came to power in Britain. The concept was a single-track rail tunnel with a service tunnel, but without shuttle terminals. The British government took no interest in funding the project, but Prime Minister Thatcher said she had no objection to a privately funded project. In 1981 British and French leaders Margaret Thatcher and Mitterrand agreed to set up a working group to look into a privately funded project, and in April 1985 promoters were formally invited to submit scheme proposals. Four submissions were shortlisted:* a rail proposal based on the 1975 scheme presented by Channel Tunnel Group/FranceManche (CTG/FM),* Eurobridge: a  span bridge with a roadway in an enclosed tube* Euroroute: a  tunnel between artificial islands approached by bridges, and* Channel Expressway: large diameter road tunnels with mid-channel ventilation towers.(The cross-Channel ferry industry protested under the name Flexilink. In 1975 there was no campaign protesting against a fixed link, with one of the largest ferry operators (Sealink) being state-owned. Flexilink continued rousing opposition throughout 1986 and 1987.( Public opinion strongly favoured a drive-through tunnel, but ventilation issues, concerns about accident management, and fear of driver mesmerisation led to the only shortlisted rail submission, CTG/F-M, being awarded the project.(Wilson pp. 1421) Arrangement The British Channel Tunnel Group consisted of two banks and five construction companies, while their French counterparts, FranceManche, consisted of three banks and five construction companies. The role of the banks was to advise on financing and secure loan commitments. On 2 July 1985, the groups formed Channel Tunnel Group/FranceManche (CTG/FM). Their submission to the British and French governments was drawn from the 1975 project, including 11 volumes and a substantial environmental impact statement.(The design and construction was done by the ten construction companies in the CTG/F-M group. The French terminal and boring from Sangatte was undertaken by the five French construction companies in the joint venture group GIE Transmanche Construction. The English Terminal and boring from Shakespeare Cliff was undertaken by the five British construction companies in the Trankslink Joint Venture. The two partnerships were linked by Link (TML), a bi-national project organisation.( The Matre dOeuvre was a supervisory engineering body employed by Eurotunnel under the terms of the concession that monitored project activity and reported back to the governments and banks.(Kirkland pp. 1011)In France, with its long tradition of infrastructure investment, the project garnered widespread approval and in April the French National Assembly gave unanimous support and, in June 1987, after a public inquiry, the Senate gave unanimous support. In Britain, select committees examined the proposal, making history by holding hearings outside of Westminster, in Kent. In February 1987, the third reading of the Channel Tunnel Bill took place in the House of Commons, and was carried by 94 votes to 22. The Channel Tunnel Act gained assent and passed into English law in July of that year.( Parliamentary support for the project came partly from provincial members of Parliament on the basis of promises of Eurostar through train services that have never materialised; the promises were repeated in 1996 when the contract for construction of the Tunnel Rail Link was awarded.( )The Channel Tunnel is a build-own-operate-transfer (BOOT) project with a concession.(Flyvbjerg et al. pp. 9697) TML would design and build the tunnel, but financing was through a separate legal entity: Eurotunnel. Eurotunnel absorbed CTG/F-M and signed a construction contract with TML; however, the British and French governments controlled final engineering and safety decisions, which are now in the hands of the Tunnel Safety Authority. The British and French governments gave Eurotunnel a 55- (later 65-) year operating concession to repay loans and pay dividends. A Railway Usage Agreement was signed between Eurotunnel, Rail and the Nationale des Chemins de fer Franais guaranteeing future revenue in exchange for the railways obtaining half of the tunnels capacity.Private funding for such a complex infrastructure project was of unprecedented scale. An initial equity of 45 million was raised by CTG/F-M, increased by 206 million private institutional placement, 770 million was raised in a public share offer that included press and television advertisements, a syndicated bank loan and of credit arranged 5 billion.( Privately financed, the total investment costs at 1985 prices were 2600 million. At the 1994 completion actual costs were, in 1985 prices, 4650 million: an 80% cost overrun.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 12) The cost overrun was partly due to enhanced safety, security, and environmental demands.( Financing costs were 140% higher than forecast.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 3) Construction Working from both the English side and the French side of the Channel, eleven boring machines cut through chalk marl to construct two rail tunnels and a service tunnel. The vehicle shuttle terminals are at Cheriton (part of Folkestone) and Coquelles, and are connected to the English and French motorways (M20 and A16 respectively).Tunnelling commenced in 1988, and the tunnel began operating in 1994.() In 1985 prices, the total construction cost was 4.650 billion (equivalent to  billion today), an 80% cost overrun. At the peak of construction 15,000 people were employed with daily expenditure over 3 million.(Anderson, pp. xvixvii) Ten workers, eight of them British, were killed during construction between 1987 and 1993, most in the first few months of boring.()()() Completion File:Channel Tunnel Opening Ceremony.jpg|thumb|The Channel Tunnel was opened in Calais on 6 May 1994 by British Queen Elizabeth II and French President MitterrandImage:319008 at Sandling.jpg|thumb|right|Class 319 EMUs ran excursions trips into the Channel Tunnel from railway station on 7 May 1994, the first passenger trains to do soA small, two-inch (50-mm) diameter pilot hole allowed the service tunnel to break through without ceremony on 30 October 1990.() On 1 December 1990, Englishman Graham Fagg and Frenchman Phillippe Cozette broke through the service tunnel with the media watching.() Eurotunnel completed the tunnel on time,( and the tunnel was officially opened one year later than originally planned by British Queen Elizabeth II and French President Mitterrand in a ceremony held in Calais on 6 May 1994. The Queen travelled through the tunnel to Calais on a Eurostar train, which stopped nose to nose with the train that carried President Mitterrand from Paris.() Following the ceremony President Mitterrand and the Queen travelled on Le Shuttle to a similar ceremony in Folkestone.( A full public service did not start for several months.The Channel Tunnel Rail Link (CTRL), now called Speed 1, runs  from Pancras railway station in London to the Channel Tunnel portal at Folkestone in Kent. It cost 5.8 billion. On 16 September 2003 UK Prime Minister Blair opened the first section of High Speed 1, from Folkestone to north Kent. On 6 November 2007 the Queen officially opened High Speed 1 and St Pancras International station,() replacing the original slower link to International railway station. On High Speed 1 trains travelling at speeds up to , the journey from London to Paris takes 2 hours 15 minutes and London to Brussels takes 1 hour 51 minutes.()In 1996, the American Society of Civil Engineers, with Mechanics, selected the tunnel as one of the Seven Wonders of the Modern World.() Engineering File:Channel Tunnel NRM.jpg|thumb|The Channel Tunnel exhibit at the Railway Museum in York, England, showing the circular cross section of the tunnel with the overhead line powering a Eurostar train. Also visible is the segmented tunnel liningSurveying undertaken in the twenty years before tunnel construction confirmed earlier speculations that a tunnel route could be bored through a chalk marl stratum. The chalk marl was conducive to tunnelling, with impermeability, ease of excavation and strength. While on the English side the chalk marl ran along the entire length of the tunnel, on the French side a length of  had variable and difficult geology. The Channel Tunnel consists of three bores: two  diameter rail tunnels,  apart,  in length with a  diameter service tunnel in between. There are also cross-passages and piston relief ducts. The service tunnel was used as a pilot tunnel, boring ahead of the main tunnels to determine the conditions. English access was provided at Shakespeare Cliff, while French access came from a shaft at Sangatte. The French side used five boring machines (TBMs); the English side used six. The service tunnel uses Service Tunnel Transport System (STTS) and Light Service Tunnel Vehicles (LADOGS). Fire safety was a critical design issue.Between the portals at Beussingue and Castle Hill the tunnel is  long, with  under land on the French side,  under land on the UK side and  under sea.(Institute of Civil Engineers p. 95) This makes the Channel Tunnel the second longest rail tunnel in the world, behind the Tunnel in Japan, but with the longest under-sea section.() The average depth is  below the seabed.(Kirkland p. 13) On the UK side, of the expected  of spoil approximately  was used for fill at the terminal site, and the remainder was deposited at Lower Shakespeare Cliff behind a seawall, reclaiming ( of land.(Institute of Civil Engineers p. 208) This land was then made into the Hoe Country Park. Environmental impact assessment did not identify any major risks for the project, and further studies into safety, noise, and air pollution were overall positive. However, environmental objections were raised over a high-speed link to London.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 51) Geology Successful tunnelling under the channel required a sound understanding of the topography and geology and the selection of the best rock strata through which to tunnel. The geology generally consists of northeasterly dipping Cretaceous strata, part of the northern limb of the Wealden-Boulonnais dome. Characteristics include:* Continuous chalk on the cliffs on either side of the Channel containing no major faulting, as observed by Verstegan in 1698* Four geological strata, marine sediments laid down 90100 million years ago; pervious upper and middle chalk above slightly pervious lower chalk and finally impermeable Clay. A sandy stratum, glauconitic marl (tortia), is in between the chalk marl and gault clay* A  layer of chalk marl (French: craie bleue) in the lower third of the lower chalk appeared to present the best tunnelling medium. The chalk has a clay content of 3040% providing impermeability to groundwater yet relatively easy excavation with strength allowing minimal support. Ideally the tunnel would be bored in the bottom  of the chalk marl, allowing water inflow from fractures and joints to be minimised, but above the gault clay that would increase stress on the tunnel lining and swell and soften when wet.()On the English side of the channel, the strata dip less than 5, however, on the French side, this increases to 20. Jointing and faulting is present on both the English and French sides. On the English side, only minor faults of displacement less than  exist. On the French side, displacements of up to  are present owing to the Quenocs anticlinal fold. The faults are of limited width, filled with calcite, pyrite and remoulded clay. The increased dip and faulting restricted the selection of route on the French side. To avoid confusion, microfossil assemblages were used to classify the chalk marl. On the French side, particularly near the coast, the chalk was harder, and more brittle, and more fractured than on the English side. This led to the adoption of different tunnelling techniques on the French and English sides.(The Quaternary undersea valley Fosse Dangaered, and Castle Hill landslip, located at the English portal, caused concerns. Identified by the 196465 geophysical survey, the Fosse Dangaered is an infilled valley system extending  below the seabed,  south of the tunnel route, located mid-channel. A 1986 survey showed that a tributary crossed the path of the tunnel, and so the tunnel route was made as far north and deep as possible. The English terminal had to be located in the Castle Hill landslip, which consists of displaced and tipping blocks of lower chalk, glauconitic marl and gault debris. Thus the area was stabilised by buttressing and inserting drainage adits.( The service tunnels were pilot tunnels preceding the main tunnels, so that the geology, areas of crushed rock, and zones of high water inflow could be predicted. Exploratory probing took place in the service tunnels, in the form of extensive forward probing, vertical downward probes and sideways probing.(Kirkland pp. 2150) Surveying Marine soundings and samplings by Thom de Gamond were carried out during 18331867, establishing the seabed depth at a maximum of  and the continuity of geological strata (layers). Surveying continued over many years, with 166 marine and 70 land-deep boreholes being drilled and over 4,000-line-kilometres of marine geophysical survey completed.( Surveys were undertaken in 19581959, 19641965, 19721974 and 19861988.The surveying in 19581959 catered for tube and bridge designs as well as a bored tunnel, and thus a wide area was investigated. At this time marine geophysics surveying for engineering projects was in its infancy, with poor positioning and resolution from seismic profiling. The 19641965 surveys concentrated on a northerly route that left the English coast at Dover harbour; using 70 boreholes, an area of deeply weathered rock with high permeability was located just south of Dover harbour.(Given the previous survey results and access constraints, a more southerly route was investigated in the 19721973 survey and the route was confirmed to be feasible. Information for the tunnelling project also came from work before the 1975 cancellation. On the French side at Sangatte a deep shaft with adits was made. On the English side at Shakespeare Cliff, the government allowed  of  diameter tunnel to be driven. The actual tunnel alignment, method of excavation and support were essentially the same as the 1975 attempt. In the 19861997 survey, previous findings were reinforced and the nature of the gault clay and the tunnelling medium (chalk marl that made up 85% of the route) were investigated. Geophysical techniques from the oil industry were employed.(Kirkland pp. 2226) Tunnelling Tunnelling between England and France was a major engineering challenge, with the only precedent being the undersea Tunnel in Japan. A serious risk with underwater tunnels is major water inflow due to the water pressure from the sea above under weak ground conditions. The Channel Tunnel also had the challenge of timebeing privately funded, early financial return was paramount.The objective was to construct: two  diameter rail tunnels,  apart,  in length; a  diameter service tunnel between the two main tunnels; pairs of  diameter cross-passages linking the rail tunnels to the service tunnel at  spacing; piston relief ducts  diameter connecting the rail tunnels at  spacing; two undersea crossover caverns to connect the rail tunnels.(Kirkland pp. 63128) The service tunnel always preceded the main tunnels by at least  to ascertain the ground conditions. There was plenty of experience with tunnelling through chalk in the mining industry. The undersea crossover caverns were a complex engineering problem. The French cavern was based on the Mount Baker Ridge freeway tunnel in the US. The UK cavern was dug from the service tunnel ahead of the main tunnels to avoid delay.Precast segmental linings in the main TBM drives were used, but different solutions were used on the English and French sides. On the French side, neoprene and grout sealed bolted linings made of cast iron or high-strength reinforced concrete were used. On the English side, the main requirement was for speed and bolting of cast-iron lining segments was only carried out in areas of poor geology. In the UK rail tunnels, eight lining segments plus a key segment were used; on the French side, five segments plus a key segment.(Wilson p. 38) On the French side, a  diameter  deep grout-curtained shaft at Sangatte was used for access. On the English side, a marshalling area was  below the top of Shakespeare Cliff, and the Austrian Tunnelling method (NATM) was first applied in the chalk marl here. On the English side, the land tunnels were driven from Shakespeare Cliff, the same place as the marine tunnels, not from Folkestone. The platform at the base of the cliff was not large enough for all of the drives and, despite environmental objections, tunnel spoil was placed behind a reinforced concrete seawall, on condition of placing the chalk in an enclosed lagoon to avoid wide dispersal of chalk fines. Owing to limited space, the precast lining factory was on the Isle of Grain in the Thames estuary.(On the French side, owing to the greater permeability to water, earth pressure balance TBMs with open and closed modes were used. The TBMs were of a closed nature during the initial , but then operated as open, boring through the chalk marl stratum.( This minimised the impact to the ground and allowed high water pressures to be withstood, and it also alleviated the need to grout ahead of the tunnel. The French effort required five TBMs: two main marine machines, one main land machine (the short land drives of 3 km allowed one TBM to complete the first drive then reverse direction and complete the other), and two service tunnel machines. On the English side, the simpler geology allowed faster open-faced TBMs.(Kirkland p. 29) Six machines were used, all commenced digging from Shakespeare Cliff, three marine-bound and three for the land tunnels.( Towards the completion of the undersea drives, the UK TBMs were driven steeply downwards and buried clear of the tunnel. The French TBMs then completed the tunnel and were dismantled.(Wilson p. 44) A 900 mm gauge railway was used on the English side during construction.(Kirkland pp. 117128)In contrast to the English machines, which were simply given alphanumeric names, the French tunnelling machines were all named after women: Brigitte, Europa, Catherine, Virginie, Pascaline, Sverine.() Railway design File:ETunnelhoch.jpg|thumb|Interior of Shuttle, a vehicle shuttle train. The largest railway wagons in the world,( the shuttle trains transport vehicles between terminals on either side of the tunnel Communications There are three communication systems in the tunnel: concession radio (CR) for mobile vehicles and personnel within Eurotunnels Concession (terminals, tunnels, coastal shafts); track-to-train radio (TTR) for secure speech and data between trains and the railway control centre; Shuttle internal radio (SIR) for communication between shuttle crew and to passengers over car radios.(Kirkland pp. 129132) This service was discontinued within one year of opening because of drivers difficulty setting their radios to the correct frequency (88.8 MHz). Power supply All tunnel services run on electricity, shared equally from English and French sources. Power is delivered to the locomotives via an line (catenary)(Kirkland pp. 134148) at .(Article: Railway electric traction 9 August 2009)A large proportion of the railway south of London uses a 750 V DC rail to deliver electrical power; however since the opening of High Speed 1 there is no need to use the third rail system for any part of the Eurostar journey. High Speed 1, the tunnel itself and the route to Paris has power provided via overhead catenary at 25 kV 50 Hz. The railways on classic lines in Belgium are also electrified by overhead catenaries, but at 3000 V DC.( Signalling A cab signalling system is used that gives information directly to train drivers on a display. There is Train Protection (ATP) that stops the train if the speed differs from that indicated on the in-cab display. TVM430, as used on Nord, is used in the tunnel.(Kirkland pp. 149155) The maximum allowed speed is .(Article-de: Eurotunnel#Betrieb 9 August 2009) Track system The American Sonneville International Corporation track system consisting of UIC60 rails on 900A grade resting on microcellular EVA pads, bolted into concrete was chosen.(Kirkland pp. 157174) The larger European GB+ gauge was used rather than one of the smaller UK alternatives; this gauge is maintained on High Speed 1 as far as Barking in east London.() Ballasted track was ruled out owing to maintenance constraints and a need for geometric stability. Rolling stock  Eurotunnel Shuttle Initially 38 Le Shuttle locomotives were commissioned, working in pairs with one at each end of a shuttle train. The shuttles have two separate halves: single and double deck. Each half has two loading/unloading wagons and twelve carrier wagons. Eurotunnels original order was for nine tourist shuttles.HGV shuttles also have two halves, with each half containing one loading wagon, one unloading wagon and 14 carrier wagons. There is a club car behind the leading locomotive. Eurotunnel originally ordered six HGV shuttles rakes. Freight locomotives Forty-six Class 92 locomotives for hauling freight trains and overnight passenger trains (the Nightstar project, which was abandoned) were commissioned, which can run on both overhead AC and third-rail DC power. International passenger Thirty-one Eurostar trainsbased on the French TGVbuilt to UK gauge, and with many modifications for safety within the tunnel, were commissioned, with split ownership between British Rail, French National Railway Company and Railway Company of Belgium. Rail ordered seven more for services north of London.(Kirkland pp. 175211)At the end of 2009, extensive fire-proofing requirements were dropped and Bahn received permission to run German Intercity-Express (ICE) trains through the Channel Tunnel in the future. On 19 October 2010 Deutsche Bahn ran the first ICE train through the Channel Tunnel arriving in St. Pancras after evacuation tests in the tunnel were a success.()() Service locomotives locomotives for rescue and shunting work are Class 0001 and Class 0031. Operation  Usage and services File:Chunnel traffic.svg|thumb|A Channel Tunnel traffic graph showing the number of passengers and tonnes of freight. Freight vehicle shuttle numbers dropped in 1996/7 owing to closure of the service after the November 1996 fireFile:Channel Tunnel Terminal.jpg|thumb|The British terminal at Cheriton in west Folkestone. The terminal services shuttle trains that carry vehicles, and is linked to the motorwayFile:Folkestone White Horse cropped.jpg|thumb|The White Horse is the last view of England for most passengers embarking at the Cheriton terminalServices offered by the tunnel are:* Shuttle (formerly Le Shuttle) roll-on roll-off shuttle service for road vehicles,* Eurostar passenger trains,* through freight trains.()Both the freight and passenger traffic forecasts that led to the construction of the tunnel were largely and universally overestimated. Particularly, Eurotunnels commissioned forecasts were over-predictions.( Although the captured share of Channel crossings (competing with air and sea) was forecast correctly, high competition and reduced tariffs has led to low revenue. Overall cross-Channel traffic was overestimated.(However with the EUs liberalisation of international rail services, the tunnel and Speed 1 have been open to competition since 2010. There have been a number of operators interested in running services including Bahn, through the tunnel and along Speed 1 to London. Passenger traffic volumes Total cross-tunnel passenger traffic volumes peaked at 18.4 million in 1998, then dropped to 14.9 million in 2003, from then rising again to 17.0 million in 2010.At the time of the decision about building the tunnel, 15.9 million passengers were predicted for Eurostar trains in the opening year. In 1995, the first full year, actual numbers were a little over 2.9 million, growing to 7.1 million in 2000, then dropping again to 6.3 million in 2003. However, Eurostar was also limited by the lack of a high-speed connection on the British side. After the completion of Speed 1 (formerly CTRL) to London in two stages in 2003 and 2007, traffic increased. In 2008, Eurostar carried 9,113,371 passengers in cross-Channel-Tunnel traffic, a 10% increase over the previous year, despite traffic limitations due to the Channel Tunnel fire.() Eurostar passenger numbers continued to increase, reaching 9,528,558 in 2010.() Freight traffic volumes Cross-tunnel freight traffic volumes have been erratic, with a decrease during 1997 due to a closure caused by a fire in a freight shuttle. The total freight crossings increased over the period, indicating the substitutability of the tunnel by sea crossings. The tunnel has achieved a cross-Channel freight traffic market share close to or above Eurotunnels 1980s predictions but Eurotunnels 1990 and 1994 predictions were overestimates.For freight transported on through freight trains, the first year freight prediction was 7.2 million gross tonnes, however, the actual 1995 figure was 1.3 million gross tonnes.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 22) Through freight volumes peaked in 1998 at 3.1 million tonnes. However, with continuing problems, this figure fell back to 1.21 million tonnes in 2007, increasing again slightly to 1.24 million tonnes in 2008.( Together with that carried on freight shuttles, freight traffic growth has occurred since opening, with 6.4 million tonnes carried in 1995, 18.4 million tonnes recorded in 2003( and 19.6 million tonnes in 2007.( Numbers fell back in the wake of the 2008 fire.Eurotunnels freight subsidiary is 2.() In September 2006 EWS, the UKs largest rail freight operator, announced that owing to cessation of UK-French government subsidies of 52 million per annum to cover the Channel Tunnel Minimum User Charge (a subsidy of around 13,000 per train, at a traffic level of 4,000 trains per annum), freight trains would stop running after 30 November.() Economic performance Shares in Eurotunnel were issued at 3.50 per share on 9 December 1987. By mid-1989 the price had risen to 11.00. Delays and cost overruns led to the share price dropping; during demonstration runs in October 1994 the share price reached an all-time low value. Eurotunnel suspended payment on its debt in September 1995 to avoid bankruptcy.() In December 1997 the British and French governments extended Eurotunnels operating concession by 34 years to 2086. Financial restructuring of Eurotunnel occurred in mid-1998, reducing debt and financial charges. Despite the restructuring Economist reported in 1998 that to break even Eurotunnel would have to increase fares, traffic and market share for sustainability.(Flyvbjerg et al. pp. 3234) A cost benefit analysis of the Channel Tunnel indicated that there were few impacts on the wider economy and few developments associated with the project, and that the British economy would have been better off if the tunnel had not been constructed.(()Under the terms of the Concession, Eurotunnel was obliged to investigate a cross-Channel road tunnel. In December 1999 road and rail tunnel proposals were presented to the British and French governments, but it was stressed that there was not enough demand for a second tunnel.() A three-way treaty between the United Kingdom, France and Belgium governs border controls, with the establishment of control zones wherein the officers of the other nation may exercise limited customs and law enforcement powers. For most purposes these are at either end of the tunnel, with the French border controls on the UK side of the tunnel and vice versa. For certain city-to-city trains, the train itself represents a control zone.() A binational emergency plan coordinates UK and French emergency activities.(Kirkland p. 331)In 1999 Eurostar posted its first ever net profits, having previously made a loss of 925m in 1995.( Terminals File:Chargement voiture Eurotunnel.jpg|thumb|A Peugeot 807 entering a shuttle wagon at the French terminal at Coquelles near Calais in northern FranceThe terminals sites are at Cheriton (Folkestone in the United Kingdom) and Coquelles (Calais in France). The terminals are unique facilities designed to transfer vehicles from the motorway onto trains at a rate of 700 cars and 113 heavy vehicles per hour. The UK site uses the motorway. The terminals are organised with the frontier controls juxtaposed with the entry to the system to allow travellers to go onto the motorway at the destination country immediately after leaving the shuttle. The area of the UK site was severely constrained and the design was challenging. The French layout was achieved more easily. To achieve design output, the shuttles accept cars on double-decks; for flexibility, ramps were placed inside the shuttles to provide access to the top decks.(Kirkland pp. 255270) At Folkestone there are  of mainline track and 45 turnouts with eight platforms. At Calais there are  of track with 44 turnouts. At the terminals the shuttle trains traverse a figure eight to reduce uneven wear on the wheels.( There is a freight marshalling yard west of Cheriton at Moor Freight Yard. Regional impact A 1996 report from the Commission predicted that Kent and de Calais had to face increased traffic volumes due to general growth of cross-Channel traffic and traffic attracted by the tunnel. In Kent, a high-speed rail line to London would transfer traffic from road to rail.(European Commission pp. 220222) Kents regional development would benefit from the tunnel, but being so close to London restricts the benefits. Gains are in the traditional industries and are largely dependent on the development of Ashford International passenger station, without which Kent would be totally dependent on Londons expansion. Nord-Pas-de-Calais enjoys a strong internal symbolic effect of the Tunnel which results in significant gains in manufacturing.(European Commission pp. 248252)The removal of a bottleneck by means like the Channel Tunnel does not necessarily induce economic gains in all adjacent regions, the image of a region being connected to the European high-speed transport and active political response are more important for regional economic development. However, some small-medium enterprises located in the immediate vicinity of the terminal have used the opportunity to re-brand the profile of their business with positive effect, such as The New Inn at Etchinghill which was able to commercially exploit its unique selling point as being the closest pub to the Channel Tunnel. Tunnel-induced regional development is small compared to general economic growth.() The South East of England is likely to benefit developmentally and socially from faster and cheaper transport to continental Europe, but the benefits are unlikely to be equally distributed throughout the region. The overall environmental impact is almost certainly negative.()Since the opening of the tunnel, small positive impacts on the wider economy have been felt, however, it is difficult to identify major economic successes directly attributed to the tunnel.(Flyvbjerg et al. p. 6869) The Eurotunnel does operate profitably, offering an alternative transportation mode unaffected by poor weather.() both Eurotunnel and Eurostar.  High costs of construction did delay profitability, however, and companies involved in the Channel Tunnels construction and operation early in operation relied on government aid to deal with debts amounted.()()() Eurotunnel has been described as being in a serious situation.() Incidents  Fires There have been three fires in the Channel Tunnel that were significant enough to close the tunnelall on the heavy goods vehicle (HGV) shuttlesand other more minor incidents.During an invitation only testing phase on 9 December 1994, a fire broke out in a Ford Escort car whilst its owner had been loading it on to the upper deck of a tourist shuttle. The fire started at approximately 10:00 with the shuttle train stationary in the Folkestone terminal and was extinguished around 40 minutes later with no passenger injuries.()On 18 November 1996, a fire broke out on a heavy goods vehicle shuttle wagon in the tunnel but nobody was seriously hurt. The exact cause is unknown,() although it was not a Eurotunnel equipment or rolling stock problem; it may have been due to arson of a heavy goods vehicle. It is estimated that the heart of the fire reached , with the tunnel severely damaged over , with some  affected to some extent. Full operation recommenced six months after the fire.()The tunnel was closed for several hours on 21 August 2006, when a truck on an HGV shuttle train caught fire.()() On 11 September 2008, a fire occurred in the Channel Tunnel at 13:57 GMT. The incident started on a freight-carrying vehicle train travelling towards France.() The event occurred  from the French entrance to the tunnel. No one was killed but several people were taken to hospitals suffering from smoke inhalation, and minor cuts and bruises. The tunnel was closed to all traffic, with the undamaged South Tunnel reopening for limited services two days later.() Full service resumed on 9 February 2009() after repairs costing 60 million. Train failures On the night of 19/20 February 1996, approximately 1,000 passengers became trapped in the Channel Tunnel when two Rail Class 373 trains on continent-bound Eurostar service broke down owing to failures of electronic circuits caused by snow and ice being deposited and then melting on the circuit boards.()On 3 August 2007, an electrical failure lasting six hours caused passengers to be trapped in the tunnel on a Eurotunnel shuttle crossing.()On the evening of 18 December 2009, during the 2009 European snowfall, five London-bound trains operating Eurostar services failed inside the tunnel, trapping 2,000 passengers in the tunnel overnight. Five Class 373 trains had departed from Brussels and Paris and encountered cold temperatures in Northern France, the coldest for eight years.() A Eurotunnel spokesperson explained that the problem had arisen because of fluffy snow in France,(Eurostar blames fluffy snow for weekend chaos Times 21 December 09) which had evaded the winterisation shields designed to stop snow getting into the electrics.(Eurostar cancels trains over snow  Association (21 December 09)) Electrical failure was then caused by the transition from the cold air in France to the warm atmosphere inside the tunnel.() One train from Brussels had been turned back before reaching the tunnel; two trains were hauled out of the tunnel using diesel-powered Class 0001. The blocking of the Channel Tunnel led to the implementation of Stack, the transformation of the motorway into a linear car park.()Snow that had built up on the trains then melted in the heat of the tunnel, the water causing electrical faults.()()()() The occasion was the first time during the fifteen years that a Eurostar train had to be evacuated inside the tunnel itself; the failing of four at once being described as unprecedented.() The Channel Tunnel reopened the following morning.() Deva, of the European Parliament for South East England, had called for Eurostar chief executive Richard Brown to resign over the incidents.() An independent report by Garnett (former CEO of North Eastern Railway) and Claude Gressier (a French transport expert) on the 18/19 December 2009 incidents was issued in February 2010, making 21 recommendations.()()A further Class 373 unit on BrusselsLondon service broke down in the tunnel on 7 January 2010. The train had 236 passengers on board and was towed to Ashford; other trains that had not yet reached the tunnel were turned back.()() Asylum and immigration Immigrants and would-be seekers have been known to use the tunnel to attempt to enter Britain. By 1997, the problem had already attracted international press attention, and the French Cross opened a refugee centre at Sangatte in 1999, using a warehouse once used for tunnel construction; by 2002 it housed up to 1500 persons at a time, most of them trying to get to the UK.() In 2001, most came from Afghanistan, Iraq and Iran, but African and Eastern European countries are also represented.()Most migrants who got into Britain found some way to ride a freight train, but others used Eurostar. Though the facilities were fenced, airtight security was deemed impossible; refugees would even jump from bridges onto moving trains. In several incidents people were injured during the crossing; others tampered with railway equipment, causing delays and requiring repairs.() Eurotunnel said it was losing 5m per month because of the problem.() A dozen refugees have died in crossing attempts.(In 2001 and 2002, several riots broke out at Sangatte and groups of refugees (up to 550 in a December 2001 incident) stormed the fences and attempted to enter en masse.() Immigrants have also arrived as legitimate Eurostar passengers without proper entry papers.()Local authorities in both France and the UK called for the closure of Sangatte, and Eurotunnel twice sought an injunction against the centre.( The United Kingdom blamed France for allowing Sangatte to open, and France blamed the UK for its lax asylum rules and the EU for not having a uniform immigration policy.( The clbre nature of the problem even included journalists detained as they followed refugees onto railway property.()In 2002, after the Commission told France that it was in breach of European Union rules on the free transfer of goods, because of the delays and closures as a result of its poor security, a double fence was built at a cost of 5 million, reducing the numbers of refugees detected each week reaching Britain on goods trains from 250 to almost none.() Other measures included CCTV cameras and increased police patrols.() At the end of 2002, the Sangatte centre was closed after the UK agreed to take some of its refugees.() Safety The Tunnel Safety Authority is responsible for some aspects of safety regulation in the tunnel; it reports to the IGC.()The service tunnel is used for access to technical equipment in cross-passages and equipment rooms, to provide fresh-air ventilation, and for emergency evacuation. The Service Tunnel Transport System (STTS) allows fast access to all areas of the tunnel. The service vehicles are rubber-tyred with a buried guidance wire system. Twenty-four STTS vehicles were made, and are used mainly for maintenance but also for firefighting and in emergencies. Pods with different purposes, up to a payload of , are inserted into the side of the vehicles. The STTS vehicles cannot turn around within the tunnel, and are driven from either end. The maximum speed is  when the steering is locked. A smaller fleet of fifteen Light Service Tunnel Vehicles (LADOGS) were introduced to supplement the STTSs. The LADOGS have a short wheelbase with a  turning circle allowing two-point turns within the service tunnel. Steering cannot be locked like the STTS vehicles, and maximum speed is . Pods up to 1 tonne can be loaded onto the rear of the vehicles. Drivers in the tunnel sit on the right, and the vehicles drive on the left. Owing to the risk of French personnel driving on their native right side of the road, sensors in the road vehicles alert the driver if the vehicle strays to the right side of the tunnel.(Kirkland pp. 247254)The three tunnels contain  of air that needs to be conditioned for comfort and safety. Air is supplied from ventilation buildings at Shakespeare Cliff and Sangatte, with each building capable of full duty providing 100% standby capacity. Supplementary ventilation also exists on either side of the tunnel. In the event of a fire, ventilation is used to keep smoke out of the service tunnel and move smoke in one direction in the main tunnel to give passengers clean air. The Channel Tunnel was the first mainline railway tunnel to have special cooling equipment. Heat is generated from traction equipment and drag. The design limit was set at , using a mechanical cooling system with refrigeration plants on both the English and French sides that run chilled water circulating in pipes within the tunnel.(Trains travelling at high speed create piston-effect pressure changes that can affect passenger comfort, ventilation systems, tunnel doors, fans and the structure of the trains, and drag on the trains.(Kirkland pp. 212230) Piston relief ducts of  diameter were chosen to solve the problem, with 4 ducts per kilometre to give close to optimum results. Unfortunately this design led to unacceptable lateral forces on the trains so a reduction in train speed was required and restrictors were installed in the ducts.(The Channel Tunnel Experience Lessons for the Future pp. 1923)The safety issue of a fire on a passenger-vehicle shuttle garnered much attention, with Eurotunnel itself noting that fire was the risk gathering the most attention in a 1994 Safety Case for three reasons: ferry companies opposed to passengers being allowed to remain with their cars; Office statistics indicating that car fires had doubled in ten years; and the long length of the tunnel. Eurotunnel commissioned the UK Fire Research Station to give reports of vehicle fires, as well as liaising with Kent Fire Brigade to gather vehicle fire statistics over one year. Fire tests took place at the French Mines Research Establishment with a mock wagon used to investigate how cars burned.(Kirkland pp. 231240) The wagon door systems are designed to withstand fire inside the wagon for 30 minutes, longer than the transit time of 27 minutes. Wagon air conditioning units help to purge dangerous fumes from inside the wagon before travel. Each wagon has a fire detection and extinguishing system, with sensing of ions or ultraviolet radiation, smoke and gases that can trigger halon gas to quench a fire. Since the Heavy Goods Vehicle (HGV) wagons are not covered, fire sensors are located on the loading wagon and in the tunnel itself. A  water main in the service tunnel provides water to the main tunnels at  intervals.() The ventilation system can control smoke movement. Special arrival sidings exist to accept a train that is on fire, as the train is not allowed to stop whilst on fire in the tunnel. Eurotunnel has banned a wide range of hazardous goods from travelling in the tunnel. Two STTS vehicles with firefighting pods are on duty at all times, with a maximum delay of 10 minutes before they reach a burning train.( See also * of Gibraltar crossing* Rail Class 373* Sea tunnel* Undersea Tunnel* List of Rail megaprojects* Hoe Notes  References * * * * * * *  External links * * New Plan For Channel Tunnel, May 1929, Popular Mechanics article on a post-WW1 plan for a tunnel that was scrapped by the great depression. A total cost figure of 150 million was given in 1929* autobiography of Sir John Stokes regarding 1882 deliberations http://members.fortunecity.com/78blencowest/ch14.htm#chunneltunelibe:  ca:Eurotnelcs:Eurotunelda:Eurotunnelende:Eurotunneles:EurotnelTunelotunelasous la Manchefy:Kanaaltunnelgl:Eurotnel (-)hr:Eurotunelsub la ManchoChannelis:Ermarsundsgngindella ManicaChanneltunelisnnert der Manchelt:Eurotunelishu:Csatorna-alagtSelatnl:Kanaaltunnelja:no:Kanaltunnelennn:Kanaltunnelenkm:pl:Eurotunelpt:EurotnelCanalului Mneciiru:Tunnelsq:EurotuneliTunnelsk:Eurotunelpod Rokavskim prelivomtunnelisv:Kanaltunnelnth:Tneliuk: hm eo bin Manchezh:
5724
Cape_Breton_Island
 additional info  Cape Breton Island (formerly le Royale, Gaelic: Ceap Breatainn or Eilean Cheap Bhreatainn, Mkmaq: namakika, simply: Cape Breton) is an island on the Atlantic coast of America.  It likely corresponds to the word Breton, the French demonym for Brittany.Cape Breton Island is part of the province of Scotia, Canada. The  island accounts for 18.7% of the total area of Nova Scotia.  Although physically separated from the Scotia peninsula by the of Canso, it is artificially connected to mainland Nova Scotia by the   long rock-fill Causeway.  The island is located east-northeast of the mainland with its northern and western coasts fronting on the of Saint Lawrence; its western coast also forming the eastern limits of the Strait. The eastern and southern coasts front the Atlantic Ocean; its eastern coast also forming the western limits of the Strait. Its landmass slopes upward from south to north, culminating in the highlands of its northern cape. One of the worlds larger salt water lakes, Bras dOr (Arm of Gold in French), dominates the centre of the island.The island is divided into four of Nova Scotias eighteen counties: Cape Breton, Inverness, Richmond, and Victoria. Their total population as of the 2001 census numbered 147,454 Cape Bretoners; this is approximately 16% of the provincial population.  Cape Breton Island has experienced a decline in population of approximately 6.8% since the previous census in 1996.  Approximately 72% of the islands population is located in the Cape Breton Regional Municipality (CBRM) which includes all of Cape Breton County and is often referred to as Cape Breton, given the history of coal mining and steel manufacturing in this area.The island contains five reserves of the Mikmaq Nation, these being: Eskasoni, Membertou, Wagmatcook, Waycobah, and Potlotek/Chapel Island. Eskasoni is the largest in both population and land area.HistoryCape Breton Islands first residents were likely Maritime Archaic natives, ancestors of the Mikmaq, the latter of whom inhabited the island at the time of European discovery.  Giovanni Caboto (John Cabot) reportedly visited the island in 1497 to become the first Renaissance European explorer to visit present-day Canada. However, historians are unclear as to whether Cabot first visited Newfoundland or Cape Breton Island. This discovery is commemorated by Cape Bretons Trail, and by Cabots Landing Historic Site & Provincial Park, located near the village of Dingwall.A fishing colony was established on the island about 152122 by the Portuguese under lvares Fagundes.  As many as 200 settlers lived in the nameless village in what is now present day Ingonish (location according to some historians) on the islands northeastern peninsula.  The fate of the colony is unknown, but it is mentioned as late as 1570.(de Souza, Francisco; Tratado das Ilhas Novas, 1570)During the War (16271629), under 1, by 1629 the Kirkes took City, Sir James Stewart of Killeith, Ochiltree planted a colony on Cape Breton Island at Nova Scotia and Alexanders son, Alexander, 1st Earl of Stirling established the first incarnation of New Scotland at Royal, Nova Scotia. This set of British triumphs which left only Cape Sable as the only major French holding in North America was not destined to last.(Roger Sarty and Doug Knight. Saint John Fortifications: 1630-1956. New Brunswick Military Heritage Series. 2003. p. 18.)  Charles 1s hast to make peace with France on the terms most beneficial to him meant that the new North American gains would be bargained away in the of Saint-Germain-en-Laye (1632).(Nichols, 2010. p. xix)  The French quickly defeated the Scottish at Baleine and established the first permanent settlements on Ile Royale: present day Englishtown (1629) and St. Peters (1630). These settlements lasted almost continuously until Denys left in 1659.  Ile Royale then remained vacant for more than fifty years until the communities along with Louisbourg were established in 1713.le RoyaleKnown as le Royale to the French, the island also saw active settlement by France.  After the French ceded its colonies on Newfoundland and the Acadian mainland to the British by the of Utrecht in 1713, the French relocated the population of Plaisance, Newfoundland to le Royale and the French garrison was established in the central eastern part at Ste. Anne.  As the harbour at Ste. Anne experienced icing problems, it was decided to construct a much larger fortification at Louisbourg to improve defences at the entrance to the of Saint Lawrence and defend Frances fishing fleet on the Grand Banks.(Canadian Military Heritage; vol.1, Chapter 6: Soldiers of the Atlantic Seaboard, p103. Government of Canada, 2004-04-26) The French also built the Lighthouse in 1734, the first lighthouse in Canada and one of the first in North America.  In addition to Cape Breton Island, the French colony of le Royale also included le St.-Jean (today called Edward Island).   File:British burninng warship Prudent and capturing Bienfaisant. Siege of Louisbourg 1758. Maritime Museum of the Atlantic, M55.7.1.jpg|300px|thumb|right|of Louisbourg (1758)Louisbourg itself was one of the most important commercial and military centres in New France.   Although Louisbourg was captured by New Englanders with British naval assistance in 1745(ibid., p112.) and by the British again in 1758, le Royale remained formally part of colonial France until it was ceded to Britain under the Treaty of Paris in 1763.  Britain merged the island with its adjacent colony of Nova Scotia (present day peninsular Nova Scotia and Brunswick).Some of the first British-sanctioned settlers to the island following the Years War were Irish, although upon settlement, they merged with local French communities to form a culture rich in both music and tradition.  From 1763 to 1784 the island was administratively part of the colony of Scotia and governed from Halifax.The first permanently settled Scottish community on Cape Breton Island was Judique, settled in 1775 by Michael Mor MacDonald. He spent his first winter using his upside-down boat for shelter, which is reflected in the architecture of the villages Community Centre. He composed a song about the area called Os alainn an t-aite, or Fair is the Place.Colony of Cape BretonIn 1784, Britain split the colony of Nova Scotia into three separate colonies:  New Brunswick, Cape Breton Island, and present-day peninsular Nova Scotia, in addition to the adjacent colonies of St. Johns Island (renamed Prince Edward Island in 1798) and Newfoundland.  The colony of Cape Breton Island had its capital at Sydney on its namesake harbour fronting on Spanish Bay and the Strait. Its first Lieutenant-Governor was Frederick Wallet DesBarres (17841787) and his successor was Macarmick (1787). From 1799 to 1807 the military commandant was Despard http://www.biographi.ca/009004-119.01-e.php?&id_nbr2837, brother of Edward.(Despard, John; The Companion to British History, Routledge)An order forbidding the granting of land in Cape Breton, issued in 1763, was removed in 1784. The mineral rights to the island were given over to the Crown by an order-in-council. The British government had intended that the Crown take over the operation of the mines when Cape Breton was made a colony, but this was never done, probably because of the rehabilitation cost of the mines. The mines were in a neglected state, caused by careless operations dating back at least to the time of the final fall of Louisbourg.Large scale shipbuilding began in the 1790s, beginning with schooners for local trade moving in the 1820s to larger brigs and brigantines, mostly built for British shipowners. Shipbuilding peaked in the 1850s, marked in 1851 by the rigged ship Lord Clarendon, the largest wooden ship ever built in Cape Breton.Merger with Nova ScotiaIn 1820, the colony of Cape Breton Island was merged for the second time with Nova Scotia.  This development is one of the factors which led to large-scale industrial development in the Sydney Coal Field of eastern Cape Breton County (see Cape Breton). By the late 19th century, as a result of the faster shipping, expanding fishery and industrialization of the island, exchanges of people between the island of Newfoundland and Cape Breton increased beginning a cultural exchange that continues to this day.During the first half of the 19th century, Cape Breton Island experienced an influx of Scots numbering approximately 50,000 as a result of the Clearances.  Today, the descendants of the Highland Scots dominate Cape Breton Islands culture, particularly in rural communities.  To this day Gaelic is still the first language of a number of elderly Cape Bretoners.  A campaign of violence and intimidation by the provincial school board led to the near extermination of Gaelic culture. The growing influence of English-dominated media from outside the Scottish communities saw the use of this language erode quickly during the 20th century. Many of the Scots who immigrated there were either Roman Catholics or Presbyterians, which can be seen in a  number of island landmarks and place names.The 1920s were some of the most violent times in Cape Breton. They were marked by several severe labour disputes.  The famous murder of William Davis by strike breakers, and the seizing of the New Waterford power plant by striking miners led to a major union sentiment that persists to this day in some circles. Davis Miners Memorial Day is celebrated in coal mining towns to commemorate the deaths of miners at the hands of the coal companies.20th centuryThe turn of the 20th century saw Cape Breton Island at the forefront of scientific achievement with the now-famous activities launched by inventors Graham Bell and Marconi.Following his successful invention of the telephone and being relatively wealthy, Bell acquired land near Baddeck in 1885, largely due to surroundings reminiscent of his early years in Scotland. He established a summer estate complete with research laboratories, working with deaf peopleincluding Kellerand continued to invent. Baddeck would be the site of his experiments with hydrofoil technologies as well as the Experiment Association, financed by his wife, which saw the first powered flight in the Empire when the AEA Silver Dart took off from the ice-covered waters of dOr Lake. Bell also built the forerunner to the lung and he experimented with breeding sheep.Marconis contributions to Cape Breton Island were also quite significant as he used the islands geography to his advantage in transmitting the first North American trans-Atlantic radio message from a station constructed at Table Head in Glace Bay to a receiving station at Poldhu in Cornwall, England. Marconis pioneering work in Cape Breton marked the beginning of modern radio technology. Marconis station at Marconi Towers, on the outskirts of Glace Bay, became the chief communication center for the Royal Canadian Navy in World War I and up to the early years of Word War II. Promotions for tourism beginning in the 1950s recognized the importance of the Scottish culture to the province, and the provincial government started encouraging the use of Gaelic once again. The establishment of funding for the College of Celtic Arts and Crafts and formal Gaelic courses in public schools are intended to address the near-loss of this culture to English assimilation. In the 1960s, the of Louisbourg was partially reconstructed by Canada. Today this Historic Site of Canada is one of the islands dominant economic engines, employing many residents and attracting thousands of tourists every year.  The Fortress has also led to the revial and pride of the Acadian community who were the first settlers along with the Mikmaq.  Madame and Chticamp are well known for their hospitality and fine food.GeographyThe island measures  in area, making it the 77th largest island in the world and Canadas 18th largest island. Cape Breton Island is composed mainly of rocky shores, rolling farmland, glacial valleys, barren headlands, mountains, woods and plateaus.  Geological evidence suggests that at least part of the island was originally joined with present-day Scotland and Norway, now separated by millions of years of drift.The northern portion of Cape Breton Island is dominated by the Breton Highlands, commonly shortened to simply the Highlands, which are an extension of the Appalachian mountain chain.  The Highlands comprise the northern portions of Inverness and Victoria counties.  In 1936 the federal government established the Breton Highlands National Park covering  across the northern third of the Highlands. The Trail scenic highway also encircles the coastal perimeter of the plateau.Cape Breton Islands hydrological features include the dOr Lake system, a salt-water fjord at the heart of the island, and freshwater features including Ainslie, the River system, and the Mira River. Innumerable smaller rivers and streams drain into the Bras dOr Lake estuary and onto the Gulf of St. Lawrence and Atlantic coasts.Cape Breton Island is joined to the mainland by the Causeway, which was completed in 1955, enabling direct road and rail traffic to and from the island, but requiring traffic to pass through the Canal at the eastern end of the causeway.Cape Breton Island is divided into four counties: Cape Breton, Inverness, Richmond, and Victoria.DemographicsThe islands residents can be grouped into five main cultures; Scottish, Mikmaq, Acadian,  Irish, and English, with respective languages  Gaelic (Scottish and Irish), Mikmaq, French, and English.  English is now the primary spoken language, though Mikmaq, Gaelic and French are still heard.Later migrations of Loyalists, Italians, and Europeans mostly settled in the eastern part of the island around the Industrial Cape Breton region. The population of Cape Breton Island has been in decline for almost two decades with an increasing population exodus in recent years due to economic conditions.According to the Census of Canada, the population of Cape Breton Island in 2001 was 147,454, a 6.8% decline from 158,260 in 1996.Ethnic composition*95.0% Caucasian*3.6% Mikmaq (Canadian First Nation)*0.7% Black*0.1% ArabReligious groupsStatistics Canada in 2001 reported a religion total of 107,880 for Cape Breton, including 3,915 with no religious affiliation.(Table from Statistics Canada (Nova Scotia Statistics Agency))  Major categories included:* Catholic: 69,820* Protestant: 32,575 (including 13,790 United Church and 10,170 Anglican)* Orthodox: 395* Jewish: 235* Muslim: 135Synagogues in Sydney and Glace Bay serve a small historic Jewish community (which was once one of the larger ones in eastern Canada) while more recent Muslim immigrants hold Friday prayers at Breton University.  Buddhists are a tiny minority (70 in 2001, according to Statistics Canada), although Abbey in Pleasant Bay has been operational since 1984.EconomyCape Breton Island has two major coal deposits:  the Sydney Coal Field in the southeastern part of the island along the Atlantic Ocean drove the Industrial Cape Breton economy throughout the 19th and 20th centuriesuntil after War II its industries were the largest private employers in Canada; the Inverness Coal Field in the western part of the island along the Gulf of St. Lawrence is significantly smaller but hosted several mines.Sydney has traditionally been the main port, with various facilities in a large, sheltered, natural harbour. It is the islands largest commercial centre and home to the ``Breton Post`` daily newspaper, as well as two television stations, CBIT-TV (CBC) and CJCB-TV (CTV), and several radio stations. The Atlantic terminal at North Sydney is the terminal for large ferries travelling to ChannelPort aux Basques and seasonally to Argentia on the island of Newfoundland.Point Edward on the west side of Sydney Harbour is the location of Sydport, a former navy base () now converted to commercial use. The Coast Guard College is located nearby at Westmount.  Petroleum, bulk coal, and cruise ship facilities are also located in Sydney Harbour.Glace Bay is the second largest urban community in population and was the islands main coal mining centre until its last mine ceased operation in the 1980s. Glace Bay served as the hub of the Sydney & Louisburg Railway and also as a major fishing port. At one time, Glace Bay was known as the largest town in Nova Scotia, based on population.Port Hawkesbury has risen to prominence since the completion of the Canso Causeway and Canal created an artificial deep-water port, allowing extensive petrochemical, pulp and paper, and gypsum handling facilities to be established.  The Strait of Canso is completely navigable to Seawaymax vessels, and Port Hawkesbury is open to the deepest-draught vessels on the worlds oceans.  Large marine vessels may also enter Bras dOr Lake through the Great Bras dOr channel whereas small craft have the additional use of the Little Bras dOr channel or Peters Canal. The St. Peters Canal is no longer used by commercial shipping on Cape Breton Island but is an important waterway for recreational vessels.The industrial Cape Breton area faced several challenges with the closure of the Breton Development Corporations (DEVCO) mines and the Steel Corporations (SYSCO) mill.  In recent years the Islands residents have been attempting to diversify the area economy by investing in tourism developments, centres, and small businesses, as well as manufacturing ventures in such fields as auto parts, pharmaceuticals, and window glazings.While the Cape Breton Regional Municipality is in transition from an industrial to a service-based economy, the rest of Cape Breton Island outside of the industrial area surrounding Sydney-Glace Bay has been more stable, with a mixture of fishing, forestry, small-scale agriculture, and tourism.Tourism in particular has grown throughout the post-Second World War era, especially the growth in vehicle-based touring, which was furthered by the creation of the Trail scenic drive.  The scenery of the island is rivalled in northeastern North America only by Newfoundland and Cape Breton Island tourism marketing places a heavy emphasis on its Scottish Gaelic heritage through events such as the Celtic Colours Festival, held each October, as well as promotions through the College of Celtic Arts and Crafts.Whale-watching is a popular attraction for tourists. Whale-watching cruises are operated by numerous vendors from Baddeck to Cheticamp. The most popular species of whale found in Cape Bretons waters is the whale.The primary east-west road on the island is Highway 105, the Highway, although Trunk 4 is also heavily used.  Highway 125 is an important arterial route around Sydney Harbour in the Cape Breton Regional Municipality.  The Trail, circling the Cape Breton Highlands, and Trunk 19, along the western coast of the island, are important secondary roads. Railway connections between the port of Sydney to National Railway in Truro are maintained by the Breton and Central Nova Scotia Railway.The Trail is a scenic road circuit around and over the Breton Highlands with spectacular coastal vistas; over 400,000 visitors drive the Cabot Trail each summer and fall.  Coupled with the of Louisbourg, it has driven the growth of the tourism industry on the island in recent decades. The Cond Nast travel guide has rated Cape Breton Island as one of the best island destinations in the world.Traditional musicCape Breton is well known for its traditional fiddle music, which was brought to North America by Scottish immigrants during the Clearances.  The traditional style has been well preserved in Cape Breton, and cilidhs have become a popular attraction for summer tourists.  Inverness County in particular has a heavy concentration of musical activity, with regular performances in communities such as Mabou and Judique. Judique is recognized as Bhaile nam Fonn, (literally: Village of Tunes) or the Home of Celtic Music, featuring the Celtic Music Interpretive Centre. Performers who have received significant recognition outside of Cape Breton include MacMaster, MacMaster, MacIsaac, Rankin Family, Debison, and the MacNeils.Men of the Deeps are a male choral group of current and former miners from the industrial Cape Breton area.Film and television*A Warriors Tale starring Beach*Johnny Belinda (1948 film) by Blaney Harris.*Museum starring Bonham Carter.*Bay Boy starring Sutherland.*Waterford Girl*Hanging Garden*Girls (1993 film) starring Kirshner*Marion Bridge*My Bloody Valentine*Pit Pony, TV movie and series adapted from the novel by BarkhouseNotable peopleThe arts*Arbuckle, actor from Donkin*Beaton, webcomic artist from Mabou, winner of the 2009 Wright Award for Best Emerging Talent*Bishop, singer-songwriter from Celtae*Allan Cameron, singer-songwriter,  from Glencoe Station, credited as the Godfather of Cape Bretons modern Celtic music revival*Caplan, historian, publisher, member of the Order of Canada*P. Cormier, singer-songwriter, fiddle, mandolin, banjo guitar-player, Cheticamp.*Mark Day, film & television actor, writer, and producer from Port Hawkesbury*Debison, singer-songwriter*Domanski,  poet*Doyle, singer-songwriter from Sydney Mines*Winston Scotty Fitzgerald, fiddle player from White Point, Victoria County, Nova Scotia*Frank, photographer*Gallivan, Night in Canada sportscaster*Guthro, singer-songwriter*MacAskill, giant and circus performer*MacDonald, singer-songwriter*MacIsaac, fiddle player from Creignish*MacIvor, actor, playwright, theatre director and film director from Sydney*MacLennan, Generals Awards winning Author Rising, and Two Solitudes.*MacLeod, author* The MacNeils, singing group*MacNeil, singer-songwriter, from Big Pond*MacMaster, fiddle player from Judique*MacMaster, fiddle player  from  Troy*Minglewood, musician*Mowat, writer, has his summer residence in Cape Breton()*Oake, Night in Canada sportscaster*Petrie, Hollywood filmmaker*Rankin Family, singers-songwriters, from Mabou*Ravanello, actor, War, various TV series including 24, CSI and Housewives*Russell, Award winning actor for his portrayal of Homer Parrish, in the 1946 film Best Years of Our Lives.*Sampson, singer/songwriter*Serra, sculptor*Slowcoaster, rock band*Fun OrchestraAthletics*Boutilier*Aaron Johnson*Andrew MacDonald*MacInnis*McPhee*Miles*Bobby Smith*SullimanPolitics and business*Buchanan, of Nova Scotia*Francis, First Black Governor of Nova Scotia*Gillis, Member of Parliament*Sidney Harrington, Premier of Nova Scotia*Angus L. MacDonald, Premier of Nova Scotia*Donald MacDonald, President of the Labour Congress and MLA*Finlay MacDonald, Senator*MacDonald, Premier of Nova Scotia*MacEachen, Former Deputy Prime Minister / Finance Minister*MacLellan, Premier of Nova Scotia*May, Leader of the Party of Canada*W. Morgan, Mayor of Cape Breton Regional Municipality*Muir, Member of Parliament, and Senator*Henry Murray, Premier of Nova Scotia*Raitt, Federal Minister of Natural Resources*Schwartz, Businessman, Philanthropist, member of the of CanadaReligion*Coady, Roman Catholic priest, helped found the Co-operative Movement at Francis Xavier University*E. Kiley, Catholic archbishop of the Catholic Archdiocese of Milwaukee, Milwaukee, Wisconsin*James Father Jimmy Tompkins, Roman Catholic priest, helped found the Co-operative Antigonish Movement at St. Francis Xavier University*Reverend Norman McLeod, Presbyterian minister, St Anns, who migrated in the 1850s with 800 settlers from surrounding communities to Waipu, New Zealand. Photo gallery File:Cabotslanding.jpg|Cabots Landing, Victoria County, commemorating the first land seen by explorer John Cabot in 1497File:Cape breton island 1.jpgFile:Cape breton island 2.jpg|The coastline of dOr Lake at Marble Mountain, Inverness Co..File:Cape breton island 3.jpg|A bulk carrier in the of Canso docked at the Martin Marietta Materials quarry located at Cape Porcupine.File:NS CapeBretonHighlands2 tango7174.jpg|Breton Highlands National Park.File:NS SmeltBrook tango7174.jpg|Smelt Brook on the northern shore.File:CapeBretonEntrance.jpg|Entering Cape Breton Island from Causeway.File:Capebretonmainlandbridge.jpg|Island Bridge in Victoria County, the 3rd longest in Nova Scotia.File:Sydney Harbour aerial view.jpg|Sydney Harbour with Point Edward, Westmount, and downtown Sydney visible.See also*Gaelic*Breton accent*Breton Labour Party*Breton Regional Municipality, Nova Scotia*and territories of Canada*of Cape Breton IslandReferences(*Counties of Nova Scotia; Statistics Canada*Sea islands: Natural Resources Canada Atlas of Canada*Cape Breton County and its divisions, Nova Scotia; Statistics CanadaExternal links* Cape Breton Wireless Heritage Society* Province of Cape Breton Island* Cape Breton Island Tourism Information* Flags of Cape Breton Island, on Flags of the World.net website Cu BretnHi-ph Tdel Cap BretCape BretonBretonde:Kap-Breton-InselBretondel Cabo Bretnde Breton-KaboLurmuturra uharteadu Cap-BretonBreatuinnCheap Bhreatainnde Cabo BretnCape Bretondel Capo Bretone ka:-Bretono salaBretoneilandja:BretonBretonBretonCape BretonCapul Bretonru:-Breton IslandBretonin saariBretonn()Breton (pur)zh:
5766
Clement_Attlee
 religion      AgnosticClement Richard Attlee, 1st Earl Attlee, KG, OM, CH, PC, FRS (3 January 1883  8 October 1967) was a British Labour politician who served as the Prime Minister of the Kingdom from 1945 to 1951, and as the Leader of the Labour Party from 1935 to 1955. He was also the first person to hold the office of Deputy Prime Minister, under Churchill in the wartime coalition government, before leading the Labour Party to a landslide election victory over Churchills Conservative Party in 1945. He was the first Labour Prime Minister to serve a full Parliamentary term, and the first to command a Labour majority in Parliament.The government he led put in place the post-war settlement, based upon the assumption that employment would be maintained by Keynesian policies, and that a greatly enlarged system of social services would be created  aspirations that had been outlined in the wartime Report. Within this context, his government undertook the nationalisation of major industries and public utilities as well as the creation of the Health Service. After initial Conservative opposition to Keynesian fiscal policy, this settlement was broadly accepted by all parties(Conservative Party website  the postwar consensus.) until Thatcher became Prime Minister in 1979.His government also presided over the decolonisation of a large part of the Empire when India, Pakistan, Burma, Ceylon and Jordan were granted independence. The Mandate of Palestine also came to an end with the creation of Israel on the day of British withdrawal.In 2004, he was voted the greatest British prime minister of the 20th century in a poll of 139 academics organised by MORI.()Early life and familyAttlee was born in Putney, London, the seventh of eight children. His father was Henry Attlee (18411908), a solicitor, and his mother was Ellen Bravery Watson (18471920).EducationAttlee was educated at Northaw School, a boys preparatory school near Pluckley in Kent (which in 1952 was relocated and named Norman Court School), College, and College, Oxford, where he graduated with a Second Class Honours BA in History in 1904. Attlee then trained as a lawyer, and was called to the Bar in 1906.(Life and careerFrom 1906 to 1909, Attlee worked as manager of Haileybury House, a charitable club for working-class boys in Limehouse in the End of London run by his old school. Prior to this, his political views had been conservative. However, he was shocked by the poverty and deprivation he saw while working with slum children. He came to the view that private charity would never be sufficient to alleviate poverty, and only massive action and redistribution by the state would have any serious effect. This caused him to convert to socialism.( He joined the Labour Party in 1908, and became active in London local politics.In 1909 he worked briefly as secretary for Webb, and from 1909 to 1910 he worked as secretary for Hall.( In 1911 he took up a government job as an official explainer, touring the country to explain Lloyd Georges Insurance Act. He spent the summer of that year touring Essex and Somerset on a bicycle, explaining the Act at public meetings.(Attlee became a lecturer at the School of Economics in 1912, but promptly applied for a Commission in August 1914 for War I.(Military service during World War IDuring War I, Attlee was given the rank of captain and served with the Lancashire Regiment in the Campaign in Turkey. After a period of fighting in the heat, sand and flies he became ill with dysentery and was sent to hospital in Malta to recover. This may have saved his life, as while he was in hospital he missed the of Sari Bair in which many of his comrades were killed.Attlee had gained a reputation among his superiors as a competent leader. When he returned to the front, he was informed that his company had been chosen to hold the final lines when Gallipoli was evacuated. He was the last-but-one man to be evacuated from Bay (the last being General F.S. Maude).(The Gallipoli Campaign had been masterminded by Churchill. Attlee believed that it was a bold strategy, which could have been successful if it had been better implemented. This gave him an admiration for Churchill as a military strategist, which improved their working relationship in later years.(He later served in the Campaign in Iraq, where he was badly wounded at El Hannah after being hit in the leg by shrapnel from an exploding shell while taking enemy trenches. He was sent back to England to recover, and spent most of 1917 training soldiers. He was sent to France in June 1918 to serve on the Western Front for the last months of the war.(In 1917 he had been promoted to the rank of Major, and continued to be known as Major Attlee for much of the inter-war period.His decision to fight in the war caused a rift between him and his older brother Tom Attlee, who as a pacifist and a objector spent much of the war in prison.(Beckett, Francis. (1997) Clem Attlee A Biography By Francis Beckett, Richard Cohen Books, ISBN 1-86066-101-7) After the war, he returned to teaching at the School of Economics until 1923.Marriage and childrenAttlee met Violet Millar on a trip to Italy in 1921. Within a few weeks of their return they became engaged and were married at Church, Hampstead on 10 January 1922.( It would come to be a devoted marriage, until her death in 1964. They had four children: (Lady) Janet Helen (b. 1923), (Lady) Felicity Ann (19252007), Martin Richard (192791) and (Lady) Alison Elizabeth (b. 1930).Early political careerLocal politicsAttlee returned to local politics in the immediate post-war period, becoming mayor of the Borough of Stepney in 1919, one of Londons poorest inner-city boroughs.  During his time as mayor, the council undertook action to tackle slum landlords who charged high rents but refused to spend money on keeping their property in habitable condition. The council served and enforced legal orders on house-owners to repair their property. It also appointed health visitors and sanitary inspectors, and reduced the infant mortality rate.(In 1920, while mayor, he wrote his first book, The Social Worker, which set out many of the principles that informed his political philosophy and that were to underpin the actions of his government in later years.( The book attacked the idea that looking after the poor could be left to voluntary action. He wrote:Charity is a cold grey loveless thing. If a rich man wants to help the poor, he should pay his taxes gladly, not dole out money at a whim.He went on to write: In a civilised community, although it may be composed of self-reliant individuals, there will be some persons who will be unable at some period of their lives to look after themselves, and the question of what is to happen to them may be solved in three ways  they may be neglected, they may be cared for by the organised community as of right, or they may be left to the goodwill of individuals in the community. The first way is intolerable, and as for the third: Charity is only possible without loss of dignity between equals. A right established by law, such as that to an old age pension, is less galling than an allowance made by a rich man to a poor one, dependent on his view of the recipients character, and terminable at his caprice.(He strongly supported the Rates Rebellion led by Lansbury in 1921. This put him into conflict with many of the leaders of the London Labour Party, including Morrison.(Howell, David. (2006) Attlee (20 British Prime Ministers of the 20th Century), Haus Publishing, ISBN 1-904950-64-7)Member of ParliamentAt the 1922 general election, Attlee became the of Parliament (MP) for the constituency of Limehouse in Stepney. He helped MacDonald, whom at the time he admired, get elected as Labour Party leader at the 1922 Labour leadership election, a decision which he later regretted.( He served as Ramsay MacDonalds parliamentary private secretary for the brief 1922 parliament.His first taste of ministerial office came in 1924, when he served as Under-Secretary of State for War in the short-lived first Labour government, led by MacDonald.(Attlee opposed the 1926 General Strike, believing that strike action should not be used as a political weapon. However, when it happened he did not attempt to undermine it. At the time of the strike he was chairman of the Stepney Borough Electricity Committee. He negotiated a deal with the Electrical Trade Union that they would continue to supply power to hospitals, but would end supplies to factories. One firm, Scammell and Nephew Ltd, took a civil action against Attlee and the other Labour members of the committee (although not against the Conservative members who had also supported this). The court found against Attlee and his fellow councillors and they were ordered to pay 300 damages. The decision was later reversed on appeal, but the financial problems caused by the episode almost forced Attlee out of politics.(In 1927 he was appointed a member of the multi-party Commission, a Commission set up to examine the possibility of granting self-rule to India. As a result of the time he needed to devote to the commission, and contrary to a promise made to Attlee by MacDonald to induce him to serve on the commission, he was not initially offered a ministerial post in the Labour Government.( However, his unsought service on the Commission was to equip Attlee (who was later to have to decide the future of India as Prime Minister) with a thorough exposure to India and many of its political leaders.In 1930, Labour MP Mosley left the party after its rejection of his proposals for solving the unemployment problem. Attlee was given Mosleys post of of the Duchy of Lancaster. He was Postmaster-General at the time of the 1931 crisis, during which most of the partys leaders lost their seats. During the course of the second Labour government, Attlee had become increasingly disillusioned by Ramsay MacDonald, whom he came to regard as vain and incompetent, and later wrote scathingly of him in his autobiography.((Spartacus Schoolnet  Contains excerpt from Attlees biography towards the bottom of the page.)Opposition during the 1930sDeputy Leader of the Labour PartyAfter the downfall of the second Labour government, the 1931 General Election was held. The election was a disaster for the Labour Party, which lost over 200 seats; most of the partys senior figures lost their seats, including Henderson the party leader. Lansbury and Attlee were among the few surviving Labour MPs who had served in government. Accordingly, Lansbury became leader of the party and Attlee became deputy leader.(Attlee served as acting leader for nine months from December 1933, after Lansbury fractured his thigh in an accident.( This raised his public profile. During this period, financial problems again almost forced Attlee to quit politics, as his wife was ill, and there was then no separate salary for the Leader of the Opposition. He was persuaded to stay on, however, by Cripps, a wealthy socialist who agreed to pay him an additional salary.(Leader of the OppositionGeorge Lansbury, a convinced pacifist, resigned as leader at the 1935 Labour Party conference, after the party voted in favour of sanctions against Italy for its aggression against Abyssinia, a policy which Lansbury strongly opposed. With a general election looming, the Parliamentary Labour Party then appointed Attlee as leader, on the understanding that a leadership election would be held after the general election.(Attlee led Labour through the 1935 general election, which saw the party stage a partial recovery from its disastrous performance in 1931, gaining over one hundred seats. In the post-election leadership contest held in November 1935, Attlee was opposed by Morrison and Greenwood. Morrison was seen as the favourite by many, but was distrusted by many sections of the party, especially the left. Arthur Greenwoods leadership bid was hampered by his alcohol problem. Attlee came first in both the first and second ballots, and subsequently retained the leadership, a post which he would retain until 1955.(Throughout the 1920s and most of the 1930s, the Labour Partys official policy, supported by Attlee, was to oppose rearmament, and support security under the of Nations. However, with the rising threat from Germany, and the ineffectiveness of the League of Nations, this policy lost credibility. By 1937, Labour had jettisoned its pacifist position and came to support rearmament and oppose Chamberlains policy of appeasement.(In 1937, Attlee visited Spain and visited the Battalion of the Brigades fighting in the Civil War.( One of the companies was named the Major Attlee Company in his honour.Deputy Prime MinisterAttlee remained opposition leader when war broke out in September 1939. The disastrous campaign resulted in a motion of no confidence in the government.() Although Chamberlain survived this, the reputation of his administration was so badly damaged that it was clear that a government was necessary. The crisis coincided with the Party Conference. Even if Attlee had been prepared to serve under Chamberlain (in a national emergency government), he would not have been able to carry the party with him. Consequently, Chamberlain tendered his resignation, and Labour and the Conservatives entered a coalition government led by Churchill.(In the World War II coalition government, three interconnected committees ran the war. Churchill chaired the Cabinet and the Committee. Attlee was his regular deputy in these committees, and answered for the government in parliament when Churchill was absent. Attlee chaired the third body, the Presidents Committee, which ran the civil side of the war. As Churchill was most concerned with executing the war, the arrangement suited both men.(Only he and Churchill remained in the war cabinet from the formation of the Government of National Unity to the 1945 election. Attlee was Privy Seal (194042), Deputy Prime Minister (194245), Dominions Secretary (194243), and President of the Council (194345). Attlee supported Churchill in his continuation of Britains resistance after the French capitulation in 1940, and proved a loyal ally to Churchill throughout the conflict;( when the war cabinet had voted on whether to negotiate peace terms, Attlee (along with fellow Labour minister Greenwood) voted in favour of fighting, giving Churchill the majority he needed to continue the war.(Marr, Andrew: A History of Modern Britain (2009 paperback), p. xv to xvii)1945 general electionFollowing the end of the war in Europe in May 1945, Attlee and Churchill wanted the coalition government to last until Japan had been defeated. However, Morrison argued that the party would not accept this, and the Labour National Executive Committee agreed with him. Churchill responded by resigning as coalition Prime Minister and decided to call an election at once.(The war set in motion profound social changes within Britain, and led to a popular desire for social reform. This mood was epitomised in the Report. The report assumed that the maintenance of full employment would be the aim of postwar governments, and that this would provide the basis for the state. Immediately on its release, it sold hundreds of thousands of copies.  All major parties were committed to this aim, but perhaps Attlee and Labour were seen by the electorate as the best candidates to follow it through.Labour campaigned on the theme of Let Us Face the Future and positioned themselves as the party best placed to rebuild Britain after the war, while the Conservatives campaign centred around Churchill. With the hero status of Churchill, few expected a Labour victory. However Churchill made some errors during the campaign: His suggestion during a radio broadcast, that a Labour government would require some form of a gestapo to implement their socialist policies, was widely seen as being in bad taste, and backfired.(The results of the election when they were announced on 26 July, came as a surprise to almost everyone, including Attlee: Labour had been swept to power on a landslide, winning just under 50% of the vote, to the Conservatives 36%. Labour won 393 seats, giving them a majority of 147.The story goes that when Attlee visited George VI at Palace to kiss hands, the notoriously laconic Attlee and the notoriously tongue-tied George VI stood for some minutes in silence, before Attlee finally volunteered the remark Ive won the election.  The King replied I know. I heard it on the Six OClock News.()Prime Ministerwith GeorgeVI HU 59486.jpg|thumb|right|Attlee meeting King George VI after Labours 1945 election victory.Now Prime Minister, Attlee appointed Bevin as Secretary; Dalton was appointed of the Exchequer (it had widely been expected to be the other way around). Cripps became of the Board of Trade, while Morrison was given the post of Deputy Prime Minister and given overall control of Labours nationalisation programme. Bevan became Minister of Health, whilst Wilkinson, the only woman to serve in Attlees government, became Minister of Education.Domestic policyHealth and Welfare reformsA more extensive system of social welfare benefits was established by the Attlee Government, which did much to reduce acute social deprivation. The cumulative impact of the Attlees Governments health and welfare policies was such that all the indices of health (such as statistics of school medical or dental officers, or of medical officers of health) showed signs of improvement, with continual improvements in survival rates for infants and increased life expectancy for the elderly.(In policy, the party had clear aims. Attlees first Health Secretary, Bevan, fought against the general disapproval of the medical establishment in creating the British Health Service; the publicly funded healthcare system, which offers treatment free at the point of use. Reflecting pent-up demand that had long existed for medical services, the NHS treated some 8.5 million dental patients and dispensed more than 5 million pairs of spectacles during its first year of operation.(The Attlee Governments 1945-1951 by Kevin Jefferys) Although there are often disputes about its organisation and funding, British parties to this day must still voice their general support for the NHS in order to remain electable.(See, e.g., http://content.healthaffairs.org/cgi/reprint/8/4/52.pdf)A large house-building programme was carried out with the intention of providing millions of people with high-quality homes.( A housing bill passed in 1946 increased Treasury subsidies for the construction of local authority housing in England and Wales,(The Longman Companion to The Labour Party 1900-1998 by Harry Harmer) while four out of five houses constructed under Labour were council properties, built to more generous specifications than before the Second World War, while subsidies kept down council rents. Altogether, these policies provided public-sector housing with its biggest ever boost up until that point, while low-wage earners particularly benefited from these developments. Although the Attlee Government failed to meet its targets owing to economic constraints, over a million new homes were built between 1945 and 1951 (a significant achievement under the circumstances) which ensured that decent, affordable housing was available to many low-income families for the first time ever.( Entitlement to sick leave was greatly extended, with sick pay schemes introduced for local authority administrative, professional and technical workers in 1946 and for various categories of manual workers in 1948.(Poverty in the United Kingdom: A Survey of Household Resources and Standards of Living by Peter Townsend), while workers compensation was significantly improved.(Social democracy & welfare capitalism: a century of income security politics by Alexander M. Hicks)  Other changes included the creation of a National Parks system, the introduction of the and Country Planning system, the repeal of the Trades Disputes Act 1927, the introduction of a Dock Labour Scheme in 1947 (which sought to put an end to the casual system of hiring labour in the docks)() and the introduction of a Miners Charter in 1946, which instituted a five-day workweek for miners and a standardised day wage structure.( In the 1945-46 session, pensions and other benefits were substantially increased,( and from 1945 to 1948, over 200 public of Parliament were passed, with eight major pieces of legislation placed on the statute book in 1946 alone.(To Build a New Jerusalem: the British Labour movement from the 1880s to the 1990s by A.J. Davies) As noted by the historian Kevin Jeffreys,Within eighteen months, Attlees cabinet had done more than any previous twentieth-century government to improve the lot of ordinary people.(The government set about implementing Beveridges plans for the creation of a cradle to grave state, and set in place an entirely new system of security. Among the most important pieces of legislation was the Insurance Act 1946, in which people in work paid a flat rate of insurance. In return, they (and the wives of male contributors) were eligible for flat-rate pensions, sickness benefit, unemployment benefit, and funeral benefit. Various other pieces of legislation provided for benefit and support for people with no other source of income.( In addition, the Criminal Justice Act of 1948 restricted imprisonment for juveniles and brought improvements to the probation and remand centres systems, while the passage of the Justices of the Peace Act of 1949 led to extensive reforms of magistrates courts. The New Towns Act of 1946 set up development corporations to construct new towns, while the Town and Country Planning Act of 1947 instructed county councils to prepare development plans and also provided compulsory purchase powers.(A block grant introduced in 1948 helped the social services provided by local authorities.(Labour in Power, 1945-51 by Kenneth Morgan) Personal Social Services or welfare services were developed in 1948 for individual and families in general, particularly special groups such as the mentally disordered, deprived children, the elderly, and the handicapped.(Social Services: Made Simple by Tony Byrne, BA, BSc(Econ.), and Colin F. Padfield, LLB, DPA(Lond)) The Attlee Government also significantly increased pensions and other benefits, with pensions raised to the point that they became more of a living income than they had been before. The success of the Attlee Governments welfare legislation in reducing poverty was such that, in the general election of 1950,Labour propaganda could make much of the claim that social security had eradicated the most abject destitution of the 1930s.(NationalisationAttlees government also carried out their manifesto commitment for nationalisation of basic industries and public utilities. The of England and civil aviation were nationalised in 1946. Coal mining, the railways, road haulage, canals and cable and wireless were nationalised in 1947, electricity and gas followed in 1948. The steel industry was finally nationalised in 1951. By 1951 about 20% of the British economy had been taken into ownership.( Although nationalisation failed to provide workers with a greater say in the running of the industries that they worked in (as many on the Left had hoped), it did bring about significant material gains for workers in the form of higher wages and reduced working hours.(The Labour Governments, 1945-51 by Henry Pelling) As noted by the historian Shaw, in the years following nationalisation, the electricity and gas supply companies became impressive models of public enterprise in terms of efficiency, while in relation the coal industry, the Coal Board was not only profitable, but working conditions for miners had significantly improved as well.(The Labour Party since 1945 by Eric Shaw) AgricultureThe Attlee Government placed strong emphasis on improving the quality of life in rural areas, benefiting both farmers and other consumers. Security of tenure for farmers was introduced, while consumers were protected by food subsidies and the redistributive effects of deficiency payments. Between 1945 and 1951, the quality of rural life was improved by improvements in gas, electricity, water services, as well as in leisure and public amenities. In addition, the 1947 Transport Act improved provision of rural bus services, while the Act 1947 established a more generous subsidy system for farmers.( Legislation was also passed in 1947 and 1948 which established a permanent Agricultural Wages Board to fix minimum wages for agricultural workers.()(The State and the Farmer by Peter Self and Herbert J. Storing)EducationThe Attlee Government ensured provisions of the Act 1944 were fully implemented, with free secondary education becoming a right for the first time. In addition, the school leaving age was raised to 15 in 1947, while increased Treasury funds were made available for education, particularly for upgrading school buildings suffering from years of neglect and war damage.(The Labour Party since 1945 by Kevin Jefferys) Prefab classrooms were also built and 928 new primary schools were constructed between 1945 and 1950. State scholarships to universities were increased,(A Short History of the Labour Party by Henry Pelling and Alastair J. Reid) while free milk was made available to all schoolchildren for the first time.(From plain fare to fusion food: British diet from the 1890s to the 1990s by Derek J. Oddy)  An Emergency Training Scheme was also introduced which turned out an extra 25,000 teachers in 1945-51.() Despite these achievements, Attlees government failed to introduce education as many socialists had hoped as a means of making the educational system less meritoric, although this reform was eventually carried out by Wilsons government.The economyNevertheless, the most significant problem remained the economy; the effort had left Britain nearly bankrupt. The war had cost Britain about a quarter of its national wealth. Overseas investments had been wound up to pay for the war. The transition to a peacetime economy, and the maintaining of strategic military commitments abroad led to continuous and severe problems with the of trade. This meant that strict rationing of food and other essential goods were continued in the post war period, to force a reduction in consumption in an effort to limit imports, boost exports and stabilise the Pound Sterling so that Britain could trade its way out of its crisis.The abrupt ending of the American Lend-Lease program in August 1945 almost caused a crisis. This was mitigated by the loan negotiated in December 1945 by Maynard Keynes, which provided some respite. The conditions attached to the loan included making the pound fully convertible to the dollar. When this was introduced in July 1947, it led to a crisis and convertibility had to be suspended after just five weeks.( Britain benefited from the American Aid program from 1948, and the economic situation improved significantly. However another balance of payments crisis in 1949 forced Chancellor of the Exchequer Cripps into devaluation of the pound.(Despite these problems, one of the main achievements of Attlees government was the maintenance of near employment. The government maintained most of the wartime controls over the economy, including control over the allocation of materials and manpower, and unemployment rarely rose above 500,000, or 3% of the total workforce.( In fact labour shortages proved to be more of a problem. In addition, the inflation rate was also kept low.( One area where the government was not quite as successful was in housing, which was also the responsibility of Aneurin Bevan. The government had a target to build 400,000 new houses a year to replace those which had been destroyed in the war, but shortages of materials and manpower meant that less than half this number were built. Neverheless, millions of people were rehoused as a result of the Attlee governments housing policies, and between August 1945 and December 1951, 1,016,349 new homes were completed in England, Scotland, and Wales.(Labour in power, 1945-1951 by Kenneth Morgan) In addition, when the Attlee Government was voted out of office in 1951, it had left the economy in better shape than they had found it in 1945, while the period from 1946 to 1951 saw continuous full employment and steadily rising living standards, which increased by about 10% per annum. During that same period, the economy grew by 3% a year, and by 1951 the United Kingdom had the best economic performance in Europe, while output per person was increasing faster than in the United States.(Ten Years of New Labour, edited by Matt Beech and Simon Lee) Careful planning after 1945 also ensured that demobilisation was carried out without having a negative impact upon economic recovery, and that unemployment would be kept at very low levels.(The Labour Party since 1945 by Kevin Jefferys)1947 crisis1947 proved to be a particularly difficult year for the government; an exceptionally cold winter that year caused coal mines to freeze and cease production, creating widespread cuts and food shortages. The crisis led to an unsuccessful plot by Dalton to replace Attlee as Prime Minister with Bevin. Later that year Cripps tried to persuade Attlee to stand aside for Bevin. However these plots petered out after Bevin refused to co-operate.( Later that year, Dalton resigned as Chancellor after inadvertently leaking details of the budget to a journalist. He was replaced by Cripps.Relations with the press and Royal familyAttlees government faced constant hostility from Conservative supporting sections of society, including the Conservative supporting press. The Times journalist James Margach, wrote of the Attlee years; I have never known the Press so consistently and irresponsibly political, slanted and prejudiced. As early as 1946 the Attorney-General Sir Shawcross attacked the campaign of calumny and misrepresentation which the Tory Party and the Tory stooge press has directed at the Labour government. Freedom of the press does not mean freedom to tell lies. In 1946 the government set up a Commission on the press which eventually led to the setting up of the Press Council in 1953.(Relations with Royal Family were also strained. A letter from Queen Elizabeth (later the Mother), dated 17 May 1947, showed her decided lack of enthusiasm for the socialist government and describes the British electorate as poor people, so many half-educated and bemused for electing Attlee over Winston Churchill, whom she saw as a war hero. That said, according to Lord Wyatt, this was to be expected as the Queen Mother was the most right-wing member of the Royal Family.( Andrew Pierce, What Queen Mother really thought of Attlees socialist heaven on earth. The Times, 13 May 2006, p. 9))Foreign policyFile:Potsdam big three.jpg|thumb|300px|Clement Attlee (left) with President S. Truman and Stalin at the1945 Conference.Postwar Europe and the Cold WarIn foreign affairs, Attlees cabinet was concerned with four issues: postwar Europe, the onset of the war, the establishment of the Nations, and decolonisation. The first two were closely related, and Attlee was assisted in these matters by Bevin. Attlee attended the later stages of the Conference in the company of S. Truman and Stalin.In the immediate aftermath of the war, the Government faced the challenge of managing relations with Britains former war-time ally, Stalin and the Union.  Attlees Foreign Secretary, the former union leader Bevin, was passionately anti-communist, based largely on his experience of fighting communist influence in the trades union movement.  Bevins initial approach to the USSR as Foreign Secretary has been described by historian Kenneth O. Morgan as wary and suspicious, but not automatically hostile.(Morgan, Labour in Power.)In an early good-will gesture that was later heavily criticised, the Attlee government allowed the Soviets access, under the terms of a 1946 UK-USSR Trade Agreement, to several Nene engines.  The Soviets, who at the time were well behind the West in jet technology, reverse-engineered the Nene, and installed their own version in the MiG-15 interceptor, used to good effect against US-UK forces in the subsequent Korean War, as well as in several later MiG models.(Gordon, Yefim, Mikoyan-Gurevich MIG-15: The Soviet Unions Long-Lived Korean War Fighter, Midland Press (2001))After Stalin took political control of most of Europe and began to subvert other governments in the Balkans, Attlees and Bevins worst fears of Soviet intentions were borne out.   The Attlee government then became instrumental in the creation of the successful NATO defence alliance to protect Europe against any Soviet aggression.(See, e.g., Kenneth O. Morgan, Labour in Power (Oxford, 1984), especially Chapter 6.) In a crucial contribution to the economic stability of post-War Europe, Attlees cabinet was instrumental in promoting the American Plan for the economic recovery of Europe.A group of wing Labour MPs organised under the banner of Keep Left, urged the government to steer a middle way between the two emerging superpowers, and advocated the creation of third force of European powers to stand between the USA and USSR. However, deteriorating relations between Britain and the USSR, and Britains economic reliance on America, steered policy towards supporting America.(Fear of Soviet and American intentions led, in January 1947, to a secret meeting of senior cabinet ministers, where it was decided to press ahead with the development of Britains independent deterrent, an issue which later caused a split in the Labour Party, although the first successful test did not occur until 1952, after Attlee had left office.(In 1950 American president Harry S. Truman said that atomic weapons may be used in the Korean War. Attlee became concerned with the power America possessed and therefore called a meeting of some foreign affairs ministers in order to discuss the issue that had evolved.File:Bevin Attlee H 42138.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Foreign Secretary Bevin (left) with Clement Attlee in 1945.DecolonisationAttlees government was responsible for the first significant decolonisation of part of the Empire  India. Attlee appointed Louis Mountbatten Viceroy of India, and agreed to Mountbattens request for plenipotentiary powers for negotiating Indian independence. In view of implacable demands by the political leadership of both Hindu and Islamic communities in British India for a separate Hindu and a separate Muslim homeland, Mountbatten conceded the notion of two nations consisting of a Hindu-majority India and a Muslim-majority Pakistan (which at the time incorporated Pakistan, now Bangladesh). The drawing of borders was accomplished at the cost of large-scale population movements and heavy communal bloodshed on both sides. The independence of Burma and Ceylon was also negotiated around this time. Some of the new countries became British Dominions, the genesis of the modern of Nations.(One of the most urgent problems concerned the future of the Mandate. British policies there were perceived by the Zionist movement and the Truman administration as pro-Arab and anti-Jewish, and in the face of armed revolt of Jewish militant groups and increasing violence of the local Arab population Britain had found itself unable to control events. This was a very unpopular commitment and the evacuation of British troops and subsequent handing over of the issue to the UN was widely supported by the public.(The governments policies with regard to the other colonies, however, particularly those in Africa, were very different. A major base was built in Kenya, and the African colonies came under an unprecedented degree of direct control from London, as development schemes were implemented with a view to helping solve Britains desperate post-war of payments crisis, and raising African living standards. This new colonialism was, however, generally a failure: in some cases, such as a then-infamous groundnut scheme, spectacularly so.(Demise of Attlees governmentThe Labour Party was returned to power in the general election of 1950 with a much reduced parliamentary majority under the first-past-the-post system, despite an increase in the popular vote. It was at this time that a degree of Conservative opposition recovered at the expense of the declining Liberal Party. Although Attlees second government was less radical than the first, it oversaw the passage of a number of reforms, relating to issues such as industry in development areas, the restoration of land which had been devastated by ironstone pollution, and river pollution.(The 1945-1951 Labour Governments by Roger Eatwell)By 1951, the Attlee government was looking increasingly exhausted, with several of its most important ministers having died or ailing.  The party split in 1951 over the austerity budget brought in by Gaitskell to pay for the cost of Britains participation in the War: Bevan, architect of the National Health Service (NHS), resigned to protest against the new charges for teeth and spectacles introduced by the budget, and was joined in this action by the later prime minister, Wilson.(Labour lost the general election of 1951 to Churchills renewed Conservatives, despite polling more votes than in the 1945 election and more votes nationwide than the Conservative party, and, indeed, the most votes Labour had ever won.His short list of Resignation Honours announced in November 1951 included an Earldom for Jowitt, Lord Chancellor.(The Times, 30 November 1951; p. 6; Issue 52172; col G: The Resignation Honours: Earldom For Lord Jowitt.)Return to opposition and retirementFollowing the defeat in 1951, Attlee continued to lead the party in opposition. His last four years as leader are widely seen as one of the Labour Partys weaker periods.(Thorpe, Andrew. (2001) A History Of The British Labour Party, Palgrave, ISBN 0-333-92908-X) Many Labour MPs felt Attlee should have retired at the end of 1951 and let a younger man lead the party, which became split between its right wing led by Gaitskell and its left led by Bevan. One of his main reasons for staying on as leader was to frustrate the leadership ambitions of Morrison,( whom Attlee disliked for political and personal reasons. (Ernest Bevin had died shortly before Labour lost office.) Attlee had reportedly at one time favoured Aneurin Bevan to succeed him as leader,( but this became problematic after the latter split the party.Attlee, now aged 72, contested the 1955 general election against Eden, which saw the Conservative majority increase considerably. He retired as leader of the party on 14 December 1955, having led Labour for twenty years, and was succeeded by Gaitskell.(He retired from the Commons and was elevated to the peerage to take his seat in the of Lords as Attlee and Viscount Prestwood on 16 December 1955. In 1958 he was, along with Bertrand Russell, one of a group of notables to establish the Law Reform Society, which campaigned for the decriminalisation of homosexual acts in private by consenting adults, a reform which was voted through parliament nine years later.He attended Churchills funeral in January 1965  elderly and frail by then, he had to remain seated in the freezing cold as the coffin was carried, having tired himself out by standing at the rehearsal the previous day. After the service Attlee had to be helped down the steps of St Pauls Cathedral by Sir Eden and a Guards officer. A heavy pipe and cigarette smoker from an early age, Attlee had breathing problems in his later years.He lived to see Labour return to power under Wilson in 1964, but also to see his old constituency of Walthamstow West fall to the Conservatives in a by-election in September 1967. Clement Attlee died of pneumonia at the age of 84 at Hospital on 8 October 1967.(On his death, the title passed to his son Richard Attlee, 2nd Earl Attlee (192791). It is now held by Clement Attlees grandson Richard Attlee, 3rd Earl Attlee. The third earl (a member of the Conservative Party) retained his seat in the Lords as one of the peers to remain under an amendment to Labours 1999 of Lords Act.When Attlee died, his estate was sworn for probate purposes at a value of 7,295, a relatively modest sum for so prominent a figure.Attlee was cremated and his ashes buried in the nave of Abbey, close to those of Lord Passfield and Bevin.LegacyA modest man, but then he has so much to be modest about, is a quote about Attlee that is very commonly ascribed to Churchill (although Churchill in fact denied saying it, and respected Attlees service in the War Cabinet).(Walter L. Arnstein, Britain Yesterday and Today: 1830 to the Present, Chapter 19, p. 363) Attlees modesty and quiet manner hid a great deal that has only come to light with historical reappraisal. In terms of the of government, he was one of the most businesslike and effective of all the British prime ministers. Indeed he is widely praised by his successors, both Labour and Conservative.His leadership style of consensual government, acting as a chairman rather than a president, won him much praise from historians and politicians alike. Soames, Britains Ambassador to France during the government of Heath - and later a cabinet minister under Margaret Thatcher - remarked that Mrs. Thatcher was not really running a team. Every time you have a Prime Minister who wants to make all the decisions, it mainly leads to bad results. Attlee didnt. Thats why he was so damn good.(Peter Hennessy, The Prime Minister: The Office and its Holders since 1945, Chapter 7, p. 150) Even Thatcher herself wrote in her 1995 memoirs, which charted her beginnings in Grantham to her victory in the 1979 General Election, that she admired Attlee: Of Clement Attlee, however, I was an admirer. He was a serious man and a patriot. Quite contrary to the general tendency of politicians in the 1990s, he was all substance and no show.Attlees administration presided over the successful transition from a wartime economy to peacetime, tackling problems of demobilisation, shortages of foreign currency, and adverse deficits in trade balances and government expenditure. Further domestic policies that he brought about included the establishment of the Health Service and post-war State, which became key to the reconstruction of post-war Britain. Attlee and his ministers did much to transform Britain into a more prosperous and egalitarian society during their time in office, with reductions in poverty and a rise in the general economic security of the population.(Labours First Century by Duncan Tanner, Pat Thane, and Nick Tiratsoo) File:Clement Attlee statue - Limehouse library.jpg|thumb|Statue of Attlee in its former position outside LibraryIn foreign affairs, he did much to assist with the post-war economic recovery of Europe, though this did not lead to a realisation that this was where Britains future might lie. He proved a loyal ally of America at the onset of the cold war. Because of his style of leadership it was not he but Ernest Bevin who masterminded foreign policy.It was Attlees government that decided Britain should have an independent atomic weapons programme, and work began on it in 1947. Bevin, Attlees Foreign Secretary, famously stated that Weve got to have it and its got to have a bloody Union Jack on it. However, the first operational British A Bomb was not detonated until October 1952, about one year after Attlee had left office.Though a socialist, Attlee still believed in the British Empire of his youth, an institution that, on the whole, he thought was a power for good in the world. Nevertheless, he saw that a large part of it needed to be self-governing. Using the Dominions of Canada, Australia, and New Zealand as a model, he began the transformation of the Empire into the Commonwealth.His greatest achievement, surpassing many of these, was, perhaps, the establishment of a political and economic consensus about the governance of Britain that all parties, whether Labour, Conservative or Liberal subscribed to for three decades, fixing the arena of political discourse until the later 1970s.Several years after his death, a street on a new housing development in Tividale, West Midlands, was named Attlee Close in his memory.On 30 November 1988, a bronze statue of Clement Attlee was unveiled by Wilson (the next Labour prime minister after Attlee) outside Limehouse Library in his former constituency.() By then Wilson was the last surviving member of Attlees cabinet(http://pmsa.cch.kcl.ac.uk/UEL/TH051.htm) and the unveiling of the statue would be the last public appearance by Wilson, who was by then in the first stages of Disease and who died in May 1995 after a decade of ill health.() In April 2011, Limehouse Library having closed in 2003, the Attlee statue was unveiled in its new home at Mary University of London.()ImageAlthough possessed of a genial personality, Clement Attlee was notably taciturn in his relations with the Press, sometimes offering only monosyllabic answers to reporters questions. He was seldom referred to by his forenames; usually he was referred to as C. R. Attlee or Mr. Attlee.Religious viewsAlthough one of his brothers became a clergyman and one of his sisters a missionary, Attlee himself is usually regarded as an agnostic.  In an interview he described himself as incapable of religious feeling, saying that he believed in the ethics of Christianity but not the mumbo-jumbo.  When asked whether he was an agnostic, Attlee replied I dont know.()Appearance in popular cultureLiterature* Attlee composed this limerick about himself to demonstrate how he was often underestimated:-: Few thought he was even a starter.: There were many who thought themselves smarter.: But he finished PM,: CH and OM,: An earl and a Knight of the Garter.::Source: Jones, B., Barry Jones Dictionary of World Biography, 1998* An alternative version also exists, which may reflect Attlees use of English more closely:-: There were few who thought him a starter,: Many who thought themselves smarter.: But he ended PM,: CH and OM,: an Earl and a Knight of the Garter.::Source: Kenneth Harris, Attlee (Weidenfeld and Nicholson, London, 1982)Music* Beginners song General Election was inspired by Attlees victory in the 1950 British general election.Sport* In 1981, Attlee again entered British culture as one of the famous English people taunted by name in Bjrge Lilleliens legendary commentary immediately after Norway defeated England in a FIFA World Cup qualifier.Drama* Played by Troughton in & Mrs. Simpson.* Appeared as a character in the play Tom and Clem, by Churchett. In the original production in 1997, McCowen played Attlee, and Gambon played Driberg.* Played by David in the final episode of the BBC sitcom Sweetheart,* The main character in the BBC Radio 4 Saturday Play That Man Attlee.  Broadcast on 15 September 2007, it was written by Robin Glendinning, with Wallis playing Attlee.* Played by Richard Attlee, his grandson, in Jerome Vincents Stuffing Their Mouths with Gold; the story of how the National Health Service came to be. Broadcast on Radio 4 on 4 July 2008, the day before the 60th anniversary of the founding of the NHS.* Played by Bill Paterson in Into the Storm (2009).Major social legislation enacted by the Attlee Government* Allowances Act 1945* Reform (Contributory Negligence) Act 1945* (Financial and Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1946* Industry Nationalisation Act 1946* Houses (Rent Control) Act 1946* Health Service Act 1946* Insurance Act 1946* Insurance (Industrial Injuries) Act 1946* Towns Act 1946* Disputes and Trade Unions Act 1946* Farming Act 1946* Act 1947* (Increase) Act 1947* Act 1947* and Country Planning Act 1947* Act 1947* Services Act 1947* Assistance Act 1948* Act 1948* Holdings Act 1948* and Training Act 1948* and Child-Minders Regulation Act 1948* Reform (Personal Injuries) Act 1948* Government Act 1948* of the People Act 1948* Act 1949* of Commons (Redistribution of Seats) Act 1949* and Tenant (Rent Control) Act 1949* Tribunal Act 1949* Aid and Advice Act 1949* of Children Act 1949* Act 1949* Parks and Access to the Countryside Act 1949* Act 1949* of the People Act 1949* of Industry Act 1950* Compensation (Supplementation) Act 1951Attlees cabinet 194550*Clement Attlee: Minister and of Defence*Lord Jowitt: Chancellor*Morrison: Prime Minister, President of the Council and of the House of Commons*Greenwood: Privy Seal*Dalton: of the Exchequer*Bevin: of State for Foreign Affairs*Chuter Ede: of State for the Home Department*Henry Hall: of State for the Colonies*Lord Addison: of State for Dominion Affairs and of the House of Lords*Lord Pethick-Lawrence: Secretary of State for India and Burma*V. Alexander: Lord of the Admiralty*Lawson: of State for War*William Wedgwood Benn, Lord Stansgate: of State for Air*Wilkinson: Minister of Education*Westwood: of State for Scotland*Tom Williams: of Agriculture and Fisheries*Isaacs: Minister of Labour and National Service*Bevan: Minister of Health*Sir Stafford Cripps: of the Board of Trade*Shinwell: Minister of Fuel and PowerChanges*July 1946  Greenwood becomes Paymaster-General as well as Privy Seal.*October 1946  The three service ministers (of State for War, of State for Air, and Lord of the Admiralty) cease to be positions. V. Alexander remains in the cabinet as without Portfolio. George Hall replaces V. Alexander as Lord of the Admiralty, outside the cabinet. Creech Jones succeeds Hall as of State for the Colonies.*December 1946  V. Alexander succeeds Attlee as of Defence.*February 1947  Tomlinson succeeds Wilkinson as Minister of Education upon her death.*March 1947  Greenwood ceases to be Paymaster-General, remaining Privy Seal. His successor as Paymaster-General is not in the cabinet.*April 1947  Greenwood becomes without Portfolio. Lord Inman succeeds Greenwood as Privy Seal. William Francis Hare, Lord Listowel succeeds Lord Pethick-Lawrence as of State for India and Burma.*July 1947  The Affairs Office becomes the of Commonwealth Relations. Addison remains at the head.*August 1947  India and Burma Office becomes Burma office with independence. Lord Listowel remains in office.*September 1947  Sir Cripps becomes Minister of Economic Affairs. Wilson succeeds Cripps as of the Board of Trade. Greenwood retires from the Bench.*October 1947  Lord Addison succeeds Lord Inman as Privy Seal, remaining also of the House of Lords. Noel-Baker succeeds Lord Addison as of State for Commonwealth Relations. Woodburn succeeds Westwood as of State for Scotland. The of Fuel and Power, Shinwell, leaves the Cabinet.*November 1947  Sir Cripps succeeds Dalton as of the Exchequer.*January 1948  The Office is abolished with independence.*May 1948: Dalton re-enters the Cabinet as of the Duchy of Lancaster. Lord Pakenham enters the Cabinet as of Civil Aviation.*July 1948: Lord Addison becomes Paymaster-General.*April 1949: Lord Addison ceases to be Paymaster-General, remaining Privy Seal and of the House of Lords. His successor as Paymaster-General is not in the Cabinet.Attlees cabinet 195051In February 1950, a substantial reshuffle took place following the General Election:*Clement Attlee: Prime Minister*Lord Jowitt: Chancellor*Herbert Morrison: Prime Minister, President of the Council and of the House of Commons*Lord Addison: Privy Seal and of the House of Lords*Sir Stafford Cripps: of the Exchequer*Bevin: of State for Foreign Affairs*Chuter Ede: of State for the Home Department*Griffiths: of State for the Colonies*Gordon Walker: of State for Commonwealth Relations*Wilson: of the Board of Trade*Lord Alexander of Hillsborough: of the Duchy of Lancaster*Tomlinson: Minister of Education*McNeil: of State for Scotland*Tom Williams: of Agriculture and Fisheries*Isaacs: Minister of Labour and National Service*Bevan: Minister of Health*Shinwell: Minister of Defence*Dalton: Minister of Town and Country PlanningChanges*October 1950: Gaitskell succeeds Sir Stafford Cripps as Chancellor of the Exchequer.*January 1951: Aneurin Bevan succeeds George Isaacs as Minister of Labour and National Service. Bevans successor as Minister of Health is not in the cabinet. Hugh Daltons post is renamed Minister of Local Government and Planning.*March 1951: Herbert Morrison succeeds Ernest Bevin as Foreign Secretary. Lord Addison succeeds Morrison as President. Bevin succeeds Addison as Lord Privy Seal. James Chuter Ede succeeds Morrison as Leader of the House of Commons whilst remaining Home Secretary.*April 1951: Stokes succeeds Ernest Bevin as Lord Privy Seal. Robens succeeds Aneurin Bevan (resigned) as Minister of Labour and National Service. Sir Shawcross succeeds Harold Wilson (resigned) as President of the Board of Trade.Further readingClement Attlee published his memoirs, As it Happened, in 1954.Francis Williams A Prime Minister Remembers, based on interviews with Attlee, was published in 1961.Attlees other publications include:The Social Worker (1920);The Town Councillor (1925);The Will and the Way to Socialism (1935);The Labour Party in Perspective (1937);Collective Security Under the United Nations (1958);Empire into Commonwealth (1961).Biographies include:*Jenkins, Mr Attlee (1948)*Kenneth Harris, Attlee (1982)*Trevor Burridge, Clement Attlee: A Political Biography, (1985)*Francis Beckett, Clem Attlee (1997)*David Howell, Attlee (2006)*Nicklaus Thomas-Symonds, Attlee: A Life in Politics (2010)Biographies of Attlee and of his Cabinet can be found in:* Greg Rosen (ed) Dictionary of Labour Biography. Publishing. ISBN 1-902301-18-8The entry on Attlee in the of National Biography (DNB) was prepared by Shock, who as a Fellow of College, Oxford (Attlees alma mater), came to know Attlee personally in his later years.Accounts of the period include:Kenneth O. Morgan, Labour in Power 194551, University Press, 1984;Greg Rosen, Old Labour to New, Publishing, 2005.NotesReferences*External links**More about Clement Attlee on the Street website.*Clement Attlee at Find-A-Grave** Annotated bibliography for Clement Attlee from the Alsos Digital Library for Nuclear Issues* |-|-|-listAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttlee AttleeAttleeAttleeAttlee AttleeEtlijsAttleeAttleeja:AttleeAttleeRichard AttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleeAttleezh-yue:zh:
5839
Economy_of_Colombia
spelling        Colombia has a market economy with major commercial and investment ties to the States. Transition from a highly regulated economy has been underway for more than a decade.In 1990, the administration of President Gaviria Trujillo (199094) initiated liberalism policies or apertura economica and this has continued since then, with tariff reductions, financial deregulation, privatization of state-owned enterprises, and adoption of a more liberal foreign exchange rate. Almost all sectors became open to foreign investment although agricultural products remained protected.The original idea of his then of Finance, Hommes, was that the country should import agricultural products in which it was not competitive, like maize, wheat, cotton and soybeans and export the ones in which it had an advantage, like fruits and flowers. In ten years, the sector lost 7,000 km to imports, represented mostly in heavily subsidized agricultural products from the States, as a result of this policy, with a critical impact on employment in rural areas.(Plan Colombia: Colombia: Peace Agreements: Library and Links: U.S. Institute of Peace) Still, this policy makes food cheaper for the average Colombian than it would be if agricultural trade were more restricted.Until 1997, Colombia had enjoyed a fairly stable economy. The first five years of liberalization were characterized by high economic growth rates of between 4% and 5%. The Samper administration (199498) emphasized social welfare policies which targeted Colombias lower income population. However, these reforms led to higher government spending which increased the fiscal deficit and public sector debt, the financing of which required higher interest rates. An over-valued peso inherited from the previous administration was maintained.The economy slowed, and by 1998 GDP growth was only 0.6%. In 1999, the country fell into its first recession since the Depression. The economy shrank by 4.5% with unemployment at over 20%. While unemployment remained at 20% in 2000, GDP growth recovered to 3.1%.The administration of President Pastrana Arango, when it took office on August 7, 1998, faced an economy in crisis, with the difficult internal security situation and global economic turbulence additionally inhibiting confidence. As evidence of a serious recession became clear in 1999, the government took a number of steps. It engaged in a series of controlled devaluations of the peso, followed by a decision to let it float. Colombia also entered into an agreement with the Monetary Fund which provided a $2.7 billion guarantee (extended funds facility), while committing the government to budget discipline and structural reforms.By early 2000 there had been the beginning of an economic recovery, with the export sector leading the way, as it enjoyed the benefit of the more competitive exchange rate, as well as strong prices for petroleum, Colombias leading export product. Prices of coffee, the other principal export product, have been more variable.Economic growth reached 3.1 % during 2000 and inflation was 9.0% although unemployment has yet to significantly improve. Colombias international reserves have remained stable at around $8.35 billion, and Colombia has successfully remained in international capital markets. Colombias total foreign debt at the end of 1999 was $34.5 billion with $14.7 billion in private sector and $19.8 billion in public sector debt. Major international rating organizations have dropped Colombian debt below investment grade, primarily as a result of large fiscal deficits, which current policies are seeking to close.Several international financial institutions have praised the economic reforms introduced by former president Uribe (elected August 7, 2002), which include measures designed to reduce the public-sector deficit below 2.5% of GDP in 2004. The governments economic policy and security strategy have engendered a growing sense of confidence in the economy, particularly within the business sector, and GDP growth in 2003 was among the highest in America, at over 4%. By 2007, GDP grew over 8%.StatisticsEconomy - overview   Colombias economy has experienced positive growth over the past three years despite a serious armed conflict. The economy continues to improve in part because of austere government budgets, focused efforts to reduce public debt levels, an export-oriented growth strategy, an improved security situation in the country, and high commodity prices. Ongoing economic problems facing President Uribe range from reforming the pension system to reducing high unemployment, and to achieving congressional passage of a fiscal transfers reform. New exploration is needed to offset declining production. International and domestic financial analysts note with concern the growing central government deficit, which hovers at 5% of GDP. However, the governments economic policy and democratic security strategy have engendered a growing sense of confidence in the economy, particularly within the business sector. Household income or consumption by percentage share:  lowest 10%: 0.8%highest 10%: 45.9% (2006) Investment (gross fixed):  24.3% of GDP (2008 est.) Budget:revenues: $83.22 billionexpenditures: $82.92 billion; including capital expenditures of $NA (2008 est.)Central bank discount rate:11.5% (31 December 2008)Commercial bank prime lending rate:15.6% (31 December 2008)Stock of money:$21.58 billion (31 December 2008)Stock of quasi money:$26.57 billion (31 December 2008)Stock of domestic credit:$89.69 billion (31 December 2008)Market value of publicly traded shares:$87.03 billion (31 December 2008)Agriculture - products:coffee, cut flowers, bananas, rice, tobacco, corn, sugarcane, cocoa beans, oilseed, vegetables; forest products; shrimpIndustries:textiles, food processing, oil, clothing and footwear, beverages, chemicals, cement; gold, coal, emeraldsIndustrial production growth rate:0.8% (2008 est.)Electricity - production:53.6 billion kWh (2007)Electricity - consumption:52.8 billion kWh (2007)Electricity - exports:876.7 million kWh (2007)Electricity - imports:38.4 million kWh (2007)Oil - production: (2008 est.)Oil - consumption: (2007 est.)Oil - exports: (2008 est.)Oil - imports: (2005)Oil - proved reserves: (1 January 2008 est.)Natural gas - production:7.22 billion cu m (2006 est.)Natural gas - consumption:7.22 billion cu m (2006 est.)Natural gas - exports:0 cu m (2007 est.)Natural gas - imports:0 cu m (2007 est.)Natural gas - proved reserves:122.9 billion cu m (1 January 2008 est.)Current account balance:$-6.761 billion (2008 est.)Exchange rates:Colombian pesos (COP) per US dollar - 2,243.6 (2008), 2,013.8 (2007), 2,358.6 (2006), 2,320.75 (2005), 2,628.61 (2004) Source:(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/co.html)Economic growththumb|right|250px|GDP growth 2001-2007Source:(http://www.dane.gov.co/files/comunicados/cp_pib_Itrim07.pdf)Mining and energyColombia is well-endowed with minerals and energy resources. It has the largest coal reserves in Latin America, and is second to Brazil in hydroelectric potential. Estimates of petroleum reserves in 1995 were . It also possesses significant amounts of nickel, gold, silver, platinum, and emeralds.The discovery of  of high-quality oil at the Cusiana and Cupiagua fields, about  east of Bogot, has enabled Colombia to become a net oil exporter since 1986. The pipeline transports oil from Orito in the of Putumayo to the Pacific port of Tumaco in the of Nario.() Total crude oil production averages ; about  is exported. The Pastrana government has significantly liberalized its petroleum investment policies, leading to an increase in exploration activity. Refining capacity cannot satisfy domestic demand, so some refined products, especially gasoline, must be imported. Plans for the construction of a new refinery are under development. While Colombia has vast hydroelectric potential, a prolonged drought in 1992 forced severe electricity rationing throughout the country until mid-1993. The consequences of the drought on electricity-generating capacity caused the government to commission the construction or upgrading of 10 thermoelectric power plants. Half will be coal-fired, and half will be fired by gas. The government also has begun awarding bids for the construction of a natural gas pipeline system that will extend from the countrys extensive gas fields to its major population centers. Plans call for this project to make natural gas available to millions of Colombian households by the middle of the next decade.As of 2004, Colombia has become a net energy exporter, exporting electricity to Ecuador and developing connections to Peru, Venezuela and Panama to export to those markets as well. The pipeline connecting western Venezuela to Panama through Colombia is also under construction, thanks to cooperation between presidents Uribe of Colombia, Torrijos of Panama and Chvez of Venezuela. The pipeline will be inaugurated by October 2007.Human rights abuse in mining zonesThe oil pipelines are a frequent target of extortion and bombing campaigns by the National Liberation Army (ELN) and, more recently, the Armed Forces of Colombia (FARC). The bombings, which have occurred on average once every 5 days, have caused substantial environmental damage, often in fragile forests and jungles, as well as causing significant loss of life. In April 1999 in Cartagena de Indias, Clintons Secretary of Energy Bill Richardson spoke before investors from the United States, Canada and other countries. He expressed his governments willingness to use military aid to support the investment that they and their allies were going to make in Colombia, especially in strategically important sectors like mining and energy.In 2002 there were 170 attacks on the 2nd largest pipeline, which travels 780 km from the Limn to the Atlantic port of Coveas. The pipeline was out of operation for 266 days of that year. The government estimates that these bombings reduced the domestic productP of Colombia by 0.5%. The government of the States increased military aid, in 2003, to Colombia to assist in the effort to defend the pipeline. Petroleum privately contracted mercenaries who flew Skymaster planes, from AirScan International Inc., to patrol the Cano Limon-Covenas pipeline. Many of these operations used helicopters, equipment and weapons provided by the U.S. military and anti-narcotics aid programs.Mining and natural exploitation has had environmental consequences. The region of Guajira is undergoing an accelerated desertification with the disappearances of forests, land, and water sources, due to the increase in coal production.Social consequences or lack of development in resource rich areas is common. 11 million Colombians survive on less than one dollar a day. Over 65% of these live in mining zones. There are 3.5 million children out of school, and the most critical situation is in the mining zone of Choco, Bolivar, and Sucre.Economic consequences of privatization and liberal institutions have meant changes in taxation to attract foreign investment. Colombia will lose another $800 million over the next 90 years that International operates in El Cerrejon Zona Media, if the company continues to produce coal at a rate of 5 million tons/year, because of the reduction of the royalty tax from 10-15% to .04%. If the company, as is plausible, doubles or triples its production, the losses will be proportionally greater. The operational losses from the three large mining projects (Cerrejon, Loma, operated by Drummond, and Montelbano, which produces ferronickel) for Colombia to more than 12 billion. Coal production has grown rapidly, from 22.7 million tons in 1994 to 50.0 million tons in 2003.(Unidad de Planeacin Minero Energtica - UPME (2004), Boletn Estadstico de Minas y Energa 1994 - 2004. PDF file in Spanish.) Over 90% of this amount was exported, making Colombia the worlds sixth largest coal exporter, behind Australia, the Republic of China, Indonesia, Africa and Russia.(World Coal Institute (2004), Coal Facts - 2004 Edition. PDF file.) From the mid-1980s the center of coal production was the Cerrejn mines in the Guajira department. However, the growth in output at La Loma in neighboring Cesar mean that this department has been the leader in coal production since 2004. Production in other departments, including Boyac, Cundinamarca and de Santander, forms about 13% of the total. The coal industry is largely controlled by international mining companies, including a consortium of Billiton, Anglo American and International at Cerrejn, and Company at La Loma, which is undergoing a lawsuit in the U.S. District Court in Alabama for union assassinations and alleged paramilitary links.Foreign investmentIn 1990, to attract foreign investors and promote trade, an experiment from the Monetary Fund known as la apertura was adopted by the government as an open trade strategy. Although the analysis of the results are not clear, the fact is that the agricultural sector was severely impacted by this policy.In 1991 and 1992, the government passed laws to stimulate foreign investment in nearly all sectors of the economy. The only activities closed to foreign direct investment are defense and national security, disposal of hazardous wastes, and real estatethe last of these restrictions is intended to hinder money laundering. Colombia established a special entityCoInvertirto assist foreigners in making investments in the country. Foreign investment flows for 1999 were $4.4 billion, down from $4.8 billion in 1998.Major foreign investment projects underway include the $6 billion development of the Cusiana and Cupiagua oil fields, development of coal fields in the north of the country, and the recently concluded licensing for establishment of cellular telephone service. The United States accounted for 26.5% of the total $19.4 billion stock of nonpetroleum foreign direct investment in Colombia at the end of 1998.On October 21, 1995, under the International Emergency Economic Powers Act (IEEPA), President Clinton signed an Executive Order barring U.S. entities from any commercial or financial transactions with four Colombian drug kingpins and with individuals and companies associated with the traffic in narcotics, as designated by the Secretary of the Treasury in consultation with the Secretary of State and the Attorney General. The list of designated individuals and companies is amendeded periodically and is maintained by the Office of Foreign Asset Control at the Department of the Treasury, tel. (202) 622-0077 (ask for Document #1900). The document also is available at the Department of Treasury web site.Colombia is the United States fifth-largest export market in Latin Americabehind Mexico, Brazil, Venezuela, and Argentinaand the 26th-largest market for U.S. products worldwide. The United States is Colombias principal trading partner, with two-way trade from November 1999 through November 2000 exceeding $9.5 billion--$3.5 billion U.S. exports and $6.0 billion U.S. imports. Colombia benefits from duty-free entryfor a 10-year period, through 2001for certain of its exports to the United States under the Andean Trade Preferences Act. Colombia improved protection of intellectual property rights through the adoption of three Andean Pact decisions in 1993 and 1994, but the U.S. remains concerned over deficiencies in licensing, patent regulations, and copyright protection.The petroleum and natural gas coal mining, chemical, and manufacturing industries attract the greatest U.S. investment interest. U.S. investment accounted for 37.8% ($4.2 billion) of the total $11.2 billion in foreign direct investment at the end of 1997, excluding petroleum and portfolio investment. Worker rights and benefits in the U.S.-dominated sectors are more favorable than general working conditions. Examples include shorter-than-average working hours, higher wages, and compliance with health and safety standards above the national average.Industry and agricultureThe most industrially diverse member of the five-nation Andean Community, Colombia has four major industrial centersBogota, Medellin, Cali, and Barranquilla, each located in a distinct geographical region. Colombias industries include textiles and clothing, particularly lingerie, leather products, processed foods and beverages, paper and paper products, chemicals and petrochemicals, cement, construction, iron and steel products, and metalworking. Its diverse climate and topography permit the cultivation of a wide variety of crops. In addition, all regions yield forest products, ranging from tropical hardwoods in the hot country to pine and eucalyptus in the colder areas.beans, sugarcane, coconuts, bananas, plantains, rice, cotton, tobacco, cassava, and most of the nations beef cattle are produced in the hot regions from sea level to 1,000 meters elevation. The temperate regionsbetween 1,000 and 2,000 metersare better suited for coffee and coca; certain flowers; maize and other vegetables; and fruits such as citrus, pears, pineapples, and tomatoes. The cooler elevationsbetween 2,000 and 3,000 meterproduce wheat, barley, potatoes, cold-climate vegetables, flowers, dairy cattle, and poultry.Notes- Colombia, a top emerging country in the CIVETS: the new BRICsSee also* Colombia*  Colombia Economy report - Official Investment portal* of Colombian companies* of South America* from Colombia* A U.S.-Colombia Free Trade Agreement: Strengthening Democracy and Progress in Latin Americade Colmbiade Colombiade la Colombiede Colombiadi KolumbiaColombiakonomide Colmbiada ColmbiaColumbieie Kolumbis
5879
Caesium
Caesium or cesiumpostscript  .)(postscript.) following Websters New International Dictionary. The element was named after the Latin word caesius, meaning bluish gray. More spelling explanation at ae/oe vs e.|groupnote}} ( ) is the element with the symbol Cs and number 55. It is a soft, silvery-gold metal with a melting point of 28 C (82 F), which makes it one of only five elemental metals that are liquid at (or near) temperature.groupnote Caesium is an metal and has physical and chemical properties similar to those of rubidium and potassium. The metal is extremely reactive and pyrophoric, reacting with water even at 116 C (177 F). It is the least electronegative element that has stable isotopes, of which it has only one, caesium-133. Caesium is mined mostly from pollucite, while the radioisotopes, especially caesium-137, a product, are extracted from waste produced by nuclear reactors.Two German chemists, Bunsen and Kirchhoff, discovered caesium in 1860 by the newly developed method of flame spectroscopy. The first small-scale applications for caesium have been as a getter in tubes and in photoelectric cells. In 1967, a specific frequency from the spectrum of caesium-133 was chosen to be used in the definition of the second by the System of Units. Since then, caesium has been widely used in clocks.Since the 1990s, the largest application of the element has been as caesium formate for fluids. It has a range of applications in the production of electricity, in electronics, and in chemistry. The radioactive isotope caesium-137 has a half-life of about 30 years and is used in medical applications, industrial gauges, and hydrology. Although the element is only mildly toxic, it is a hazardous material as a metal and its radioisotopes present a high health risk in case of radiation leaks.CharacteristicsPhysical propertiesCaesium is a very soft (it has the lowest Mohs hardness of all elements (0.2)), very ductile, silvery-white metal, which develops a silvery-gold hue in the presence of trace amounts of oxygen.()() It has a point of , making it one of the few elemental metals which are liquid near temperature. Mercury is the only elemental metal with a known melting point lower than caesium.groupnote() In addition, the metal has a rather low point, , the lowest of all metals other than mercury.( Its compounds burn with a blue color.()Caesium forms alloys with the other alkali metals as well as with gold, and amalgams with mercury. At temperatures below , it alloys with cobalt, iron, molybdenum, nickel, platinum, tantalum or tungsten. It forms well-defined intermetallic compounds with antimony, gallium, indium and thorium, which are photosensitive.( It mixes with the other alkali metals (except with lithium), and the alloy with a molar distribution of 41% caesium, 47% potassium, and 12% sodium has the lowest melting point of any known metal alloy, at .(() A few amalgams have been studied:   is black with a purple metallic lustre, while CsHg is golden-coloured, also with a metallic lustre.()Chemical propertiesCaesium metal is highly reactive and very pyrophoric. In addition to igniting spontaneously in air, it reacts explosively with water even at low temperatures, more so than other members of the first group of the table.( The reaction with solid water occurs at temperatures as low as .( Because of its high reactivity, the metal is classified as a material. It is stored and shipped in dry saturated hydrocarbons such as oil. Similarly, it must be handled under inert atmosphere such as argon. It can be stored in vacuum-sealed glass ampoules. In quantities of more than about 100 grams (3.5 oz), caesium is shipped in hermetically sealed stainless steel containers.(The chemistry of caesium is similar to that of other alkali metals, but is more closely similar to that of rubidium, the element above caesium in the periodic table.( Some small differences arise from the fact that it has a higher mass and is more electropositive than other (non-radioactive) alkali metals.() Caesium is the most electropositive stable chemical element.groupnote( The caesium ion is also larger and less hard than those of the lighter metals.CompoundsThe vast majority of caesium compounds contain the element as the cation , which binds ionically to a wide variety of anions. One noteworthy exception is provided by the caeside anion ().()  Other exceptions include the several suboxides (see section on oxides below).Returning to more normal compounds, salts of Cs+ are almost invariably colorless unless the anion itself is colored.  Many of the simple salts are hygroscopic, but less so than the corresponding salts of the lighter alkali metals.  The acetate, carbonate, halides, oxide, nitrate, and sulfate salts are water-soluble. salts are often less soluble, and the low solubility of caesium aluminium sulfate is exploited in the purification of Cs from its ores.  The double salt with antimony (such as ), bismuth, cadmium, copper, iron, and lead are also poorly soluble.(hydroxide (CsOH) is hygroscopic and a very strong base.( It rapidly etches the surface of semiconductors such as silicon.() CsOH has been previously regarded by chemists as the strongest base, reflecting the relatively weak attraction between the large Cs+ ion and OH.;( it is indeed the strongest base, but a number of compounds that cannot exist in aqueous solution, such as n-butyllithium and amide,( are more basic.A stoichiometric mixture of caesium and gold will react to form auride.ComplexesLike all metal cations, Cs+ forms complexes with bases in solution.  Because of its large size, Cs+ usually adopts numbers greater than six-coordination, which is typical for the lighter alkali metal cations.  This trend is already apparent by the 8-coordination in CsCl, vs the halite motif adopted by the other alkali metal chlorides. Its high coordination number and softness (tendency to form covalent bonds) are the basis of the separation of Cs+ from other cations, as is practiced in the remediation of nuclear wastes, where 137Cs+ is separated from large amounts of non-radioactive K+.(.)Halideschloride (CsCl) crystallizes in the simple crystal system.  Also called the caesium chloride structure,( this structural motif is composed of a primitive cubic lattice with a two-atom basis, each with an eightfold coordination; the chloride atoms lie upon the lattice points at the edges of the cube, while the caesium atoms lie in the holes in the center of the cubes. This structure is shared with CsBr and CsI, and many other compounds that do not contain Cs. In contrast, most other alkaline halides adopt the chloride (NaCl) structure.( The CsCl structure is preferred because Cs+ has an radius of 174 pm and  181 pm.()OxidesMore so than the other alkali metals, caesium forms numerous binary compounds with oxygen. When caesium burns in air, the superoxide  is the main product.() The normal oxide () forms yellow-orange hexagonal crystals,() and is the only oxide of the anti- type.() It vaporizes at , and decomposes to caesium metal and the peroxide  at temperatures above .() Aside from the superoxide and the ozonide ,()() several brightly colored suboxides have also been studied.() These include , , ,  (dark-green()), CsO, ,() as well as .()() The latter may be heated under vacuum to generate .( Binary compounds with sulfur, selenium, and tellurium also exist.(IsotopesCaesium has a total of 39 known isotopes that range in their number (i.e. number of nucleons in its nucleus) from 112 to 151. Several of these are synthesized from lighter elements by the slow neutron capture process (S-process) inside old stars,() as well as inside supernova explosions (R-process).() However, the only stable isotope is 133Cs, which has 78 neutrons. Although it has a large spin (7/2+), magnetic resonance studies can be done with this isotope at a resonating frequency of 11.7 MHz.()The radioactive 135Cs has a very long half-life of about 2.3 million years, while 137Cs and 134Cs have half-lives of 30 and 2 years, respectively. 137Cs decomposes to a short-lived 137mBa by decay, and then to non-radioactive barium, while 134Cs transforms into 134Ba directly. The isotopes with mass numbers of 129, 131, 132 and 136, have half-times between a day and two weeks, while most of the other isotopes have half-lives from a few seconds to fractions of a second. There are at least 21 metastable isomers. Other than 134mCs (with a half-life of just under 3 hours), all are very unstable and decay with half-lives of a few minutes or less.()()The isotope 135Cs is one of the fission products of uranium which form in nuclear reactors.() However, its product yield is reduced in most reactors because its predecessor, 135Xe, is an extremely potent poison and transmutes frequently to stable 136Xe before it can decay to 135Cs.()()Because of its decay (to 137mBa), 137Cs is a strong emitter of gamma radiation.() Its half-life makes it the principal fission product along with 90Srboth are responsible for radioactivity of nuclear fuel after several years of cooling up to several hundred years after use.() For example 137Cs together with 90Sr currently generate the largest source of radioactivity generated in the area around the disaster.() It is not feasible to dispose of 137Cs through capture (due to the low capture rate) and as a result it must be allowed to decay.()Almost all caesium produced from nuclear fission comes from decay of originally more neutron-rich fission products, passing through various of iodine and of xenon.() Because iodine and xenon are volatile and can diffuse through nuclear fuel or air, radioactive caesium is often created far from the original site of fission.() With the commencement of weapons testing around 1945, 137Cs was released into the atmosphere and then returned to the surface of the earth as a component of radioactive fallout.(OccurrenceCaesium is a relatively rare element as it is estimated to average approximately 3 parts per million in the Earths crust.() This makes it the 45th most abundant of all elements and the 36th of all the metals. Nevertheless, it is more abundant than such elements as antimony, cadmium, tin and tungsten, and two orders of magnitude more abundant than mercury or silver, but 30 times less abundant than rubidiumwith which it is so closely chemically associated.(Due to its large radius, caesium is one of the elements.() During magma crystallization, caesium is concentrated in the liquid phase and crystallizes last. Therefore the largest deposits of caesium are zone pegmatite ore bodies formed by this enrichment process. Because caesium does not substitute for potassium as readily as does rubidium, the alkali evaporite minerals sylvite (KCl) and carnallite () may contain only 0.002% caesium. Consequently, Cs is found in few minerals. Percent amounts of caesium may be found in beryl () and avogadrite (), up to 15 wt% Cs2O in the closely related mineral pezzottaite (Cs(Be2Li)Al2Si6O18), up to 8.4 wt% Cs2O in the rare mineral londonite (), and less in the more widespread rhodizite.( The only economically important source mineral for caesium is pollucite , which is found in a few places around the world in zoned pegmatites, and is associated with the more commercially important lithium minerals lepidolite and petalite. Within the pegmatites, the large grain size and the strong separation of the minerals create high-grade ore for mining.()One of the worlds most significant and richest sources of the metal is the Tanco mine at Lake in Manitoba, Canada. The deposits there are estimated to contain 350,000 metric tons of pollucite ore, which represents more than two-thirds of the worlds reserve base.(( Although the stoichiometric content of caesium in pollucite is 42.6%, pure pollucite samples from this deposit contain only about 34% caesium, while the average content is 24 wt%.() Commercial pollucite contains over 19% caesium.() The Bikita pegmatite deposit in Zimbabwe is mined for its petalite but it also contains a significant amount of pollucite. Notable amounts of pollucite are also mined in the Karibib Desert, Namibia.( At the present rate of world mine production of 5 to 10 metric tons per year, reserves will last for thousands of years.(ProductionThe mining of pollucite ore is a selective process and is conducted on a small scale in comparison with most metal mining operations. The ore is crushed, hand-sorted, but not usually concentrated, and then ground. Caesium is then extracted from pollucite mainly by three methods: acid digestion, alkaline decomposition, and direct reduction.(()In the acid digestion, the silicate pollucite rock is dissolved with strong acids such as hydrochloric (HCl), sulfuric (), hydrobromic (HBr), or hydrofluoric (HF). With hydrochloric acid, a mixture of soluble chlorides is produced, and the insoluble chloride double salts of caesium are precipitated as caesium antimony chloride (), caesium iodine chloride (), or caesium hexachlorocerate (). After separation, the pure precipitated double salt is decomposed, and pure CsCl is obtained after evaporating the water. The method using sulfuric acid yields the insoluble double salt directly as caesium alum (). The sulfate in it is converted to the insoluble oxide by roasting the alum with carbon, and the resulting product is leached with water to yield a  solution.(The roasting of pollucite with carbonate and chloride yields insoluble calcium silicates and soluble caesium chloride. Leaching with water or dilute ammonia () yields then a dilute chloride (CsCl) solution. This solution can be evaporated to produce caesium chloride or transformed into caesium alum or caesium carbonate. Albeit not commercially feasible, direct reduction of the ore with potassium, sodium or calcium in vacuum can produce caesium metal directly.(Most of the mined caesium (as salts) is directly converted into caesium formate (HCOOCs+) for applications such as drilling. To supply the developing market, Corporation built a production plant in 1997 at the Tanco Mine near Bernic Lake in Manitoba, Canada, with a capacity of  per year of caesium formate solution.() The primary smaller-scale commercial compounds of caesium are chloride and its nitrate.(Alternatively, caesium metal may be obtained from the purified compounds derived from the ore. Caesium chloride, and the other caesium halides as well, can be reduced at  with calcium or barium, followed by distillation of the caesium metal. In the same way, the aluminate, carbonate, or hydroxide may be reduced by magnesium.( The metal can also be isolated by electrolysis of fused caesium cyanide (CsCN). Exceptionally pure and gas-free caesium can be made by the thermal decomposition at  of caesium azide , which is produced from aqueous caesium sulfate and barium azide.( In vacuum applications, caesium dichromate can be reacted with zirconium forming pure caesium metal without other gaseous products.(): + 2   2  + 2 + The price of 99.8% pure caesium (metal basis) in 2009 was about US$10 per gram ($280 per ounce), but its compounds are significantly cheaper.(HistoryFile:Kirchhoff Bunsen Roscoe.jpg|thumb|Kirchhoff (left) and Bunsen (center) discovered caesium spectroscopically.| alt Three middle-aged men, with the one in the middle sitting down. All wear long jackets, and the shorter man on the left has a beard.In 1860, Bunsen and Kirchhoff discovered caesium in the water from Drkheim, Germany. Due to the bright blue lines in its spectrum, they chose a name derived from the Latin word caesius, meaning sky-blue.(Bunsen quotes Gellius Noctes Atticae II, 26 by Figulus: Nostris autem veteribus caesia dicts est quae Graecis, ut Nigidus ait, de colore coeli quasi coelia.)(English Dictionary, 2nd Edition)(() Caesium was the first element to be discovered spectroscopically, only one year after the invention of the spectroscope by Bunsen and Kirchhoff.(To obtain a pure sample of caesium,  of mineral water had to be evaporated to yield  of concentrated salt solution. The earth metals were precipitated either as sulfates or oxalates, leaving the alkali metal in the solution. After conversion to the nitrates and extraction with ethanol, a sodium-free mixture was obtained. From this mixture, the lithium was precipitated by carbonate. Potassium, rubidium and caesium form insoluble salts with acid, but these salts show a slight difference in solubility in hot water. Therefore, the less-soluble caesium and rubidium hexachloroplatinate ((Cs,Rb)2PtCl6) could be obtained by fractional crystallization. After reduction of the hexachloroplatinate with hydrogen, caesium and rubidium could be separated by the difference in solubility of their carbonates in alcohol. The process yielded  of chloride and  of caesium chloride from the initial 44,000 liters of mineral water.()The two scientists used the caesium chloride thus obtained to estimate the weight of the new element at 123.35 (compared to the currently accepted one of 132.9).( They tried to generate elemental caesium by electrolysis of molten caesium chloride, but instead of a metal, they obtained a blue homogenous substance which neither under the naked eye nor under the microscope showed the slightest trace of metallic substance; as a result, they assigned it as a subchloride (). In reality, the product was probably a colloidal mixture of the metal and caesium chloride.() The electrolysis of the aqueous solution of chloride with a mercury anode produced a caesium amalgam which readily decomposed under the aqueous conditions.( The pure metal was eventually isolated by the German chemist Setterberg while working on his doctorate with Kekule and Bunsen.( In 1882 he produced caesium metal by electrolyzing cyanide, and thus avoiding the problems with the chloride.()Historically, the most important use for caesium has been in research and development, primarily in chemical and electrical fields. Very few applications existed for caesium until the 1920s when it became used in radio tubes. It had two functions: as a getter it removed excess oxygen after manufacture, and as a coating on the heated cathode, it increased its conductivity. Caesium did not become recognized as a high-performance industrial metal until the 1950s.() Applications of non-radioactive caesium included photoelectric cells, photomultiplier tubes, optical components of infrared spectrophotometers, catalysts for several organic reactions, crystals for counters, and in magnetohydrodynamic power generators.(Since 1967, the International System of Measurements has based its unit of time, the second, on the properties of caesium. The International System of Units (SI) defines the second as 9,192,631,770 cycles of the radiation, which corresponds to the transition between two hyperfine levels of the state of the caesium-133 atom.() The 13th General Conference on Weights and Measures of 1967 defined a second as: the duration of 9,192,631,770 cycles of microwave light absorbed or emitted by the hyperfine transition of caesium-133 atoms in their ground state undisturbed by external fields.ApplicationsPetroleum explorationThe largest current end-use of caesium is in caesium formate-based fluids for the extractive oil industry. Aqueous solutions of caesium formate (HCOOCs+)made by reacting caesium hydroxide with acidwere developed in the mid-1990s for use as oil well drilling and completion fluids. The function of caesium formate as a drilling fluid is to lubricate drill bits, to bring rock cuttings to the surface, and to maintain pressure on the formation during drilling of the well. As completion fluid, which assists the emplacement of control hardware after drilling but prior to production, the function of caesium formate is to maintain the pressure.(The high density of the caesium formate brine (up to 2.3 gcm3, or 19.2 pounds per gallon),() coupled with the relatively benign nature of most caesium compounds, reduces the requirement for toxic high-density suspended solids in the drilling fluida significant technological, engineering and environmental advantage. Unlike the components of many other heavy liquids, caesium formate is relatively environment-friendly.( The caesium formate brine can be blended with potassium and sodium formates to decrease the density of the fluids down to that of water (1.0 gcm3, or 8.3 pounds per gallon). Furthermore, it is biodegradable and reclaimable, and may be recycled, which is important in view of its high cost (about $4,000 per barrel in 2001).() Alkali formates are safe to handle and do not damage the producing formation or downhole metals as their corrosive alternative, high-density brines (such as bromide  solutions),sometimes do; they also require less cleanup and disposal costs.(Atomic clocksCaesium-based clocks observe electromagnetic transitions in the structure of caesium-133 atoms and use it as a reference point. The first accurate caesium clock was built by Essen in 1955 at the National Physical Laboratory in the UK.() Since then, they have been improved repeatedly over the past half-century, and form the basis for standards-compliant time and frequency measurements. These clocks measure frequency with an accuracy of 2 to 3 parts in 1014, which would correspond to a time measurement accuracy of 2 nanoseconds per day, or one second in 1.4 million years. The latest versions are accurate to better than 1 part in 1015, which means they would be off by about 2 seconds since the extinction of the dinosaurs 65 million years ago,( and has been regarded as the most accurate realization of a unit that mankind has yet achieved.(Caesium clocks are also used in networks that oversee the timing of cell phone transmissions and the information flow on the Internet.()Electric power and electronicsCaesium vapor thermionic generators are low-power devices that convert heat energy to electrical energy. In the two-electrode tube converter, it neutralizes the space charge that builds up near the cathode, and in doing so, it enhances the current flow.()Caesium is also important for its photoemissive properties by which light energy is converted to electron flow. It is used in photoelectric cells because caesium-based cathodes such as the intermetallic compound  have low threshold voltage for emission of electrons.() The range of photoemissive devices using caesium include character recognition devices, photomultiplier tubes, and camera tubes.()() Nevertheless, germanium, rubidium, selenium, silicon, tellurium, and several other elements can substitute caesium in photosensitive materials.(iodide (CsI), bromide (CsBr) and caesium fluoride (CsF) crystals are employed for scintillators in counters widely used in mineral exploration and particle physics research as they are well suited for the detection of gamma and x-ray radiation. Caesium, being a heavy element, provides good stopping power contributing to better detectivity. Caesium compounds may also provide a faster response (CsF) and be less hygroscopic (CsI).Caesium vapor is used in many common magnetometers.() The element is also used as an standard in spectrophotometry.() Like other metals, caesium has a great affinity for oxygen and is used as a getter in tubes.() Other uses of the metal include high-energy lasers, vapor glow lamps, and vapor rectifiers.(Centrifugation fluidsBecause of their high density, solutions of chloride (CsCl), sulfate (), and trifluoroacetate () are commonly used in molecular biology for density gradient ultracentrifugation.(Manfred Bick, Horst Prinz, Cesium and Cesium Compounds in Ullmanns Encyclopedia of Industrial Chemistry 2005, Wiley-VCH, Weinheim. .)  This technology is primarily applied to the isolation of viral particles, sub-cellular organelles and fractions, and acids from biological samples.()Chemical and medical useRelatively few chemical applications exist for caesium.()  Doping with caesium compounds is used to enhance the effectiveness of several metal-ion catalysts used in the production of chemicals, such as acid, anthraquinone, oxide, methanol, anhydride, styrene, methacrylate monomers, and various olefins. It is also used in the catalytic conversion of dioxide into trioxide in the production of acid. fluoride enjoys niche use in chemistry as a base,() or as an anhydrous source of fluoride ion.(Gregory K. Friestad, Bruce P. Branchaud, Walter Navarrini, Maurizio Sansotera Cesium Fluoride in Encyclopedia of Reagents for Organic Synthesis 2007, John Wiley & Sons. ) Caesium salts sometimes replace potassium or sodium salts in synthesis, such as cyclization, esterification, and polymerization.Nuclear and isotope applicationsCaesium-137 is a very common radioisotope used as a gamma-emitter in industrial applications. Its advantages include a half-life of roughly 30 years, its availability from the fuel cycle, and having 137Ba as stable end product. The high water solubility is a disadvantage which makes it incompatible with irradiation of food and medical supplies.() It has been used in agriculture, cancer treatment, and the sterilization of food, sewage sludge, and surgical equipment.(() Radioactive of caesium in radiation devices were used in the medical field to treat certain types of cancer,() but emergence of better alternatives and the use of water-soluble caesium chloride in the sources, which could create wide-ranging contamination, gradually put some of these caesium sources out of use.()() Caesium-137 has been employed in a variety of industrial measurement gauges, including moisture, density, leveling, and thickness gauges.() It has also been used in logging devices for measuring the density of the rock formations, which is analogous to the bulk density of the formations.()Isotope 137 has also been used in hydrologic studies analogous to those using tritium. It is a daughter product of nuclear fission reactions. With the commencement of nuclear testing around 1945, and continuing through the mid-1980s, caesium-137 was released into the atmosphere where it is absorbed readily into solution. Known year-to-year variation within that period allows correlation with soil and sediment layers. Caesium-134, and to a lesser extent caesium-135, have also been used in hydrology as a measure of caesium output by the nuclear power industry. While they are less prevalent than either caesium-133 or caesium-137, these isotopes have the advantage of being produced solely from anthropogenic sources.()Other usesCaesium and mercury were used as a propellant in early ion engines designed for propulsion on very long interplanetary or extraplanetary missions. The ionization method was to strip the outer electron from the propellant upon contact with a tungsten electrode that had voltage applied. Concerns about the corrosive action of caesium on spacecraft components have pushed development in the direction of use of inert gas propellants such as xenon; this is easier to handle in ground-based tests and has less potential to interfere with the spacecraft.( Eventually, xenon was used in the experimental spacecraft Space 1 launched in 1998.()() Nevertheless, field emission electric propulsion thrusters which use a simple system of accelerating liquid metal ions such as of caesium to create thrust have been built.()nitrate is used as an oxidizer and colorant to burn silicon in infrared flares() such as the LUU-19 flare,() because it emits much of its light in the near infrared spectrum.() Caesium has been used to reduce the radar signature of exhaust plumes in the Blackbird military aircraft.() Caesium, along with rubidium, has been added as a carbonate to glass because it reduces electrical conductivity and improves stability and durability of fiber optics and vision devices. Caesium fluoride or caesium aluminium fluoride are used in fluxes formulated for the brazing of aluminium alloys that contain magnesium.(PrognosticationsMagnetohydrodynamic (MHD) power-generating systems were researched but failed to gain widespread acceptance.() Caesium metal has also been considered as the working fluid in high-temperature cycle turboelectric generators.() Caesium salts have been evaluated as antishock reagents to be used following the administration of arsenical drugs. Because of their effect on heart rhythms, however, they are less likely to be used than potassium or rubidium salts. They have also been used to treat epilepsy.(Health and safety hazardsFile:Airdosechernobyl2.png|thumb|301px|altGraph of percentage of the radioactive output by each nuclide that form after a nuclear fallout vs logarithm of time after the incident. In curves of various colors, the predominant source of radiation are depicted in order: Te-132/I-132 for the first five or so days; I-131 for the next five; Ba-140/La-140 briefly; Zr-95/Nb-95 from day 10 until about day 200; and finally Cs-137. Other nuclides producing radioactivity, but not peaking as a major component are Ru, peaking at about 50 days, and Cs-134 at around 600 days.|The portion of the total radiation dose (in air) contributed by each isotope versus time after the disaster depicting caesium-137 becoming the largest source of radiation about 200 days after the accident.(Data from the OECD report  and The radiochemical Manual (2nd ed.) B.J. Wilson (1966).)Caesium compounds are rarely encountered by most people, but most caesium compounds are mildly toxic because of chemical similarity of caesium to potassium. Exposure to large amounts of caesium compounds can cause hyperirritability and spasms, but as such amounts would not ordinarily be encountered in natural sources, caesium is not a major chemical environmental pollutant.() The lethal dose (LD50) value for chloride in mice is 2.3 g per kilogram, which is comparable to the LD50 values of chloride and chloride.()Caesium metal is one of the most reactive elements and is highly explosive when it comes in contact with water. The hydrogen gas produced by the reaction is heated by the thermal energy released at the same time, causing ignition and a violent explosion. This can occur with other alkali metals, but caesium is so potent that this explosive reaction can even be triggered by cold water.( The metal is highly pyrophoric, and ignites spontaneously in air to form hydroxide and various oxides. Caesium hydroxide is a very strong base, and can rapidly corrode glass.()The isotopes 134 and 137 (present in the biosphere in small amounts from leaks) represent a radioactivity burden which varies depending on location. Radiocaesium does not accumulate in the body as effectively as many other fission products (such as radioiodine and radiostrontium). As with other alkali metals, radiocaesium washes out of the body relatively quickly in sweat and urine. However, radiocaesium follows potassium and tends to accumulate in plant tissues, including fruits and vegetables.()()() It is also well-documented that mushrooms from contaminated forests accumulate radiocaesium (caesium-137) in their fungal sporocarps.(M Vinichuk, A F S Taylor, K Rosn, K J Johanson. Accumulation of potassium, rubidium and caesium ((133)Cs and (137)Cs) in various fractions of soil and fungi in a Swedish forest. Science of the total envrironment 03: 2010 DOI: 10.1016/j.scitotenv.2010.02.024) Accumulation of caesium-137 in lakes has been a high concern after the disaster.()() Experiments with dogs showed that a single dose of 3800 Ci (4.1 g of caesium-137) per kilogram is lethal within three weeks;() smaller amounts may cause infertility and cancer.() The Atomic Energy Agency and other sources have warned that radioactive materials, such as caesium-137, could be used in radiological dispersion devices, or bombs.()See also* accident, a major radioactive contamination incident involving a rod of caesium chloride* accident, a caesium-137 contamination accident* standard, primary frequency standard, which allows to produce one of the most accurate types of watches* Fluorine, the most electronegative element, oppositely to caesiumNotesReferencesExternal links** WebElements.com  Caesium* Humor site dedicated to caesiumaf:Sesiumar:an:Cesioaz:Seziumbn:be:bs:Cezijumbg:ca:Cesicv:cs:Cesiumco:Cesiucy:Cesiwmda:Csiumde:Caesiumet:Tseesiumel:es:Cesioeo:Cezioeu:Zesiofa:hif:Caesiumfr:Csiumfur:Cesiga:Caeisiamgv:Kaishumgl:Cesiohak:Setxal:ko:hy:hi:hr:Cezijio:Cesioid:Sesiumis:Sesn(elemento)he:kn:ka:kk:sw:Caesikv:ht:Sezymku:Sezymla:Caesiumlv:Czijslb:Csiumlt:Cezis(elemento)jbo:blasodnahu:Cziummk:ml:mr:ms:Sesiummy:mrj:nl:Cesiumja:no:Cesiumnn:Cesiumoc:Csipnb:nds:Csiumpl:Cezpt:Csioro:Cesiuqu:Sesyuru:sah:stq:Cesiumsq:Ceziumi(elementu)simple:Caesiumsk:Cziumsl:Cezijsr:sh:Cezijumfi:Cesiumsv:Cesiumtl:Sesyota:te:th:tr:Sezyumuk:ur:ug:vi:Xziwa:Ceziomwar:Cesyoyi:yo:Caesiumzh-yue:zh:
5910
Cyanide
Image:Cyanide-montage.png|thumb|right|150px|The cyanide ion, CN.From the top:1. Valence-bond structure2. model3. Electrostatic potential surface4. Carbon lone pair HOMO/LUMOA cyanide is a compound that contains the cyano group, -CN, which consists of a carbon atom triple-bonded to a nitrogen atom.(Gold Book cyanides) Cyanides most commonly refer to salts of the anion CN.(Greenwood, N. N.; & Earnshaw, A. (1997). Chemistry of the Elements (2nd Edn.), Oxford:Butterworth-Heinemann. ISBN 0-7506-3365-4.)(G. L. Miessler and D. A. Tarr Inorganic Chemistry 3rd Ed, Pearson/Prentice Hall publisher, ISBN 0-13-035471-6.) Most cyanides are highly toxic.() In chemistry compounds containing a -CN group are known as nitriles and compounds that contain the -NC group are known as isocyanides. Organic nitriles and isocyanides are far less toxic because they do not release cyanide ions easily.The dye blue had been first accidentally made, it is presumed around 1706, from substances containing iron and carbon and nitrogen, and the (then unknown) cyanide was formed during the manufacture of the dye. An iron-containing compound was found in Prussian blue and named ferrocyanide, meaning blue substance with iron, from Latin ferrum  iron and Greek kyanos  (dark) blue. When ferrocyanide was analyzed, removing the iron from the compound and from its name left cyanide.Nomenclature and etymologyIn IUPAC nomenclature, compounds that have a CN group are called nitriles. Thus, nitriles are organic compounds.(Gold Book nitriles)(NCBI-MeSH Nitriles)An example of a nitrile is CH3CN, acetonitrile, also known as methyl cyanide. In inorganic chemistry, salts containing the CN- ion are referred to as cyanides. Nitriles usually do not release cyanide ions.A functional group with a hydroxyl and cyanide bonded to the same carbon is called cyanohydrin, and cyanohydridins are hydrolyzed into cyanide and a carbonyl compound (ketone or aldehyde).The word cyanide was extracted from ferrocyanide, a cyanide derivative of iron. The name ferrocyanide was invented as meaning blue substance with iron, as ferrocyanides were first discovered as components of the intensely colored dye blue. Kyanos is Greek for (dark) blue.()OccurrenceCyanides are produced by certain bacteria, fungi, and algae and are found in a number of plants. Cyanides are found, although in small amounts, in certain seeds and fruit stones, e.g., those of apple, mango, peach, and almonds.() In plants, cyanides are usually bound to sugar molecules in the form of cyanogenic glycosides and defend the plant against herbivores. Cassava roots (also called manioc), an important potato-like food grown in tropical countries (and the base from which tapioca is made), also contain cyanogenic glycosides.()()The radical CN has been identified in interstellar space.()Hydrogen cyanide is produced by the combustion or pyrolysis of certain materials under oxygen-deficient conditions. For example, it can be detected in the exhaust of combustion engines and tobacco smoke. Certain plastics, especially those derived from acrylonitrile, release hydrogen cyanide when heated or burnt.()Coordination chemistryThe cyanide anion is a potent ligand for many transition metals.(Sharpe, A. G. The Chemistry of Cyano Complexes of the Transition Metals; Academic Press: London, 1976) The very high affinities of metals for this anion can be attributed to its negative charge, compactness, and ability to engage in -bonding. Well-known complexes include:*hexacyanides M(CN)63 (M  Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co), which are octahedral in shape;*the tetracyanides, M(CN)42 (M  Ni, Pd, Pt), which are square planar in their geometry;*the dicyanides M(CN)2 (M  Cu, Ag, Au), which are linear in geometry.The deep-blue pigment blue, used in the making of blueprints, is derived from iron cyanide complexes (hence the name cyanide, from cyan, a shade of blue). Prussian blue can produce hydrogen cyanide when exposed to strong acids.Certain enzymes, for example, the hydrogenases, contain cyanide ligands attached to iron in their active sites. The biosynthesis of cyanide in the NiFe-hydrogenases proceeds from carbamoylphosphate, which converts to cysteinyl thiocyanate, the CN donor.()Organic derivativesBecause of the cyanide anions high nucleophilicity, cyano groups are readily introduced into organic molecules by displacement of a halide group (e.g., the chloride on chloride).  In general, organic cyanides are called nitriles. Thus, CH3CN can be called methyl cyanide but more commonly is referred to as acetonitrile. In organic synthesis, cyanide is a C-1 synthon; i.e., it can be used to lengthen a carbon chain by one, while retaining the ability to be functionalized.:RX + CN  RCN + X (substitution) followed by# RCN + 2 H2O  RCOOH  +  NH3 (hydrolysis under reflux with mineral acid catalyst), or# 2 RCN + LiAlH4  + (second step) 4 H2O   2 RCH2NH2  +  LiAl(OH)4 (under reflux in dry ether, followed by addition of H2O) Manufacture The principal process used to manufacture cyanides is the process in which gaseous cyanide is produced from methane and ammonia in the presence of oxygen and a platinum catalyst.()():CH4  +  NH3  +  1.5 O2    HCN  +  3 H2OGaseous hydrogen cyanide may be dissolved in aqueous hydroxide solution to produce cyanide.ToxicityMany cyanides are highly toxic. The cyanide anion is an inhibitor of the enzyme c oxidase (also known as aa3) in the fourth complex of the transport chain (found in the membrane of the mitochondria of eukaryotic cells).  It attaches to the iron within this protein.  The binding of cyanide to this cytochrome prevents transport of electrons from c oxidase to oxygen. As a result, the electron transport chain is disrupted, meaning that the cell can no longer aerobically produce ATP for energy.  Tissues that depend highly on respiration, such as the nervous system and the heart, are particularly affected.The most hazardous compound is cyanide, which, because it is a gas at ambient temperatures and pressure, can be inhaled. A respirator must be worn when working with hydrogen cyanide. Hydrogen cyanide is produced when a solution containing a labile cyanide is acidified because HCN is a acid; alkaline solutions are safer to use because they do not evolve hydrogen cyanide. Hydrogen cyanide may be produced in the combustion of polyurethanes; for this reason, polyurethanes are not recommended for use in domestic and aircraft furniture. Oral ingestion of a small quantity  typically 200 mg  of solid cyanide or cyanide solution, and airborne exposure of 270 ppm may lead rapidly (within minutes) to death.(, Chapter 163, page 939)Organic nitriles, which do not readily release cyanide ions, have low toxicities. Compounds such as cyanide (CH3)3SiCN readily release HCN or the cyanide ion upon contact with water. AntidoteHydroxycobalamin reacts with cyanide to form cyanocobalamin, which can be eliminated by the kidneys. This method has the advantage of avoiding the formation of methemoglobin (see below). This antidote kit is sold under the brand name Cyanokit and was approved by the FDA in 2006.(http://emedicine.medscape.com/article/814287-treatment)An older cyanide antidote kit included administration of three substances: amyl nitrite pearls (inhalation) and sodium nitrite and sodium thiosulfate (infusion). The goal of the antidote is to generate a large pool of ferric iron to compete with cytochrome a3 (part of the electron transport chain necessary for cellular respiration/energy production) for cyanide. The nitrites oxidize hemoglobin to methemoglobin, which competes with cytochrome oxidase for the cyanide ion. Cyanmethemoglobin is formed and oxidase is restored. The major mechanism to remove the cyanide from the body is by enzymatic conversion by the mitochondrial enzyme rhodanese to convert cyanate to thiocyanate, which is a relatively non-toxic molecule that is excreted in the urine. To accelerate the detoxification, sodium thiosulfate is administered to provide a sulfur donor for rhodanese to produce thiocyanate.SensitivityMinimum risk levels (MRLs) may not protect for delayed health effects or health effects acquired following repeated sublethal exposure, such as hypersensitivity, asthma, or bronchitis. MRLs may be revised after sufficient data accumulates (Toxicological Profile for Cyanide, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, 2006).ApplicationsMiningCyanide is mainly produced for the mining of gold and silver: It helps dissolve these metals and their ores.  In the  process, finely ground high-grade ore is mixed with the cyanide (concentration of about two kilogram NaCN per tonne); low-grade ores are stacked into heaps and sprayed with a cyanide solution (concentration of about one kilogram NaCN per ton). The precious metals are complexed by the cyanide anions to form soluble derivatives, e.g., Au(CN)2 and Ag(CN)2.(Andreas Rubo, Raf Kellens, Jay Reddy, Norbert Steier, Wolfgang Hasenpusch Alkali Metal Cyanides in Ullmanns Encyclopedia of Industrial Chemistry 2006 Wiley-VCH, Weinheim, Germany.ISBN 10.1002/14356007.i01 i01)::2 Au  +  4 NaCN  +   O2  +  H2O  2 NaAu(CN)2  +  2 NaOHSilver is less noble than gold and often occurs as the sulfide, in which case redox is not invoked (no O2 is required). Instead, a displacement reaction occurs:::Ag2S  +  4 NaCN  +  H2O     2 NaAg(CN)2  +  NaSH  +  NaOHThe pregnant liquor containing these ions is separated from the solids, which are discarded to a tailing pond or spent heap, the recoverable gold having been removed.  The metal is recovered from the pregnant solution by reduction with zinc dust or by adsorption onto carbon. This process can result in environmental and health problems.  Aqueous cyanide is hydrolyzed rapidly, especially in sunlight.  It can mobilize some heavy metals such as mercury if present.  Gold can also be associated with arsenopyrite (FeAsS), which is similar to pyrite (fools gold), wherein half of the sulfur atoms are replaced by arsenic. Gold-containing arsenopyrite ores are similarly reactive toward inorganic cyanide.Cyanide is also used in electroplating, where it stabilizes metal ions in the electrolyte solution prior to their deposition.Industrial organic chemistrySome nitriles are produced on a large scale, e.g., adiponitrile is a precursor to nylon. Such compounds are often generated by combining hydrogen cyanide and alkenes, i.e., hydrocyanation:RCHCH2  +  HCN      RCH(CN)CH3. Metal catalysts are required for such reactions.Medical usesThe cyanide compound nitroprusside is used mainly in chemistry to measure urine bodies mainly as a follow-up to diabetic patients. On occasion, it is used in emergency medical situations to produce a rapid decrease in pressure in humans; it is also used as a vasodilator in vascular research. The cobalt in artificial vitamin B12 contains a cyanide ligand as an artifact of the purification process; this must be removed by the body before the vitamin molecule can be activated for biochemical use. During War I, a copper cyanide compound was briefly used by Japanese physicians for the treatment of tuberculosis and leprosy.()FishingCyanides are illegally used to capture live fish near reefs for the aquarium and seafood markets.  The practice is controversial, dangerous, and damaging but is driven by the lucrative exotic fish market.Pest controlCyanide is for pest control in Zealand particularly for possums, an introduced mammal that threatens the conservation of native species and spreads Tb amongst cattle. Possums can become bait shy but the use of pellets containing the cyanide reduces bait shyness. Cyanide has been known to kill native birds, including the endangered kiwi.() Cyanide is also effective for controlling the Wallaby, another introduced animal pest in New Zealand.() A licence is required to store, handle and use cyanide in New Zealand.Niche usesferrocyanide is used to achieve a blue color on cast sculptures during the final finishing stage of the sculpture. On its own, it will produce a very dark shade of blue and is often mixed with other chemicals to achieve the desired tint and hue.  It is applied using a torch and paint brush while wearing the standard safety equipment used for any patina application: rubber gloves, safety glasses, and a respirator. The actual amount of cyanide in the mixture varies according to the recipes used by each foundry.Cyanide is also used in jewelry-making and certain kinds of photography.Cyanides are used as insecticides for fumigating ships. Cyanide salts are used for killing ants, and have in some places been used as rat poison (the less toxic poison arsenic is more common).Although usually thought to be toxic, cyanide and cyanohydrins have been demonstrated to increase germination in various plant species.()()Human poisoningDeliberate poisoning of humans has occurred many times throughout history.(, Extract p. 41) For notable cyanide deaths, see Cyanide poisoning: Historical cases. Most significantly, hydrogen cyanide released from pellets of Zyklon-B was used extensively in the systematic mass murders of the Holocaust, especially in extermination camps. Poisoning by hydrogen cyanide gas within a chamber (as a salt of hydrocyanic acid is dropped into a strong acid, usually sulfuric acid) is one method of executing a condemned prisoner as the condemned prisoner eventually breathes the lethal fumes.Food additiveDue to the high stability of their complexation with iron, ferrocyanides (ferrocyanide E535, ferrocyanide E536, and Calcium ferrocyanide E538(, Extract of page 459)) do not decompose to lethal levels in the human body and are used in the food industry as, e.g., an agent in salt.(, Extract of page 67)Chemical tests for cyanidePrussian bluesulfate is added to a solution suspected of containing cyanide, such as the filtrate from the fusion test. The resulting mixture is acidified with acid. The formation of blue is a positive result for cyanide.para-Benzoquinone in DMSOA solution of para-benzoquinone in DMSO reacts with inorganic cyanide to form  a cyanophenol, which is fluorescent. Illumination with a light gives a green/blue glow if the test is positive.()Copper and an aromatic amineAs used by fumigators to detect cyanide, copper(II) salt and an aromatic amine such as benzidine is added to the sample; as an alternative to benzidine an alternative amine di-(4,4-bis-dimethylaminophenyl) methane can be used. A positive test gives a blue color.  cyanide is poorly soluble. By sequestering the copper(I) the copper(II) is rendered a stronger oxidant. The copper, in a cyanide facilitated oxidation, converts the amine into a colored compound. The equation explains this process. Another good example of such chemistry is the way in which the saturated calomel electrode (SCE) works. The copper, in a cyanide-facilitated oxidation, converts the amine into a colored compound.Pyridine-barbituric acid colorimetryA sample containing inorganic cyanide is purged with air from a boiling acid solution into a basic absorber solution. The cyanide salt absorbed in the basic solution is buffered at pH 4.5 and then reacted with chlorine to form cyanogen chloride. The cyanogen chloride formed couples pyridine with barbituric acid to form a strongly colored red dye that is proportional to the cyanide concentration. This colorimetric method following distillation is the basis for most regulatory methods (for instance EPA 335.4) used to analyze cyanide in water, wastewater, and contaminated soils. Distillation followed by colorimetric methods, however, have been found to be prone to interferences from thiocyanate, nitrate, thiosulfate, sulfite, and sulfide that can result in both positive and negative bias. It has been recommended by the USEPA (MUR March 12, 2007) that samples containing these compounds be analyzed by Gas-Diffusion Flow Injection Analysis  Amperometry.Gas diffusion flow injection analysis  amperometryInstead of distilling, the sample is injected into an acidic stream where the HCN formed is passed under a hydrophobic gas diffusion membrane that selectively allows only HCN to pass through. The HCN that passes through the membrane is absorbed into a basic carrier solution that transports the CN to an amperometric detector that accurately measures cyanide concentration with high sensitivity. Sample pretreatment determined by acid reagents, ligands, or preliminary UV irradiation allow cyanide speciation of free cyanide, available cyanide, and total cyanide respectively. These relative simplicity of these flow injection analysis methods limit the interference experienced by the high heat of distillation and also prove to be cost effective since time consuming distillations are not required.See also*CyanogenReferencesExternal links* ATSDR medical management guidelines for cyanide poisoning (US)* HSE recommendations for first aid treatment of cyanide poisoning (UK)* Hydrogen cyanide and cyanides (CICAD 61)* IPCS/CEC Evaluation of antidotes for poisoning by cyanides* National Pollutant Inventory  Cyanide compounds fact sheet* Eating apple seeds is safe despite the small amount of cyanide* Toxicological Profile for Cyanide, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, July 2006Safety data (French):*Institut national de recherche et de scurit (1997). Cyanure dhydrogne et solutions aqueuses. Fiche toxicologique n 4, Paris:INRS, 5pp. (PDF file, in French)*Institut national de recherche et de scurit (1997). Cyanure de sodium. Cyanure de potassium. Fiche toxicologique n 111, Paris:INRS, 6pp. (PDF file, in French)ar:bg:ca:Cianurda:Cyanidde:Cyanidees:Cianuroeo:Cianidofa:fr:Cyanurega:Ciaindko:id:Sianidait:Cianurohe:la:Cyanidumlv:Ciandilt:Cianidashu:Cinnl:Cyanideja:no:Cyanidpl:Cyjankipt:Cianetoro:Cianurru:sq:Cianurisimple:Cyanidesr:su:Sianidafi:Syanidisv:Cyaniderth:tr:Siyanruk:vi:Xyanuazh-yue:zh:
5959
Canadian_Pacific_Railway
 metric1Image:Eastbound over SCB.jpg|thumb|290px|right|An eastbound CPR freight at Creek Bridge in Pass. Photo by David R. Spencer. The Canadian Pacific Railway (CPR), formerly also known as CP Rail  between 1968 and 1996, is a historic Canadian Class I railway founded in 1881 and now operated by Pacific Railway Limited, which began operations as legal owner in a corporate restructuring in 2001. Its rail network serves major cities in the States, such as Minneapolis, Chicago, and York City. Its headquarters is in Calgary, Alberta. It owns approximately  route miles of track all across Canada and into the United States,() stretching from Montreal to Vancouver, as far north as Edmonton.The company acquired two American lines in 2009: the Minnesota and Eastern Railroad and the Chicago and Eastern Railroad. The trackage of the ICE was at one time part of CP subsidiary Soo Line and predecessor line Milwaukee Road. The combined DME/ICE system spanned Dakota, Dakota, Nebraska, Wisconsin and Iowa, as well as two short stretches into two other states, which included a line to City, Missouri, and a line to Illinois, and regulatory approval to build a line into the River Basin of Wyoming.The railway was originally built between eastern Canada and Columbia between 1881 and 1885, (connecting with Valley and Bay area lines built earlier), fulfilling a promise extended to British Columbia when it entered Confederation in 1871. It was Canadas first transcontinental railway, but currently does not reach the Atlantic coast. Primarily a freight railway, the CPR was for decades the only practical means of long-distance passenger transport in most regions of Canada, and was instrumental in the settlement and development of Canada. The CP became one of the largest and most powerful companies in Canada, a position it held as late as 1975.() Its primary passenger services were eliminated in 1986, after being assumed by Via Rail Canada in 1978. A beaver was chosen as the railways logo because it is one of the national symbols of Canada and represents the hardworking character of the company. The object of both praise and condemnation for over 120 years, the CPR remains an indisputable icon of nationalism.The Canadian Pacific Railway is a public company with over 15,000 employees and market capitalization of US $7 billion in 2008.()  It is publicly traded on both the Toronto Stock Exchange and the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker CP.HistoryCreation of the Canadian Pacific Railway was a task originally undertaken for a combination of reasons by the Conservative government of Prime Minister Sir John A. Macdonald. Columbia had insisted upon a transport link to the east as a condition for joining the Confederation of Canada (initially requesting a wagon road). The government however, proposed to build a railway linking the Pacific province to the eastern provinces within 10 years of July 20, 1871. Macdonald also saw it as essential to the creation of a unified Canadian nation that would stretch across the continent. Moreover, manufacturing interests in Quebec and Ontario desired access to sources of materials and markets in Canadas west.Image:JaMAC.jpg|thumb|150px|left|John A. Macdonald.The first obstacle to its construction was economic. The logical route went through the American Midwest and the city of Chicago, Illinois. In addition to this was the difficulty of building a railroad through the Rockies, an entirely Canadian route would require crossing  of rugged terrain of the barren Shield and muskeg of Ontario. To ensure this routing, the government offered huge incentives including vast grants of land in Western Canada.In 1872, Sir John A. Macdonald and other high-ranking politicians, bribed in the Scandal, granted federal contracts to Allans Canada Pacific Railway Company (which was unrelated to the current company) and to the Inter-Ocean Railway Company. Because of this scandal, the Conservative party was removed from office in 1873. The new Liberal prime minister, Mackenzie, began construction of segments of the railway as a public enterprise under the supervision of the Department of Public Works. The Thunder Bay branch linking Superior to Winnipeg, was commenced in 1875. Progress was discouragingly slow because of the lack of public money. With Sir John A. Macdonalds return to power on October 16, 1878, a more aggressive construction policy was adopted. Macdonald confirmed that Port Moody would be the terminus of the transcontinental railway, and announced that the railway would follow the Fraser and Thompson rivers between Port Moody and Kamloops. In 1879, the federal government floated bonds in London and called for tenders to construct the  section of the railway from British Columbia, to Savonas Ferry, on Lake. The contract was awarded to Onderdonk, whose men started work on May 15, 1880. After the completion of that section, Onderdonk received contracts to build between Yale and Port Moody, and between Savonas Ferry and Eagle Pass.On October 21, 1880, a new syndicate, unrelated to Hugh Allans, signed a contract with the Macdonald government. They agreed to build the railway in exchange for $25 million (approximately $625 million in modern Canadian dollars) in credit from the Canadian government and a grant of 25 million acres (100,000 km2) of land. The government transferred to the new company those sections of the railway it had constructed under government ownership. The government also defrayed surveying costs and exempted the railway from property taxes for 20 years. The Montreal-based syndicate officially comprised five men: George Stephen, J. Hill, Duncan McIntyre, B. Angus and Stewart Kennedy. Donald A. Smith and Kittson were unofficial silent partners with a significant financial interest. On February 15, 1881, legislation confirming the contract received assent, and the Canadian Pacific Railway Company was formally incorporated the next day.Building the railway, 18811885The Canadian Pacific Railway began its westward expansion from Ontario (previously called Callander Station) where the first spike was driven into a sunken railway tie. Bonfield was inducted into Canadian Railway Hall of Fame in 2002 as the CPR First Spike location. That was the point where the Canada Central Railway extension ended. The CCR was owned by Duncan McIntyre who amalgamated it with the CPR and became one of the handful of officers of the newly formed CPR. The CCR started in Brockville and extended to Pembroke. It then followed a westward route along the Ottawa River passing through places like Cobden, Deux-Rivires, and eventually to Mattawa at the confluence of the Mattawa and Ottawa Rivers. It then proceeded cross-country towards its final destination Bonfield (previously called Callander Station). Duncan McIntyre and his contractor James Worthington piloted the CPR expansion. Worthington continued on as the construction superintendent for the CPR past Bonfield. He remained with the CPR for about a year until he left the company. McIntyre was uncle to John Ferguson who staked out future North Bay after getting assurance from his uncle and Worthington that it would be the divisional and a location of some importance.Pacific Railway Survey Engineers, 1872.jpg|left|thumb|200px|Unidentified engineers of the Canadian Pacific Railway Survey, 1872.It was assumed that the railway would travel through the rich Fertile Belt of the Saskatchewan River valley and cross the Mountains via the Pass, a route suggested by Sandford Fleming based on a decade of work. However, the CPR quickly discarded this plan in favour of a more southerly route across the arid Triangle in Saskatchewan and via Horse Pass and down the Hill to the Mountain Trench. This route was more direct and closer to the American border, making it easier for the CPR to keep American railways from encroaching on the Canadian market. However, this route also had several disadvantages.One consequence was that the CPR would need to find a route through the Mountains, as at the time it was not known whether a route even existed. The job of finding a pass was assigned to a surveyor named Major Bowman Rogers. The CPR promised him a cheque for $5,000 and that the pass would be named in his honour. Rogers became obsessed with finding the pass that would immortalize his name. He discovered the pass in April 1881,(Martin J, Edward. The Railway Stations of Western Canada. Canada: Studio E. 1980.)() and true to its word, the CPR named the pass Pass and gave him the cheque. This however, he at first refused to cash, preferring to frame it, and saying he did not do it for the money. He later agreed to cash it with the promise of an engraved watch.Another obstacle was that the proposed route crossed land was controlled by the Blackfoot Nation. This difficulty was overcome when a missionary priest, Lacombe, persuaded the Blackfoot chief Crowfoot that construction of the railway was inevitable. In return for his assent, Crowfoot was famously rewarded with a lifetime pass to ride the CPR. A more lasting consequence of the choice of route was that, unlike the one proposed by Fleming, the land surrounding the railway often proved too arid for successful agriculture. The CPR may have placed too much reliance on a report from naturalist Macoun, who had crossed the prairies at a time of very high rainfall and had reported that the area was fertile.The greatest disadvantage of the route was in Kicking Horse Pass. In the first  west of the 1,625 metre (5,330 ft) high summit, the Horse River drops 350 metres (1,150 ft). The steep drop would force the cash-strapped CPR to build a  long stretch of track with a very steep 4.5 percent gradient once it reached the pass in 1884. This was over four times the maximum gradient recommended for railways of this era, and even modern railways rarely exceed a 2 percent gradient. However, this route was far more direct than one through the Pass and saved hours for both passengers and freight. This section of track was the CPRs Hill. Safety switches were installed at several points, the speed limit for descending trains was set at 10 km per hour (6 mph), and special locomotives were ordered. Despite these measures, several serious runaways still occurred including the first locomotive to descend the line. CPR officials insisted that this was a temporary expediency, but this state of affairs would last for 25 years until the completion of the Spiral Tunnels in the early 20th century.thumb|150px|right|Sir William Cornelius Van Horne.In 1881 construction progressed at a pace too slow for the railways officials, who in 1882 hired the renowned railway executive Cornelius Van Horne, to oversee construction with the inducement of a generous salary and the intriguing challenge of handling such a difficult railway project. Van Horne stated that he would have  of main line built in 1882. Floods delayed the start of the construction season, but over  of main line, as well as various sidings and branch lines, were built that year. The Thunder Bay branch (west from Fort William) was completed in June 1882 by the Department of Railways and Canals and turned over to the company in May 1883, permitting all-Canadian lake and rail traffic from eastern Canada to Winnipeg, for the first time in Canadas history. By the end of 1883, the railway had reached the Rocky Mountains, just eight km (5 miles) east of Kicking Horse Pass. The construction seasons of 1884 and 1885 would be spent in the mountains of British Columbia and on the north shore of Superior.Many thousands of navvies worked on the railway. Many were European immigrants. In British Columbia, the CPR hired workers from China, called coolies. A navvy received between $1 and $2.50 per day, but had to pay for his own food, clothing, transportation to the job site, mail and medical care. After 2-1/2 months of back-breaking labour, they could net as little as $16. Chinese coolies in British Columbia made only between 75 cents and $1.25 a day, paid in mats, and not including expenses, leaving barely anything to send home. They did the most dangerous construction jobs, such as working with explosives to clear tunnels through rock.(http://www.collectionscanada.gc.ca/settlement/kids/021013-2031.3-e.html) The families of the Chinese who were killed received no compensation, or even notification of loss of life. Many of the men who survived did not have enough money to return to their families in China, although Chinese labour contractors had promised that as part of their responsibilities.(Beyond the Sterile Mountains: the Chinese in British Columbia, Joseph Morton, 1976) Many spent years in lonely, sad and often poor conditions. Yet the Chinese were hard working and played a key role in building the western stretch of the railway; even some boys as young as 12 years old served as tea-boys. In 2006 the Canadian government issued a formal apology to the Chinese population in Canada for their treatment both during and following the construction of the CPR.(June 2006, Prime Minister Harpers speech to the Canadian Parliament)By 1883, railway construction was progressing rapidly, but the CPR was in danger of running out of funds. In response, on January 31, 1884, the government passed the Railway Relief Bill, providing a further $22.5 million in loans to the CPR. The bill received royal assent on March 6, 1884.Image:LastSpike Craigellachie BC Canada.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Donald Smith, later known as Lord Strathcona, drives the last spike of the Canadian Pacific Railway, at Craigellachie, November 7, 1885. Completion of the railroad was a condition of BCs entry into Confederation.In March 1885, the Rebellion broke out in the of Saskatchewan. Van Horne, in Ottawa at the time, suggested to the government that the CPR could transport troops to QuAppelle, Assiniboia, in 10 days. Some sections of track were incomplete or had not been used before, but the trip to Winnipeg was made in nine days and the rebellion was quickly put down. Perhaps because the government was grateful for this service, they subsequently re-organized the CPRs debt and provided a further $5 million loan. This money was desperately needed by the CPR. On November 7, 1885, the Last Spike was driven at British Columbia, making good on the original promise. Four days earlier, the last spike of the Lake Superior section was driven in just west of Ontario. While the railway was completed four years after the original 1881 deadline, it was completed more than five years ahead of the new date of 1891 that Macdonald gave in 1881.The successful construction of such a massive project, although troubled by delays and scandal, was considered an impressive feat of engineering and political will for a country with such a small population, limited capital, and difficult terrain. It was by far the longest railway ever constructed at the time. It had taken 12,000 men, 5,000 horses and 300 dog-sled teams to build the railway.Meanwhile, in Eastern Canada, the CPR had created a network of lines reaching from City to Thomas, Ontario by 1885, and had launched a fleet of Great Lakes ships to link its terminals. The CPR had effected purchases and long-term leases of several railways through an associated railway company, the and Quebec Railway (O&Q). The O&Q built a line between Ontario, and Toronto (completed on May 5, 1884) to connect these acquisitions. The CPR obtained a 999-year lease on the O&Q on January 4, 1884. Later, in 1895, it acquired a minority interest in the Hamilton and Buffalo Railway, giving it a link to New York and the northeast United States.18861900So many cost-cutting shortcuts were taken in constructing the railway that regular transcontinental service could not start for another seven months while work was done to improve the railways condition (part of this was due to snow in the mountains and lack of snowsheds to keep the line open). However, had these shortcuts not been taken, it is conceivable that the CPR might have had to default financially, leaving the railway unfinished. The first transcontinental passenger train departed from Montreals Dalhousie Station, located at Berri Street and Notre Dame Street at 8 p.m. on June 28, 1886, and arrived at Moody at noon on July 4, 1886. This train consisted of two baggage cars, a mail car, one second-class coach, two immigrant sleepers, two first-class coaches, two sleeping cars and a diner (several dining cars were used throughout the journey, as they were removed from the train during the night, and another one was picked in the morning).thumb|300px|left|First Transcontinental Train arrives in Port Arthur on June 30, 1886By that time, however, the CPR had decided to move its western terminus from Moody to Gastown, which was renamed Vancouver later that year. The first official train destined for Vancouver arrived on May 23, 1887, although the line had already been in use for three months. The CPR quickly became profitable, and all loans from the Federal government were repaid years ahead of time.In 1888, a branch line was opened between Sudbury and Sault Ste. Marie where the CPR connected with the American railway system and its own steamships. That same year, work was started on a line from Ontario, to the American border at Ontario. That line opened on June 12, 1890.The CPR also leased the Brunswick Railway in 1890 for 990 years,(Canadian Pacific Ltd. v. Paul, 1988 2 S.C.R. 654 (December 15, 1988) . Retrieved October 19, 2009.) and built the Railway of Maine, connecting Montreal with John, New Brunswick, in 1889. The connection with Saint John on the Atlantic coast made the CPR the first truly transcontinental railway company in Canada and permitted trans-Atlantic cargo and passenger services to continue year-round when ice in the of St. Lawrence closed the port of Montreal during the winter months.By 1896, competition with the Great Northern Railway for traffic in southern British Columbia forced the CPR to construct a second line across the province, south of the original line. Van Horne, now president of the CPR, asked for government aid, and the government agreed to provide around $3.6 million to construct a railway from Lethbridge, Alberta, through Pass to the south shore of Lake, in exchange for the CPR agreeing to reduce freight rates in perpetuity for key commodities shipped in Western Canada. The controversial Crowsnest Pass Agreement effectively locked the eastbound rate on grain products and westbound rates on certain settlers effects at the 1897 level. Although temporarily suspended during War I, it was not until 1983 that the Rate was permanently replaced by the Western Grain Transportation Act which allowed for the gradual increase of grain shipping prices. The Crowsnest Pass line opened on June 18, 1899, and followed a complicated route through the maze of valleys and passes in southern British Columbia, rejoining the original mainline at Hope after crossing the Mountains via Pass.The Southern Mainline, generally known as the Valley Railway in British Columbia, was built in response to the booming mining and smelting economy in southern British Columbia, and the tendency of the local geography to encourage and enable easier access from neighbouring US states than from Vancouver or the rest of Canada, which was viewed to be as much of a threat to national security as it was to the provinces control of its own resources. The main cross-country passenger service was re-routed to this new southerly line, which connected numerous emergent small cities across the region. Independent railways and subsidiaries that were eventually merged into the CPR in connection with this route were the and Okanagan Railway, the and Slocan Railway, the and Kootenay Railway, the and Western Railway and various others.The CPR and the settlement of Western Canadathumb|One of the CPRs land offerings.Practically speaking, the CPR had built a railway that operated mostly in the wilderness. The usefulness of the Prairies was questionable in the minds of many. The thinking prevailed that the Prairies had great potential. Under the initial contract with the Canadian Government to build the railway, the CPR was granted 25 million acres (100,000 km2). Proving already to be a very resourceful organization, Canadian Pacific began an intense campaign to bring immigrants to Canada.Canadian Pacific agents operated in many overseas locations. Immigrants were often sold a package that included passage on a CP ship, travel on a CP train, and land sold by the CP railway. Land was priced at $2.50 an acre and up. Immigrants paid very little for a seven-day journey to the West. They rode in Colonist cars that had sleeping facilities and a small kitchen at one end of the car. Children were not allowed off the train, lest they wander off and be left behind. The directors of the CPR knew that not only were they creating a nation, but also a long-term source of revenue for their company.19011928During the first decade of the 20th century, the CPR continued to build more lines. In 1908 the CPR opened a line connecting Toronto with Sudbury. Previously, westbound traffic originating in Ontario took a circuitous route through Ontario.Several operational improvements were also made to the railway in Canada. In 1909 the CPR completed two significant engineering accomplishments. The most significant was the replacement of the Big Hill, which had become a major bottleneck in the CPRs main line, with the Spiral Tunnels, reducing the grade to 2.2 percent from 4.5 percent. The Spiral Tunnels opened in August. On November 3, 1909, the Viaduct over the River valley at Lethbridge, Alberta, was opened. It is 1,624 metres (5,327 ft) long and, at its maximum, 96 metres (314 ft) high, making it the longest railway bridge in Canada. In 1916 the CPR replaced its line through Pass, which was prone to avalanches (the most serious of which killed 62 men in 1910) with the Tunnel, an eight km (5 mile) long tunnel under Macdonald that was, at the time of its opening, the longest railway tunnel in the Hemisphere.The CPR acquired several smaller railways via long-term leases in 1912. On January 3, 1912, the CPR acquired the Atlantic Railway, a railway that ran in western Scotia. This acquisition gave the CPR a connection to Halifax, a significant port on the Ocean. The Dominion Atlantic was isolated from the rest of the CPR network and used the CNR to facilitate interchange; the DAR also operated ferry services across the of Fundy for passengers and cargo (but not rail cars) from the port of Nova Scotia, to the CPR at John, New Brunswick. DAR steamships also provided connections for passengers and cargo between Yarmouth, Boston and New York.On July 1, 1912, the CPR acquired the and Nanaimo Railway, a railway on Island that connected to the CPR using a railcar ferry. The CPR also acquired the Central Railway on December 14, 1912.During the late 19th century, the railway undertook an ambitious program of hotel construction, building the Frontenac in City, the Royal York Hotel in Toronto, the Springs Hotel, and several other major Canadian landmarks. By then, the CPR had competition from three other transcontinental lines, all of them money-losers. In 1919, these lines were consolidated, along with the track of the old Railway and its spurs, into the government-owned National Railways.The CPR suffered its greatest loss of life when one of its steamships, the Empress of Ireland, sank after a collision with the Norwegian collier Storstad. On 29 May 1914, the Empress (operated by the CPRs Canadian Pacific Steamship Company, went down in the Lawrence River on 29 May 1914 with the loss of 1,024 lives, of which 840 were passengers.When War I broke out in 1914, the CPR devoted resources to the war effort, and managed to stay profitable while its competitors struggled to remain solvent. After the war, the Federal government created National Railways (CNR, later CN) out of several bankrupt railways that fell into government hands during and after the war. CNR would become the main competitor to the CPR in Canada.The Great Depression and World War II, 19291945Image:Kamloops on to Ottawa.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Strikers from unemployment relief camps climbing on boxcars as part of the Trek, 1935.The Depression, which lasted from 1929 until 1939, hit many companies heavily. While the CPR was affected, it was not affected to the extent of its rival CNR because it, unlike the CNR, was debt-free. The CPR scaled back on some of its passenger and freight services, and stopped issuing dividends to its shareholders after 1932.Hard times led to the creation of new political parties such as the Social Credit movement and the Commonwealth Federation, as well as popular protest in the form of the Trek.()One highlight of the 1930s, both for the railway and for Canada, was the visit of King George VI and Queen Elizabeth during their royal tour of Canada, the first time that the reigning monarch had visited the country. The CPR and the CNR shared the honours of pulling the royal train across the country, with the CPR undertaking the westbound journey from Quebec City to Vancouver.Later that year, War II began. As it had done in War I, the CPR devoted much of its resources to the war effort. It retooled its Shops in Montreal to produce tanks, and transported troops and resources across the country. As well, 22 of the CPRs ships went to war, 12 of which were sunk.19461978Image:CP-Rail-logo.png|thumb|170px|right|The logo used from 1971 to 1994 when it fell out of use. Often referred to as the Pac-Man logo named after the popular 80s video game of the same name.After World War II, the transportation industry in Canada changed. Where railways had previously provided almost universal freight and passenger services, cars, trucks, and airplanes started to take traffic away from railways. This naturally helped the CPRs air and trucking operations, and the railways freight operations continued to thrive hauling resource traffic and bulk commodities. However, passenger trains quickly became unprofitable.During the 1950s, the railway introduced new innovations in passenger service, and in 1955 introduced Canadian, a new luxury transcontinental train. However, starting in the 1960s the company started to pull out of passenger services, ending services on many of its branch lines. It also discontinued its secondary transcontinental train The Dominion in 1966, and in 1970 unsuccessfully applied to discontinue The Canadian. For the next eight years, it continued to apply to discontinue the service, and service on The Canadian declined markedly. On October 29, 1978, CP Rail transferred its passenger services to Rail, a new federal corporation that is responsible for managing all intercity passenger service formerly handled by both CP Rail and CN. Via eventually took almost all of its passenger trains, including The Canadian, off CPs lines.In 1968, as part of a corporate re-organization, each of the CPRs major operations, including its rail operations, were organized as separate subsidiaries. The name of the railway was changed to CP Rail, and the parent company changed its name to Pacific Limited in 1971. Its express, telecommunications, hotel and real estate holdings were spun off, and ownership of all of the companies transferred to Canadian Pacific Investments. The company discarded its beaver logo, adopting the new Multimark logo that could be used for each of its operations.1979presentIn 1984 CP Rail commenced construction of the Macdonald Tunnel to augment the Tunnel under the Mountains. The first revenue train passed through the tunnel in 1988. At 14.7 km (nine miles), it is the longest tunnel in the Americas.Image:EMD SD60 SOO 6022.jpg|thumb|200px|Soo Line 6022, an EMD SD 60, pulls a train through Dells, Wisconsin, June 20, 2004.During the 1980s, the Line Railroad, in which CP Rail still owned a controlling interest, underwent several changes. It acquired the Northfield and Southern Railway in 1982. Then on February 21, 1985, the Soo Line obtained a controlling interest in the Road, merging it into its system on January 1, 1986. Also in 1980 Canadian Pacific bought out the controlling interests of the Hamilton and Buffalo Railway (TH&B) from Conrail and molded it into the Canadian Pacific System, dissolving the TH&Bs name from the books in 1985. In 1987 most of CPRs trackage in the Lakes region, including much of the original Soo Line, were spun off into a new railway, the Wisconsin Central, which was subsequently purchased by CN. Influenced by the Free Trade Agreement of 1989 which liberalized trade between the two nations, the CPRs expansion continued during the early 1990s: CP Rail gained full control of the Soo Line in 1990, and bought the and Hudson Railway in 1991. These two acquisitions gave CP Rail routes to the major American cities of Chicago (via the Soo Line) and New York City (via the D&H).During the next few years CP Rail downsized its route, and several Canadian lines and even some secondary mainlines were either sold to short lines or abandoned. This rationalization, however, came at a price, as many grain elevators in the region known as Canadas Breadbasket shut down due to not being able to distribute their thousands of bushels of grain through a large enough region. This included all of its lines east of Montreal, with the routes operating across Maine and New Brunswick to the port of Saint John (operating as the Atlantic Railway) being sold or abandoned, severing CPRs transcontinental status (in Canada); the opening of the Lawrence Seaway in the late 1950s, coupled with subsidized icebreaking services, made Saint John surplus to CPRs requirements. During the 1990s, both CP Rail and CN attempted unsuccessfully to buy out the eastern assets of the other, so as to permit further rationalization. As well, it closed divisional and regional offices, drastically reduced white collar staff, and consolidated its Canadian traffic control system in Calgary, Alberta.Image:CP RAIL TBAY.JPG|thumb|left|200px|CP Rail SD90MAC locomotive in Bay, Ontario.Finally, in 1996, reflecting the increased importance of western traffic to the railway, CP Rail moved its head office to Calgary from Montreal and changed its name back to Canadian Pacific Railway. A new subsidiary company, the Lawrence and Hudson Railway, was created to operate its money-losing lines in eastern North America, covering Quebec, Southern and Ontario, trackage rights to Chicago, Illinois, as well as the and Hudson Railway in the Northeast. However, the new subsidiary, threatened with being sold off and free to innovate, quickly spun off losing track to short lines, instituted scheduled freight service, and produced an unexpected turn-around in profitability. After only four years, CPR revised its opinion and the StL&H formally re-amalgamated with its parent on January 1, 2001.In 2001, the CPRs parent company, Pacific Limited, spun off its five subsidiaries, including the CPR, into independent companies. Canadian Pacific Railway formally (but, not legally) shortened its name to Canadian Pacific in early 2007, dropping the word railway in order to reflect more operational flexibility. Shortly after the name revision, Canadian Pacific announced that it had committed to becoming a major sponsor and logistics provider to the 2010 Olympic Winter Games in Vancouver, British Columbia.On September 4, 2007, CPR announced it was acquiring the Minnesota and Eastern Railroad from its present owners, London-based Private Equity.() The transaction is an end-to-end consolidation,(() and will give CPR access to U.S. shippers of agricultural products, ethanol, and coal. CPR has stated its intention to use this purchase to gain access to the rich coal fields of Wyomings River Basin. The purchase price is US$1.48 billion, and future payments of over US$1 billion contingent on commencement of construction on the smaller railroads Powder River extension and specified volumes of coal shipments from the Powder River basin.( The transaction was subject to approval of the U.S. Transportation Board (STB), which was expected to take a year.() On October 4, 2007, CPR announced it has completed the financial transactions required for the acquisition, placing the DM&E and IC&E in a voting trust with Hamlin appointed as the trustee. CPR planned to integrate the railroads operations once the STB approves the acquisition.() The merger was completed as of October 31, 2008.( )Freight trainsImage:Carlb-brockville-cptrain.jpg|thumb|right|200px|CPR caboose on display at Ontario.Over half of CPs freight traffic is in coal, grain, and intermodal freight, and the vast majority of its profits are made in western Canada. A major shift in trade from the Atlantic to the Pacific has caused serious drops in CPRs wheat shipments through Bay. It also ships automotive parts and assembled automobiles, sulphur, fertilizers, other chemicals, forest products, and other types of commodities. The busiest part of its railway network is along its main line between Calgary and Vancouver.Since 1970, coal has become a major commodity hauled by CPR. Coal is shipped in trains from coal mines in the mountains, most notably British Columbia to terminals at Bank and North Vancouver, from where it is then shipped to Japan. The CPR hauls over 34 million tons of coal to the west coast each year, mainly for export to Japan.Grain is hauled by the CPR from the prairies to ports at Thunder Bay (the former cities of Fort William and Port Arthur), Quebec City and Vancouver, where it is then shipped overseas. The traditional winter export port was West Saint John, New Brunswick when ice closed the St. Lawrence River. Grain has always been a significant commodity hauled by the CPR; between 1905 and 1909, the CPR double-tracked its section of track between Fort William (Which is today part of the city of Thunder Bay) and Winnipeg to facilitate grain shipments. For several decades this was the only long stretch of double-track mainline outside of urban areas on the CPR. Today, though the Thunder Bay-Winnipeg section is now single tracked, the CPR still has two long distance double track lines serving rural areas, including a  stretch between British Columbia and Vancouver which follows the River into the western part of the Rockies, as well as the Canadian Pacific Winchester Sub, a  stretch of double track mainline which runs from Falls, Ontario through downtown Montreal which runs through many rural farming communities. There are also various long stretches of double track between Golden and Kamloops, Columbia and portions of the original Winnipeg-Thunder Bay double track (such as 20 miles through Kenora and Keewatin, Ontario) are still double track.In 1952, the CPR became the first North American railway to introduce intermodal or piggyback freight service, where truck trailers are carried on cars. Containers later replaced most piggyback service. In 1996, the CPR introduced a scheduled reservation-only short-haul intermodal service between Montreal and West Toronto called the Iron Highway; it utilized unique equipment that was later replaced (1999) by conventional piggyback flatcars and renamed Expressway. This service was extended to Detroit with plans to reach Chicago however CP was unable to locate a suitable terminal. Loss of the small Detroit terminal and low US traffic along with loss of the Chrysler Windsor traffic it was later cut back to Milton, west of Toronto.Passenger trainsThe train was the primary mode of long-distance transportation in Canada until the 1960s. Among the many types of people who rode CPR trains were new immigrants heading for the prairies, military troops (especially during the two world wars) and upper class tourists. It also custom-built many of its passenger cars at its Angus Shops to be able to meet the demands of the upper class.Angus Shops building converted into an SAQ liquor store.The CPR also had a line of Great Lakes ships integrated into its transcontinental service. From 1885 until 1912, these ships linked Owen Sound on Georgian Bay to Fort William. Following a major fire in December 1911 that destroyed the grain elevator, operations were relocated to a new, larger port created by the CPR at Port McNicoll opening in May 1912. Five ships allowed daily service, and included the S.S. Assiniboia, and S.S. Keewatin built in 1908 which remained in use until the end of service. Travellers went by train from Toronto to that Georgian Bay port, then travelled by ship to link with another train at the Lakehead. After War II, the trains and ships carried automobiles as well as passengers. This service featured what was to become the last train in North America. The Steam Boat was a fast, direct connecting train between Toronto and Port McNicoll. The passenger service was discontinued at the end of season in 1965 with one ship, the Keewatin, carrying on in freight service for two more years. It later became a marine museum in the United States.After World War II, passenger traffic declined as automobiles and aeroplanes became more common, but the CPR continued to innovate in an attempt to keep ridership up. Beginning November 9, 1953, the CPR introduced Rail Diesel Cars (RDCs) on many of its lines. Officially called Dayliners by the CPR, they were always referred to as Budd Cars by employees. Greatly reduced travel times and reduced costs resulted, which saved service on many lines for a number of years. The CPR would go on to acquire the second largest fleet of RDCs totaling 52 cars. Only the and Maine Railroad had more. This CPR fleet also included the rare model RDC-4 (which consisted of a mail section at one end and a baggage section at the other end with no formal passenger section). On April 24, 1955, the CPR introduced a new luxury transcontinental passenger train, The Canadian. The train provided service between Vancouver and Toronto or Montreal (east of Sudbury; the train was in two sections). The train, which operated on an expedited schedule, was pulled by locomotives, and used new, streamlined, stainless steel rolling stock.Starting in the 1960s, however, the railway started to discontinue much of its passenger service, particularly on its branch lines. For example, passenger service ended on its line through southern Columbia and Pass in January 1964, and on its Central in April 1967, and the transcontinental train The Dominion was dropped in January 1966. On October 29, 1978, CP Rail transferred its passenger services to Rail, a new federal Crown corporation that was now responsible for intercity passenger services in Canada. Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney presided over major cuts in Via Rail service on January 15, 1990. This ended service by The Canadian over CPR rails, and the train was rerouted on the former Super Continental route via Canadian National without a change of name. Where both trains had been daily prior to the January 15, 1990, cuts, the surviving Canadian was (and is) only a three-times-weekly operation.In addition to inter-city passenger services, the CPR also provided commuter rail services in Montreal. CP Rail introduced Canadas first bi-level passenger cars here in 1970. On October 1, 1982, the Montreal Urban Community Transit Commission (STCUM) assumed responsibility for the commuter services previously provided by CP Rail. It continues under the Metropolitan Transportation Agency (AMT).Canadian Pacific Railway currently operates three commuter services under contract. The Coast Express comprises ten daily trains between downtown Vancouver and its eastern suburbs on behalf of TransLink, a regional transit authority. Transit contracts CPR to operate six return trips between Milton and downtown Toronto in Ontario. In Montreal, 59 daily commuter trains run on CPR lines from Lucien-LAllier Station to Candiac, Rigaud and BlainvilleSaint-Jerome on behalf of the AMT.The Mountaineer excursion train is also crewed (Engineer and Conductor) by CP employees where it operates on their right of way.Sleeping, Dining and Parlour Car Departmentcars were operated by a separate department of the railway that included the dining and parlour cars and aptly named as the Sleeping, Dining and Parlour Car Department.The CPR decided from the very beginning that it would operate its own sleeping cars, unlike railways in the United States that depended upon independent companies that specialized in providing cars and porters, including building the cars themselves. Pullman was long a famous name in this regard; its Pullman porters were legendary. Other early companies included the Palace Car Company. Bigger-sized berths and more comfortable surroundings were built by order of the CPRs General Manager, Van Horne, who was a large man himself. Providing and operating their own cars allowed better control of the service provided as well as keeping all of the revenue received, although profit was never a direct result of providing food to passengers. Rather, it was the realization that those who could afford to travel great distances expected such facilities and their favourable opinion would bode well to attracting others to Canada and the CPRs trains.This department also operated the news service which provided the news agents on passenger trains, who sold small refreshments and many other items such as playing cards to travellers, who might otherwise be unable to afford the higher priced car meals. The news service also operated lunch counters in medium-sized stations at key points (there were 19 of them east of Winnipeg) while the large terminal stations had dining rooms operated directly by the Dining Car Department (for example, the Alouette Room in Montreals Station (Montreal) and the Pacific Room in the Vancouver station).ExpressW. C. Van Horne decided from the very beginning that the CPR would retain as much revenue from its various operations as it could. This translated into keeping express, telegraph, sleeping car and other lines of business for themselves, creating separate departments or companies as necessary. This was necessary as the fledgling railway would need all the income it could get, and in addition, he saw some of these ancillary operations such as express and telegraph as being quite profitable. Others such as sleeping and dining cars were kept in order to provide better control over the quality of service being provided to passengers. Hotels were likewise crucial to the CPRs growth by attracting travellers.Dominion Express Company was formed independently in 1873 before the CPR itself, although train service did not begin until the summer of 1882 at which time it operated over some  of track from Rat Portage (Kenora) Ontario west to Winnipeg, Manitoba. It was soon absorbed into the CPR and expanded everywhere the CPR went. It was renamed Canadian Express Company on September 1, 1926, and the headquarters moved from Winnipeg, to Toronto. It was operated as a separate company with the railway charging them to haul express cars on trains. At major terminals separate buildings usually next to stations were owned by CPE. At smaller locations where volume would not warrant a separate employee the local station agent would act for the Express Company receiving a commission for all sales made on their behalf.Express was handled in separate cars, some with employees on board, on the headend of passenger trains to provide a fast scheduled service for which higher rates could be charged than for LCL (Less than Carload Lot), small shipments of freight which were subject to delay. Aside from all sorts of small shipments for all kinds of businesses such products as cream, butter, poultry, and eggs were handled along with fresh flowers, fish and other sea foods some handled in separate refrigerated cars. Horses and livestock along with birds and small animals including prize cattle for exhibition were carried often in special horse cars that had facilities for grooms to ride with their animals. Automobiles for individuals were also handled by express in closed boxcars. Gold and silver bullion as well as cash were carried in large amounts between the mint and banks. Small business money shipments and valuables such as jewellery were routinely handled in small packets. Money orders and travellers cheques were an important part of the express companys business and were used worldwide in the years before credit cards.Canadian Express Cartage Department was formed in March 1937 to handle pickup and delivery of most express shipments including less-than-carload freight. Their trucks were painted Killarney (dark) green while regular express company vehicles were painted bright red.Express routes using highway trucks beginning in November 1945 in southern Ontario and Alberta co-ordinated rail and highway service expanded service to better serve smaller locations especially on branchlines. Trucking operations would go on to expand across Canada making it an important transportation provider for small shipments. Deregulation in the 1980s changed everything, and it was not long before all trucking services were ended even after many attempts to change with the times. CanPar was one such attempt.TelegraphThe original charter of the CPR granted in 1881 provided for the right to create an telegraph and telephone service including charging for it. The telephone had barely been invented but telegraph was well established as a means of communicating quickly across great distances. Being allowed to sell this service meant the railway could offset the costs of constructing and maintaining a pole line along its tracks across vast distances for its own purposes which were largely for dispatching trains. It began doing so in 1882 as the separate Telegraph Department. It would go on to provide a link between the cables under the Atlantic and Pacific oceans when they were completed. Prior to the CPR line messages to the west could be sent only via the United States.Paid for by the word, a telegram was an expensive way to send messages but, vital to businesses. An individual receiving a personal telegram was seen as being someone important except for those that transmitted sorrow in the form of death notices. Messengers on bicycles delivered telegrams and picked up a reply in cities. In smaller locations the local railway station agent would handle this on a commission basis. To speed things, at the local end messages would first be telephoned.In 1931 it became the Communications Department in recognition of the expanding services provided which included telephones lines, news wire, ticker quotations for the market and eventually Teleprinters. All were faster than mail and very important to business and the public alike for many decades before cell phones and computers came along.It was the coming of these newer technologies especially cellular telephones that eventually resulted in the demise of these services even after formation in 1967 of CN-CP Telecommunications in an effort to effect efficiencies through consolidation rather than competition. Deregulation in the 1980s brought about mergers and the sale of remaining services and facilities.RadioOn January 17, 1930, the CPR applied for licenses to operate stations in 11 cities from coast to coast for the purpose of organizing its own network in order to compete with the Radio service. The CNR had built a radio network with the aim of promoting itself as well as entertaining its passengers during their travels. The onset of the Great Depression hurt the CPRs financial plan for a rival project and in April they withdrew their applications for stations in all but Toronto, Montreal and Winnipeg. CPR did not end up pursuing these applications but instead operated a station in Toronto known as CPRY, with initials standing for Canadian Pacific Royal York() which operated out of studios at CPs Royal York Hotel and leased time on CFRB and CKGW.() A network of affiliates carried the CPR radio networks broadcasts in the first half of the 1930s, but the takeover of CNRs Radio service by the new Radio Broadcasting Commission removed CPRs need to have a network for competitive reasons, and CPRs radio service was discontinued in 1935.()SteamshipsSteamships played an important part in the history of CP from the very earliest days. During construction of the line in British Columbia even before the private CPR took over from the government contractor, ships were used to bring supplies to the construction sites. Similarly, to reach the isolated area of Superior in northern Ontario ships were used to bring in supplies to the construction work. While this work was going on there was already regular passenger service to the West. Trains operated from Toronto to Owen Sound where CPR steamships connected to Fort William where trains once again operated to reach Winnipeg. Before the CPR was completed the only way to reach the West was through the United States via St. Paul and Winnipeg. This Great Lakes steam ship service continued as an alternative route for many years and was always operated by the railway. It would become the last operation in North America to feature a special connecting boat train.In 1884, CPR began purchasing sailing ships as part of a railway supply service on the Lakes. Over time, CPR became a railroad company with widely organized water transportation auxiliaries including the Great Lakes service, the trans-Pacific service, the Pacific coastal service, the British Columbia lake and river service, the trans-Atlantic service, and the Ferry service. In the 20th century, the company evolved into a transcontinental railroad which operated two transoceanic services which connected Canada with Europe and with Asia. The range of CPR services were aspects of a integrated plan.(Smith, Joseph Russell. (1908). )Once the railway was completed to British Columbia the CPR chartered and soon bought their own steamships. These sleek steamships were of the latest design and christened with the prefix Empress in a link to the Orient. Travel to and from the Orient and cargo, especially imported tea and silk were an important source of revenue aided by Royal Mail contracts. This was an important part of the All Red Route to link the British Empire. The other ocean part was the Atlantic service from England which began with acquisition of two existing lines, Beaver Line, owned by Elder Dempster and Allan Lines. These two segments became Canadian Pacific Ocean Services (later, Canadian Pacific Steamships) and operated separately from the various lake services operated in Canada. These trans-ocean routes made it possible to travel from Britain to Kong using only the CPRs ships, trains and hotels. CPs Empress ships became world-famous for their luxury and speed. They had a practical role too in transporting immigrants from much of Europe to Canada especially to populate the vast prairies. They also played an important role in both world wars with many of them being lost to enemy action including the of Britain.There were also a number of rail ferries operated over the years as well including, between Windsor, Ontario and Detroit, Michigan from 1890 until 1915. This began with two paddle-wheelers capable of carrying 16 cars. Passenger cars were carried as well as freight. This service ended in 1915 when the CPR made an agreement with the Michigan Central to use their Detroit River tunnel opened in 1910.Pennsylvania-Ontario Transportation Company was formed jointly with the PRR in 1906 to operate a ferry across lake Erie between Ashtabula, Ohio and Port Burwell, Ontario to carry freight cars, mostly of coal, much of it to be burned in CPR steam locomotives. Only one ferry boat was ever operated, the Ashtabula, a large vessel which eventually sank in a harbour collision in Ashtabula on September 18, 1958, thus ending the service.Canadian Pacific Car and Passenger Transfer Company was formed by other interest in 1888 linking the CPR in Prescott, Ontario, and the NYC in Ogdensburg, New York. Service on this route had actually begun very early, in 1854 along with service from Brockville. A bridge built in 1958 ended passenger service however, freight continued until Ogdensburgs dock was destroyed by fire September 25, 1970, thus ending all service. CPC&PTC was never owned by the CPR.of Fundy ferry service was operated for passengers and freight for many years linking Nova Scotia, and John, New Brunswick.Eventually, after 78 years, with the changing times the scheduled passenger services would all be ended as well as ocean cruises. Cargo would continue on both oceans with a change over to containers. CP was an intermodal pioneer especially on land with road and rail mixing to provide the best service.Ships was the final operation, and in the end it too left CP ownership when it was spun off in 2001. Ships was merged with Hapag-Lloyd in 2005.BC Coast SteamshipsThe Pacific Railway Coast Service (Columbia Coast Steamships or BCCS) was established when the CPR acquired in 1901 Pacific Navigation Company (no relation) and its large fleet of ships that served 72 ports along the coast of British Columbia including on Vancouver Island. Service included the Vancouver-Victoria-Seattle Triangle Route, Gulf Islands, Powell River, as well as Vancouver-Alaska service. BCCS operated a fleet of 14 passenger ships made up of a number of Princess ships, pocket versions of the famous ocean going Empress ships along with a freighter, three tugs and five rail car barges. Popular with tourists, the Princess ships were famous in their own right especially the Princess Marguerite (II) which became the last coastal liner operating from 1949 until 1985. The best known of the princess ships, however, is the Princess Sophia, which sank with no survivors in October 1918 after striking the Reef in Alaskas Canal, constituting the largest maritime disaster in the history of the Pacific Northwest.These services continued for many years until changing conditions in the late 1950s brought about their decline and eventual demise at the end of season in 1974. The Princess Marguerite was acquired by the provinces British Columbia Steamship (1975) Ltd. and continued to operate for a number of years.BC Lake and River ServiceThe Pacific Railway Lake and River Service (Columbia Lake and River Service) developed slowly and in spurts of growth.CP began a long history of service in the Kootenays region of southern British Columbia beginning with the purchase in 1897 of the Columbia and Kootenay Steam Navigation Company which operated a fleet of steamers and barges on the Lakes and was merged into the CPR as the Lake and River Service which also served the Arrow Lakes and Columbia River, Kootenay Lake and Kootenai River, Lake Okanagan and Skaha Lake, Lake, Trout Lake, and Lake and the River/Lake.All of these lake operations had one thing in common, the need for shallow draft therefore sternwheelers were the choice of ship. Tugs and barges handled rail equipment including one operation that saw the entire train including the locomotive and caboose go along. These services gradually declined and ended in 1975 except for a freight barge on Slocan Lake. This was the one where the entire train went along since the barge was a link to an isolated section of track. The Iris G tug boat and a barge were operated under contract to CP Rail until the last train ran late in December 1988. The sternwheel steamship Moyie on Kootenay Lake was the last CPR passenger boat in BC lake service, having operated from 1898 until 1957. It became a beached historical exhibit, as are also the Sicamous and Naramata at Penticton on Okanagan.HotelsTo promote tourism and passenger ridership the Canadian Pacific established a series of first class resort hotels. These hotels became landmarks famous in their own right. They include Algonquin in St. Andrews, Frontenac in Quebec, Royal York in Toronto, Minaki Lodge in Minaki Ontario, Vancouver, Empress Hotel in Victoria and the Springs Hotel and Lake Louise in the Canadian Rockies. Several signature hotels were acquired from its competitor Canadian National during the 1980s. The hotels retain their Canadian Pacific heritage but are no longer operated by the railroad. In 1998 Pacific Hotels acquired Fairmont Hotels, an American company, becoming Hotels and Resorts Inc. and the combined corporation operated the historic Canadian properties as well as the Fairmonts U.S. properties until sold in 2006.AirlineCanadian Pacific Airlines, also called CP Air, operated from 1942 to 1987 and was the main competitor of Canadian government-owned Canada. Based at International Airport, it served Canadian and international routes until it was purchased by Western Airlines which merged PWA and CP Air to create Airlines.Special trainsSilk trainsBetween the 1890s and the 1940s, the CPR transported raw silk cocoons from Vancouver, where they had been shipped from the Orient, to silk mills in York and Jersey. A silk train could carry several million dollars worth of silk, so they had their own armed guards. To avoid train robberies and so minimize insurance costs, they traveled quickly and stopped only to change locomotives and crews, which was often done in under five minutes. The silk trains had superior rights over all other trains; even passenger trains (including the Royal Train of 1939) would be put in sidings to make the silk trains trip faster. At the end of War II, the invention of nylon made silk less valuable so the silk trains died out.Funeral trainsthumb|Funeral train of Prime Minister Sir John A. Macdonald.trains would carry the remains of important people, such as prime ministers. As the train would pass, mourners would be at certain spots to show respect. Two of the CPRs funeral trains are particularly well-known. On June 10, 1891, the funeral train of Minister John A. Macdonald ran from Ottawa to Ontario. The train consisted of five heavily draped passenger cars and was pulled by 4-4-0 No. 283. On September 14, 1915, the funeral train of former CPR president William Cornelius Van Horne ran from Montreal to Joliet, Illinois, pulled by 4-6-2 No. 2213. The Canadian was used as funeral train for former Prime Minister John Diefenbaker in 1979.Image:Royaltrain-hopebc.jpg|thumb|125px|left|King George VI and Queen Elizabeth at British Columbia.Royal trainsThe CPR ran a number of trains that transported members of the Royal family when they toured Canada. These trains transported royalty through Canadas scenery, forests, small towns and enabled people to see and greet them. Their trains were elegantly decorated; some had amenities such as a post office and barber shop. The CPRs most notable royal train was in 1939.In 1939 the CPR and the CNR had the honour of giving King George VI and Queen Elizabeth a rail tour of Canada, from City to Vancouver. This was the first visit to Canada by a reigning Monarch. The steam locomotives used to pull the train included CPR 2850, a Hudson (4-6-4) built by Locomotive Works in 1938, CNR 6400, a U-4-a Northern (4-8-4) and CNR 6028 a U-1-b Mountain (4-8-2) type. They were specially painted royal blue with silver trim as was the entire train, the locomotives ran  across Canada, through 25 changes of crew, without engine failure. The King, somewhat of a railbuff, rode in the cab when possible. After the tour, King George gave the CPR permission to use the term Hudson for the CPR locomotives and to display Royal Crowns on their running boards. This applied only to the semi-streamlined locomotives (28202864), not the standard Hudsons (28002819).School carsBetween 1926 and the early 1960s the CPR ran a school car to reach people who lived in Northern Ontario, far from schools. A teacher would travel in a specially designed car to remote areas and would stay to teach in one area for two to three days, then leave for another area. Each car had a blackboard and a few sets of chairs and desks. They also contained miniature libraries. These school cars were useful in spreading education and literacy.Silver StreakMajor filming for the 1976 movie Silver Streak, a fictional comedy tale of a train trip from Angeles to Chicago, was done on the CPR, mainly in the Alberta area with station footage at  Torontos Union Station. The train set was so lightly disguised as the fictional AMRoad that the locomotives and cars still carried their original names and numbers, along with the easily-identifiable CP Rail red-striped paint scheme. Most of the cars are still in revenue service on Via Rail Canada; the lead locomotive is extant in Quebec, though she is unserviceable, but the second unit has been scrapped.Holiday Trainright|thumb|300px|Holiday Train in Montreal, November 2009Starting in 1999, the CPR runs a Holiday Train along its main line during the months of November and December. The Holiday Train celebrates the Christmas season and collects donations for community banks. The Holiday Train also provides publicity for the CPR and a few of its customers. Each train has a box car stage for entertainers who are travelling along with the train. The train is a freight train, but also pulls vintage passenger cars which are used as lodging/transportation for the entertainers.() People that come to see the train may even come on board and check out some of the holiday decorations and vintage passenger cars. Since its launch in 1999, the Holiday Train program has raised more than $2.3 million CAD and 506 tons of food for North American food banks. All donations collected in a community remain in that community for distribution.() It collects donations of food and money (as well as makes its own donations) for the needy to help better their Christmas.The Holiday Train is a Christmas-themed train. The trains are decorated; each car as well as the locomotive and caboose are covered in Christmas lights, and the trains pass through every major city and town on the CP system.() There are three trains, which cover the five main regions of the CP:*US Northeast()*US Midwest()*Quebec and Ontario()*Manitoba and Saskatchewan()*Alberta and British Columbia()Royal Canadian PacificOn June 7, 2000, the CPR inaugurated the Canadian Pacific, a luxury excursion service that operates between the months of June and September. It operates along a  route from Calgary, through the Valley in Columbia, and returning to Calgary via Pass. The trip takes six days and five nights. The train consists of up to eight luxury passenger cars built between 1916 and 1931 and is powered by first-generation diesel locomotives.Steam trainImage:IMG 4350 CP 2816.JPG|thumb|250px|Pacific 2816 Empress at Wisconsin, September 1, 2007In 1998, the CPR repatriated one of its former passenger steam locomotives that had been on static display in the United States following its sale in January 1964, long after the close of the steam era. CPR Hudson 2816 was re-designated Empress 2816 following a 30-month restoration that cost in excess of $1 million. It was subsequently returned to service to promote public relations. It has operated across much of the CPR system, including lines in the United States. It has been used for various charitable purposes, the most significant of which has been to raise awareness of the need to provide children with a nourishing breakfast to aid their learning in school. One hundred percent of the money raised goes to the nation-wide charity For Learning  the CPR bears all of the expenses associated with the operation of the train.Spirit TrainIn 2008, Canadian Pacific partnered with the 2010 Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games to present a Spirit Train tour that featured Olympic-themed events at various stops. James was a headline entertainer.(Canadian Pacific and Colin James bring Olympic spirit to Canadian communities release, Canada NewsWire, 9 May 2008, 10:10 am.) Several stops were met by protesters who argued that the games are slated to take place on what they described as stolen indigenous land.(Rod Mickleburgh, Protests are fine, but can the obnoxious profanity, Globe and Mail, 26 September 2003, S3; Denis St. Pierre, Protest greets Spirit Train, Sudbury Star, 13 October 2008, A9; Mark Klichling, Protests dont derail Olympic Spirit Train, North Bay Nugget, 14 October 2008, A5; Stephanie Levitz, Winter Olympic supporters and opponents both claim success from Spirit Train, Canadian Press, 19 October 2008, 10:45 am.)LocomotivesSteam locomotivesImage:Countess-1.gif|thumb|250px|of DufferinIn the CPRs early years, it made extensive use of American Standard 4-4-0 locomotives and example of this is the of Dufferin. Later, considerable use was also made of the 4-6-0 type for passenger and 2-8-0 type for freight.Starting in the 20th century, the CPR bought and built hundreds of Ten-Wheeler type 4-6-0s for passenger and freight service and similar quantities of 2-8-0s and 2-10-2s for freight. 2-10-2s were also used in passenger service on mountain routes. The CPR bought hundreds of 4-6-2 Pacifics between 1906 and 1948 with later versions being true dual purpose passenger and fast freight locomotives.The CPR built hundreds of its own locomotives at its shops in Montreal, first at the New Shops as the DeLorimer shops were commonly referred to and at the massive Angus Shops that replaced them in 1904.Some of the CPRs best-known locomotives were the 4-6-4 Hudsons. First built in 1929 they began a new era of modern locomotives with capabilities that changed how transcontinental passenger trains ran, eliminating frequent changes en route. What once took 24 changes of engines in 1886, all of them 4-4-0s except for two of 2-8-0s in the mountains, for  between Montreal and Vancouver became 8 changes. The 2800s (Twenty Eight Hundreds) as the Hudson type was known, ran from Toronto to Fort William a distance of , while another lengthy engine district was from Winnipeg to Calgary .Especially notable were the semi-streamlined H1 class Hudson, locomotives that were given their name because one of their class hauled the Royal Train carrying King George VI and Queen Elizabeth on the 1939 Royal Tour across Canada without change or failure. That locomotive, No. 2850, is preserved in the Exporail exhibit hall of the Railway Museum in St. Constant (Delson) Quebec. One of the class, No. 2860, was restored by the Columbia government and used in excursion service on the Columbia Railway between 1974 and 1999.In 1929, the CPR received its first 2-10-4 locomotives, the largest steam locomotives to run in Canada and the British Empire. Named after the Selkirk Mountains where they served, these locomotives were well suited for steep grades. They were regularly used in passenger and freight service. The CPR would own 37 of these locomotives, including number 8000, an experimental high pressure engine. The last steam locomotives that the CPR received, in 1949, were Selkirks, numbered 59305935.Image:Canadian Pacific - Trans Canada passenger train.jpg|150px|thumb|CP passenger train heading east towards Calgary about 1973Note: The last Selkirk built, number 5935, is preserved at the Railway Museum. (You can not climb inside but you can touch it). One other 2-10-4 Selkirk from this last order (5930-5935) has also been preserved; number 5931. It is displayed, within a chain-link fence, at the main entrance to Heritage Park in Calgary, Alberta. For most of its display life, it was intentionally painted with the incorrect number (5934) and was displayed on the west end of downtown Calgary next to the CPR mainline. It now bears its original and correct number (5931) after being repainted and renumbered for its current display location next to Heritage Park.Diesel locomotivesIn 1937, the CPR acquired its first locomotive, a custom built one-of-a-kind switcher numbered 7000. This locomotive was not successful and was not repeated. Production model diesels were imported from Locomotive Company (Alco) starting with five model S-2 yard switchers in 1943 and followed by further orders. In 1949, operations on lines in Vermont were dieselized with Alco FA1 road locomotives (8 A and 4 B units), 5 Alco RS-2 road switchers, 3 Alco S-2 switchers and 3 E8 passenger locomotives. In 1948 Locomotive Works began production of Alco designs.In 1949, the CPR acquired 13 Baldwin designed locomotives from the Locomotive Company for its isolated and Nanaimo Railway, and Island was quickly dieselized. Following that successful experiment, the CPR started to dieselise its main network. Dieselization was completed 11 years later, with its last steam locomotive running on November 6, 1960. The CPRs first-generation locomotives were mostly made by Motors Diesel and Locomotive Works, (Locomotive Company designs), with some made by the Locomotive Company to Baldwin and Morse designs.CP was the first railway in North America to pioneer AC traction diesel-electric locomotives, in 1984. In 1995 CP turned to General Electric Transportation Systems for the first production AC traction locomotives in Canada, and now has the highest percentage of AC locomotives in service of all North American Class I railways. As of early 2007, 578 of the CPRs 1,669 locomotives are AC.Roster* EMD** SD40** SD40-2** SD40M-2** SD60 (exSoo Line)** SD60M (exSoo Line)** SD90MAC (SD90/43MAC)** SD90MAC-H** Slug** MP15DC, MP15AC (ex-Soo Line, n Milwaukee Road)** Fuel Tenders GP40** SD10 (ex-Soo Line, ex-Milwaukee Road, n Milwaukee Road SD7)** GP39-2** E8A (bought for joint Canadian Pacific / and Maine Railroad operations in Vermont)* GMD** SD40-2** GP35** SW1200, 1200RSu, 1200RS** SW1500** SW900** SW8** SW9u** GP9, GP9u, GP9R** GP7u** GP40, GP40-2** GP38AC, 38-2** GP39-2** FP7Au** FP9A, F9B** SW900M** F9B** F7B** SD40-2F** GP40-2 (DM&E, ex-IC&E)** SD40-3 (DM&E, ex-IC&E, ex-I&M Rail Link)* MLW** FA-1** FPA-2** RSD-17** RSD-8** RSD-2** RS-23** Boosters** C-424** Hump Braking Unit (based on GP9)** C-630M** M-630** S-3** RS-10** S-11m** M-636** M-640** RS18, RS18u** RSD-17* CLC** 44H44A1** H16-44** H24-66** CFA16-4** CFB16-4** CPA16-4** CPB16-4* GE** AC4400CW** ES44AC* Technologies** GG20B (returned to Railpower)* ALCO** S-2* BLW** DRS4-4-1000** DS4-4-1000Rolling stock* 1655 locomotives* 1000 stand alone double stack well cars* 3100 high-capacity covered hopper carsgrain and fertilizer* 2897 gondolas**474steel and concentrate**1553mill gondola (primarily used in scrap metal service)**306open coil gondola**531covered coil gondola**33covered flat-bottom gondola* 1250 high-capacity aluminum coal cars* 375 light-weight aluminum multi-level cars* 175 high-capacity traverse coil steel cars* 620 62-foot high capacity box carsCPR also has a fleet of  boxcars, insulated boxcars, centrebeam flatcars,  auto parts service boxcars, regular flat cars, and a fleet of tank cars.Major facilitiesCP owns a large number of large yards and repair shops across their system, which are used for many operations ranging from intermodal terminals to yards. Below are some examples of these.Active hump yardsHump yards work by using a small hill over which cars are pushed, before being released down a slope and switched automatically into cuts of cars, ready to be made into outbound trains. CPs active humps include:()* Calgary, Alberta   Alyth Yard; handles 2200 cars daily* Chicago, Illinois  Bensenville Yard* Paul, Minnesota  Pigs Eye Yard* Montreal, Quebec  St. Luc Yard; active since the 1940s.* Toronto, Ontario  Toronto Yard (also known as Toronto Freight Yard or Agincourt Yard); opened in 1964* Winnipeg, Manitoba  Rugby Yard (also known as Weston Yard)See also*Pacific Railway Coast Service*Pacific Railway Lake and River Service*Pacific Railway Police Service*Pacific Railway Upper Lake Service*Pacific Airlines Flight 21*Pacific Airlines Flight 402* Pacific Building (London)* Pacific Building (New York City)* Pacific Building (Toronto)ReferencesFurther reading * * * Canadian Pacific Railway (October 31, 2005), CPR Announces Senior Executive Appointment. Retrieved November 30, 2005.* * * * * The Premiers Funeral (June 11, 1891). The Woodstock Evening Sentinel Review, p. 1.* Canadian Pacific Railway 2004 Corporate Profile and Fact Book. Retrieved February 2, 2005.* Library and Archives Canada: Special Trains -Kids Site Retrieved January 19, 2008.External links* Canadian Pacific Railway official website* Canadian Railway history and stories* Teamsters Canada Rail Conference* CPR, from Sea to Sea: The Scottish Connection  Historical essay, illustrated with photographs from the CPR Archives and the McCord Museums Notman Photographic ArchivesPacific RailwayPacific RailwayPacific RailwayFervojoPacifique Pacific RailwayPacific Railwayja:Pacific RailwayTranskanadyjskaPacific RailwayPacific RailwayPacific Railwaypacifick eleznicaPacific RailwayPacific Railwayzh:
5981
Charles_Tupper
 signature         Charles Tupper Signature.svgSir Charles Tupper, 1st Baronet, GCMG, CB, PC (July 2, 1821  October 30, 1915) was a Canadian of Confederation: as the of Nova Scotia from 1864 to 1867, he led Scotia into Confederation. He later went on to serve as the sixth Minister of Canada, sworn in to office on May 1, 1896, seven days after parliament had been dissolved.  He would go on to lose the June 23 election, resigning on July 8, 1896.  His 69-day term as prime minister is currently the shortest in Canadian history.  At age 74, in May 1896, he was also the oldest person to serve as Prime Minister of Canada.Born in Nova Scotia in 1821, Tupper was trained as a physician and practiced medicine periodically throughout his political career (and served as the first president of the Medical Association). He entered Nova Scotian politics in 1855 as a protege of William Johnston. During Johnstons tenure as premier of Nova Scotia in 185759 and 186364, Tupper served as provincial secretary. Tupper replaced Johnston as premier in 1864.  As premier, Tupper established education in Nova Scotia.  He also worked to expand Nova Scotias railway network in order to promote industry.  By 1860, Tupper supported a union of all the colonies of North America.  Believing that immediate union of all the colonies was impossible, in 1864, he proposed a Union.  However, representatives of the of Canada asked to be allowed to attend the meeting in Charlottetown scheduled to discuss Maritime Union in order to present a proposal for a wider union, and the Conference thus became the first of the three conferences that secured Confederation.  Tupper also represented Nova Scotia at the other two conferences, the Quebec Conference (1864) and the Conference of 1866.  In Nova Scotia, Tupper organized a Party to combat the activities of the Party organized by Howe and successfully led Nova Scotia into Confederation.  Following the passage of the North America Act in 1867, Tupper resigned as premier of Nova Scotia and began a career in federal politics.  He held multiple cabinet positions under Prime Minister Sir John A. Macdonald, including of the Queens Privy Council for Canada (187072), Minister of Inland Revenue (187273), of Customs (187374), Minister of Public Works (187879), and Minister of Railways and Canals (187984).  Initially groomed as Macdonalds successor, Tupper had a falling out with Macdonald, and by the early 1880s, he asked Macdonald to appoint him as High Commissioner to the United Kingdom.  Tupper took up his post in London in 1883, and would remain High Commissioner until 1895, although in 188788, he served as Minister of Finance without relinquishing the High Commissionership.  In 1895, the government of Sir Mackenzie Bowell floundered over the Schools Question; as a result, several leading members of the Conservative Party of Canada demanded the return of Tupper to serve as prime minister.  Tupper accepted this invitation and returned to Canada, becoming prime minister in May 1896.  An election was called, just before he was sworn in as prime minister, which his party subsequently lost to Laurier and the Liberals. Tupper served as Leader of the Opposition from July 1896 until 1900, at which point he returned to London, where he lived until his death in 1915.Early life, 18211855Tupper was born in Nova Scotia to Charles Tupper, Sr. and Miriam Lowe Lockhart Buckner.(TUPPER, Sir CHARLES, in the of Canadian Biography, available online at http://www.biographi.ca/009004-119.01-e.php?&id_nbr7747.)  His father was the co-pastor of the local church. Beginning in 1837, at age 16, Tupper attended the Horton Academy in Nova Scotia, where he learned Latin, Greek, and some French.(Phillip Buckner. TUPPER, Sir CHARLES, in the of Canadian Biography, available online at http://www.biographi.ca/009004-119.01-e.php?&id_nbr7747.) After graduating in 1839, he spent some time in Brunswick working as a teacher, before moving to Nova Scotia to spend 183940 studying medicine with Dr. Ebenezer Fitch Harding.( Borrowing money, he then moved to Scotland to study at the College of Surgeons of Edinburgh at the of Edinburgh: he received his MD in 1843.( During his time in Edinburgh, Tuppers commitment to his Baptist faith faltered, and he drank whisky for the first time.( Returning to Nova Scotia, in 1846, he broke off an engagement that he had contracted with the daughter of a wealthy Halifax merchant when he was 17 years old and instead married Frances Morse (18261912), the granddaughter of Col. Joseph Morse, one of the founders of Nova Scotia.(  The Tuppers had three sons (Orin Stewart, Charles Hibbert, and William Johnston) and three daughters (Emma, Elizabeth Stewart (Lilly), and Sophy Almon).( The Tupper children were raised in Frances Anglican denomination and John and Frances regularly worshipped in an Anglican church, though on the campaign trail, Tupper often found time to visit Baptist meetinghouses.(  Tupper set himself up as a physician in Amherst, Nova Scotia and opened a drugstore.(Early years in Nova Scotia politics, 18551864The leader of the Conservative Party of Nova Scotia, William Johnston, a fellow Baptist and family friend of the Tuppers, encouraged Charles Tupper to enter politics.(  As such, in 1855, Tupper ran against the prominent Liberal politician Howe for the Cumberland County seat in the Scotia House of Assembly.(  Joseph Howe would be a frequent political opponent of Tupper  the years to come.Although Tupper won his seat, the 1855 election was an overall disaster for the Nova Scotia Conservatives, with the Liberals, led by William Young, winning a large majority.(  Young consequently became of Nova Scotia.At a caucus meeting in January 1856, Tupper recommended a new direction for the Conservative party: they should begin actively courting Nova Scotias Catholic minority and should eagerly embrace railroad construction.(  Having just led his party into a disastrous election campaign, Johnston decided to basically cede control of the party to Tupper, though Johnston remained the partys leader.(  In the course of 1856, Tupper led Conservative attacks on the government, leading to Joseph Howe dubbing Tupper the wicked wasp of Cumberland.(  In early 1857, Tupper succeeded in convincing a number of Roman Catholic Liberal members to the floor to join the Conservatives, reducing Youngs government to the status of a government.(  As a result, Young was forced to resign in February 1857, and the Conservatives formed a government with Johnston as premier.(  Tupper became the secretary.(In Tuppers first speech to the House of Assembly as provincial secretary, he set forth an ambitious plan of railroad construction.(  Thus, Tupper had embarked on the major theme of his political life: that Nova Scotians (and later Canadians) should downplay their ethnic and religious differences, and instead focus on developing the lands resources.  He argued that with Nova Scotias inexhaustible mines, it could become a vast manufacturing mart for the east coast of North America.(  He quickly persuaded Johnston to end the General Mining Associations monopoly over Nova Scotia minerals.(In June 1857, Tupper initiated discussions with Brunswick and the of Canada about an intercolonial railway.(  He traveled to London in 1858 to attempt to secure imperial backing for this project.(  During these discussions, Tupper found that the Canadians were more interested in discussing federal union, while the British (with the earl of Derby in his second term as prime minister) were too absorbed in their own immediate interests.(  As such, nothing came of the 1858 discussions for an intercolonial railway.(An election was held in May 1859, with sectarian conflict playing a large role, with the Catholics largely supporting the Conservatives and the Protestants now shifting towards the Liberals.(  Tupper barely managed to retain his seat.(  The Conservatives were barely re-elected and lost a vote later that year.(  Johnston asked the of Nova Scotia, Lord Mulgrave, for a dissolution, but Mulgrave refused and invited William Young to form a government.(  Tupper was outraged and petitioned the British government, asking them to recall Mulgrave.(  For the next three years, Tupper was ferocious in his denunciations of the Liberal government, first Young, and then Joseph Howe, who took over from Young later in 1860.(  This came to a head in 1863 when the Liberals introduced legislation to restrict the Nova Scotia franchise, a move which Johnston and Tupper successfully blocked.(  Tupper continued practicing medicine throughout this period.  He established a successful medical practice in Halifax, rising to become the city medical officer.(  In 1863, he was elected president of the Medical Society of Nova Scotia.(In the June 1863 election, the Conservatives campaigned on a platform of railroad construction and expanded access to public education.(  The Conservatives won a huge majority, with 44 of the House of Assemblys 55 seats.  Johnston resumed his duties as premier and Tupper again became provincial secretary.(  As a further sign of the Conservatives commitment to non-sectarianism, in 1863, after a 20-year hiatus, College was re-opened as a non-denominational institution of higher learning.(In May 1864, Johnston retired from politics, accepting an appointment as a judge, and Tupper was chosen as his successor as premier of Nova Scotia.(Premier of Nova Scotia, 18641867thumb|left|Hon. Charles Tupper.Tupper introduced ambitious education legislation in 1864 creating a system of state-subsidized schools.(  The next year, he introduced a bill providing for compulsory local taxation to fund these schools.(  Although these public schools were non-denominational (whch resulted in Protestants sharply criticizing Tupper), they did include a program of Christian education.  However, many Protestants, particularly fellow Baptists, felt that Tupper had sold them out.(  In an attempt to regain their trust, he appointed Baptist educator Harding Rand as Nova Scotias first of education.(  This in turn aroused concern among Catholics, led by Archbishop Connolly, who demanded state-funded schools.(  Tupper reached a compromise with Archbishop Connolly whereby Catholic-run schools could receive public funding, so long as they provided their religious instruction after hours.(Making good on his promise for expanded railroad construction, in 1864, Tupper appointed Fleming as the chief engineer of the Scotia Railway in order to expand the Pictou line.(  He would later (Jan. 1866) award Fleming the contract to complete the line after local contractors proved too slow.(  Though this decision was controversial, it did result in the line from Truro to Pictou being successfully completed by May 1867.(  A second line, from Royal to Windsor initially faltered, but was eventually completed by 1869.(Tuppers role in securing Canadian ConfederationIn the run-up to the 1859 Nova Scotia election, Tupper had been unwilling to commit to the idea of a union with the other North American colonies.(  By 1860, however, he had reconsidered his position.(  Tupper outlined his changed position in a lecture delivered at John, New Brunswick entitled The Political Condition of British North America.(  The title of the lecture was an homage to  Lord Durhams 1838 on the Affairs of British North America and served as an assessment of the condition of British North America in the two decades following Lord Durhams famous report.  Although Tupper was interested in the potential economic consequences of a union with the other colonies, the bulk of his lecture addressed the place of British North America within the wider Empire.(  Having been convinced by his 1858 trip to London that British politicians were unwilling to pay attention to a small colony like Nova Scotia, Tupper argued that Nova Scotia and the other Maritime colonies could never hope to occupy a position of influence or importance except in connection with their larger sister Canada.(  As such, Tupper proposed to create a British America, which stretching from the Atlantic to the Pacific, would in a few years exhibit to the world a great and powerful organization, with British Institutions, British sympathies, and British feelings, bound indissolubly to the throne of England.(Charlottetown Conference, September 1864Image:CharlottetownConference1864.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Tupper and other delegates of the Conference on the steps of Government House, September 1864.With the commencement of the Civil War in 1861, Tupper worried that a victorious North would turn northward and conquer the British North American provinces.(  This caused him to redouble his commitment to union, which he now saw as essential to protecting the British colonies against American aggression.(  Since he thought that full union among the British North American colonies would be unachievable for many years, on March 28, 1864, Tupper instead proposed a Union which would unite the Maritime provinces in advance of a projected future union with the Province of Canada.(  A conference to discuss the proposed union of Nova Scotia, Brunswick and Edward Island was scheduled to be held in Charlottetown in September 1864.(Tupper was pleasantly surprised when the of the Province of Canada, A. Macdonald, asked to be allowed to attend the Conference.(  The Conference, which was co-chaired by Tupper and Brunswick Premier Leonard Tilley, welcomed the Canadian delegation and asked them to join the conference.(  The conference proved to be a smashing success, and resulted in an agreement-in-principle to form a union of the four colonies.(Quebec Conference, October 1864The Quebec Conference was held on October 10, as a follow-up to the Charlottetown Conference, with Newfoundland only attending to observe.(  Tupper headed the Nova Scotia delegation to the Quebec Conference.(  He supported a legislative union of the colonies (which would mean that there would be only one legislature for the united colonies).(  However, the Canadian delegates to the conference, notably Cartier and Langevin, strongly opposed the idea of a legislative union.  As such, Tupper threw his weight behind Macdonalds proposal for a federal union, which would see each colony retain its own legislature, with a central legislature in charge of common interests.(  Tupper argued in favour of a strong central government as a second best to a pure legislative union.(  However, Tupper felt that the local legislatures should retain the ability to levy duties on their natural resources.(Concerned that a united legislature would be dominated by the Province of Canada, Tupper pushed for regional representation in the upper house of the confederated colonies (a goal which would be achieved in the makeup of the of Canada).(On the topic of which level of government would control customs in the union, Tupper ultimately agreed to accept the formula by which the federal government controlled customs in exchange for an annual subsidy of 80 cents a year for each Nova Scotian.(  This deal was ultimately not good for Nova Scotia, which had historically received most of its government revenue from customs, and as a result, Nova Scotia entered Confederation with a deficit.(150px|thumb|left|Tupper in 1865.Aftermath of the Quebec ConferenceAlthough Tupper had given up much at the Quebec Conference, he thought that he would be able to convince Nova Scotians that the deal he negotiated was in sum good for Nova Scotia.(  He was therefore surprised when the deal he had negotiated at Quebec was roundly criticized by Nova Scotians: the Opposition Leader George Archibald was the only member of the Liberal caucus to support Confederation.(  Former premier Joseph Howe now organized an Party and anti-Confederation sentiments were so strong that Tupper decided to postpone a vote of the legislature on the question of Confederation for a full year.(  Tupper now organized supporters of Confederation into a Party to push for the union.(Finally, in April 1866, Tupper secured a motion of the Nova Scotia legislature in favour of union by promising that he would renegotiate the Resolutions at the upcoming conference in London Conference.(London Conference, 1866Joseph Howe had begun a pamphlet campaign in the UK to attempt to turn British public opinion against the proposed union.(  As such, when Tupper arrived in the UK, he immediately initiated a campaign of pamphlets and letters to the editor designed to refute Howes assertions.(Although Tupper did attempt to renegotiate the 72 Resolutions as he had promised, he was ineffective in securing any major changes.(  The only major change agreed to at the London Conference was one that arguably did not benefit Nova Scotia - responsibility for the fisheries, which was going to be a joint federal-provincial responsibility under the Quebec agreement, became solely a federal concern.(The final push for ConfederationFollowing the passage of the North America Act in the wake of the London Conference, Tupper returned to Nova Scotia to undertake preparations for the union.(  The union came into effect on July 1, 1867, and on July 4, Tupper turned over responsibility for the government of Nova Scotia to Blanchard.(In honour of the role he played in securing Confederation, Tupper was made a in The Most Honourable Order of the Bath in 1867.(  As such, he was now entitled to use the postnomial letters CB.Career in the Parliament of Canada, 18671884Fighting the Anti-Confederates, 18671869The first elections for the new House of Commons were held in AugustSeptember 1867.  Tupper ran as a member for the new federal riding of Cumberland and won his seat.(  However, Tupper was the only pro-Confederation candidate to win a seat from Nova Scotia in the Canadian Parliament, with Joseph Howe and the Anti-Confederates winning every other seat.(  thumb|right|Tupper in April 1870.As an ally of Sir John A. Macdonald and the Party, it was widely believed that Tupper would have a place in the first of Canada.(  However, when Macdonald ran into difficulties in organizing this cabinet, Tupper stepped aside in favour of Kenny.(  Instead, Tupper set up a medical practice in Ottawa and was elected as the first president of the new Medical Association, a position he held until 1870.(In November 1867, in provincial elections in Nova Scotia, the pro-Confederation Hiram Blanchard was defeated by the leader of the Anti-Confederation Party, Annand.  Given the unpopularity of Confederation within Nova Scotia, Joseph Howe traveled to London in 1868 to attempt to persuade the British government (headed by the earl of Derby, and then after February 1868 by Disraeli) to allow Nova Scotia to secede from Confederation.(  Tupper followed Howe to London where he successfully lobbied British politicians against allowing Nova Scotia to secede.(Following his victory in London, Tupper proposed a reconciliation with Howe: in exchange for Howes agreeing to stop fighting against the union, Tupper and Howe would be allies in the fight to protect Nova Scotias interests within Confederation.(  Howe agreed to Tuppers proposal and in January 1869 entered the Canadian cabinet as of the Queens Privy Council for Canada.(With the outbreak of the River Rebellion in 1869, Tupper was distressed to find that his daughter Emmas husband was being held hostage by Riel and the rebels.( He rushed to the northwest to rescue his son-in-law.(150px|thumb|left|Tupper in November 1871.President of the Queens Privy Council for Canada, 18701872When Howes health declined the next year, Tupper finally entered the Canadian Ministry by becoming Privy Council president in June 1870.(The next year was dominated by a dispute with the U.S. regarding American access to the Atlantic fisheries.(  Tupper thought that the British should restrict American access to these fisheries so that they could negotiate from a position of strength.(  When Prime Minister Macdonald traveled to represent Canadas interests at the negotiations leading up to the of Washington (1871), Tupper served as Macdonalds liaison with the federal cabinet.(Minister of Inland Revenue, 18721873On July 2, 1872, Tuppers service as Privy Council president ended and he became Minister of Inland Revenue.(Tupper led the Nova Scotia campaign for the Liberal-Conservative party during the Canadian federal election of 1872.(  His efforts paid off when Nova Scotia returned not a single Anti-Confederate of Parliament to the Canadian Parliament, and 20 of Nova Scotias 21 MPs were Liberal-Conservatives.(  (The Liberal-Conservative Party changed its name to the Conservative Party in 1873.)Minister of Customs, 18731874150px|thumb|right|Tupper in August 1873.In February 1873, Tupper was shifted from Inland Revenue to become of Customs, and in this position he was successful in having British weights and measures adopted as the uniform standard for the united colonies.(  He would not hold this post for long, however, as Macdonalds government was rocked by the Scandal throughout 1873.  In November 1873, the 1st Canadian Ministry was forced to resign and was replaced by the Canadian Ministry headed by Liberal Mackenzie.Years in Opposition, 18741878Tupper had not been involved in the Pacific Scandal, but he nevertheless continued to support Macdonald and his Conservative colleagues both before and after the 1874 election.(  The 1874 election was disastrous for the Conservatives, and in Nova Scotia, Tupper was one of only two Conservative MPs returned to the Canadian Parliament.(  Though Macdonald stayed on as Conservative leader, Tupper now assumed a more prominent role in the Conservative Party and was widely seen as Macdonalds heir apparent.(  He led Conservative attacks on the Mackenzie government throughout the 3rd Parliament.(  The Mackenzie government attempted to negotiate a new trade agreement with the United States to replace the Reciprocity Treaty which the U.S. had abrogated in 1864.(  When Mackenzie proved unable to achieve reciprocity, Tupper began shifting towards protectionism and became a proponent of the Policy which became a part of the Conservative platform in 1876.(  The sincerity of Tuppers conversion to the protectionist cause was doubted at the time, however: according to one apocryphal story, when Tupper came to the 1876 debate on Finance Minister John Cartwrights budget, he was prepared to advocate trade if Cartwright had announced that the Liberals had shifted their position and were now supporting protectionism.(Tupper was also deeply critical of Mackenzies approach to railways, arguing that the completion of the Pacific Railway, which would link Columbia (which entered Confederation in 1871) with the rest of Canada, should be a stronger government priority than it was for Mackenzie.(  This position also became an integral part of the Conservative platform.As on previous occasions when he was not in cabinet, Tupper was active in practicing medicine during the 187478 stint in Opposition, though he was dedicating less and less of his time to medicine during this period.(Tupper was a councillor of the Military College in Cowley and Oxford Oxfordshire from 18761896.Minister of Public Works, 18781879During the 1878 election Tupper again led the Conservative campaign in Nova Scotia.(  The Conservatives under Macdonald won a resounding majority in the election, in the process capturing 16 of Nova Scotias 21 seats in the Canadian Parliament.(With the formation of the Canadian Ministry in October 1878, Tupper became Minister of Public Works.(  His top priority was completion of the Canadian Pacific Railway, which he saw as an Imperial Highway across the Continent of America entirely on British soil.(  This marked a shift in Tuppers position: although he had long argued that completion of the railway should be a major government priority, while Tupper was in Opposition, he argued that the railway should be privately constructed; he now argued that the railway ought to be completed as a work, partly because he believed that the private sector could not complete the railroad given the recession which gripped the country throughout the 1870s.(Minister of Railways and Canals, 18791884In May 1879, Macdonald decided that completion of the railway was such a priority that he created a new ministry to focus just on railways and canals, and Tupper became Canadas first Minister of Railways and Canals.(  Tuppers motto as Minister of Railways and Canals was Develop our resources.(  He stated I have always supposed that the great object, in every country, and especially in a new country, was to draw as many capitalists into it as possible.(Tupper traveled to London in summer 1879 to attempt to persuade the British government (then headed by the earl of Beaconsfield in his second term as prime minister) to guarantee a bond sale to be used to construct the railway.(  He was not successful, though he did manage to purchase 50,000 tons of steel rails at a bargain price.(  Tuppers old friend Sandford Fleming oversaw the railway construction, but his inability to keep costs down led to political controversy, and Tupper was forced to remove Fleming as Chief Engineer in May 1880.(1879 also saw Tupper made a Commander of the Order of St Michael and St George, and thus entitled to use the postnominal letters KCMG.(thumb|left|Tupper in September 1881.In 1880, George Stephen approached Tupper on behalf of a syndicate and asked to be allowed to take over construction of the railway.(  Convinced that Stephens syndicate was up to the task, Tupper convinced the cabinet to back the plan at a meeting in June 1880 and, together with Macdonald, negotiated a contract with the syndicate in October.(  The syndicate successfully created the Canadian Pacific Railway Company in February 1881 and assumed construction of the railway shortly thereafter.(In the next years, Tupper would be a vocal supporter of the CPR during its competition with the Trunk Railway.(  In December 1883, he worked out a rescue plan for the CPR after it faced financial difficulties and persuaded his party and Parliament to accept the plan.(In addition to his support for completion of the CPR, Tupper also actively managed the existing railways in the colonies.(  Shortly after becoming minister in 1879, he forced the Railway to lower its freight rates, which had been a major grievance of Maritime business interests.(  He then forced the Grand Trunk Railway to sell its Rivire-du-Loup line to the Intercolonial Railway to complete a link between Halifax and the Lawrence Seaway.(  Furthermore, he refused to give the CPR rights over the Intercolonial Railway, though he did convince the CPR to build the Short Line from Halifax to Saint John.(In terms of canals, Tuppers time as Minister of Railways and Canals is notable for large expenditures on widening the Canal and deepening the Lawrence Seaway.(Deterioration of relationship with Macdonald and appointment as High CommissionerA rift developed between Tupper and Macdonald in 1879 over Sandford Fleming, whom Tupper supported but whom Macdonald wanted removed as Chief Engineer of the CPR.(  This rift was partially healed and Tupper and Macdonald managed to work together during the negotiations with George Stephens syndicate in 1880, but the men were no longer close, and Tupper no longer seemed to be Macdonalds heir apparent.(  By early 1881, Tupper had determined that he should leave the cabinet.(  In March 1881, he asked Macdonald to appoint him as Canadas High Commissioner in London.  Macdonald initially refused, and Tilloch Galt retained the High Commissioners post.(During the 1882 election, Tupper campaigned only in Nova Scotia (he normally campaigned throughout the country): he was again successful, with the Conservatives winning 14 of Nova Scotias 21 seats in the Canadian Parliament.(  The 1882 election was personally significant for Tupper because it saw his son, Hibbert Tupper, elected as MP for Pictou.(Canadian High Commissioner to the United Kingdom, 18831895Early years as High Commissioner, 18831887Image:TupperUniform.jpg|thumb|Sir Charles Tupper in dress, ca 1883.Tupper remained committed to leaving Ottawa, however, and in May 1883, he moved to London to become unpaid High Commissioner, though he did not surrender his ministerial position at the time.(  Soon, however, he was facing criticism that the two posts were incompatible, and in May 1884, he resigned from cabinet and the House of Commons and became full-time paid High Commissioner.(During his time as High Commissioner, Tupper sought to vigorously defend Canadas rights.(  Thus, although he was not a full plenipotentiary, he represented Canada at a Paris conference in 1883, where he openly disagreed with the British delegation; and in 1884 was allowed to conduct negotiations for a Canadian commercial treaty with Spain.(Tupper was concerned with promoting to Canada and made several tours of various countries in Europe to encourage immigrants to move to Canada.( A report in 1883  acknowledges the work of Sir Charles Tupper:As directing emigration from the United Kingdom and also the Continent, his work has been greatly valuable; and especially in reference to the arrangements made by him on the Continent and in Ireland.  The High Commissioner for Canada, Sir Charles Tupper, has been aided during the past year by the same Emigration Agents of the Department in the United Kingdom as in 1882, namely, Mr. John Dyke, Liverpool; Mr. Thomas Grahame, Glasgow; Mr. Charles Foy, Belfast; Mr. Thomas Connolly, Dublin, and Mr. J.W. Down, Bristol. On the Continent, Dr. Otto Hahn, of Reutlingen, has continued to act as Agent in Germany.(Immigrants to Canada 1883)In 1883, Tupper convinced Ewart Gladstones government to exempt Canadian cattle from the general British ban on importing American cattle by demonstrating that Canadian cattle was free of disease.(His other duties as High Commissioner included: putting Canadian exporters in contact with British importers; negotiating loans for the Canadian government and the CPR; helping to organize the and Indian Exhibition of 1886; arranging for a subsidy for the mail ship from British Columbia to the Orient; and lobbying on behalf of a British-Pacific cable along the lines of the telegraph cable and for a faster transatlantic ship.(Tupper was also present at the founding meeting of the Federation League in July 1884, where he argued against a resolution which said that the only options open to the British Empire were Federation or disintegration.(  Tupper believed that a form of limited federation was possible and desirable.(Interlude as Minister of Finance, 188718881884 saw the election of Liberal Stevens Fielding as Premier of Nova Scotia after Fielding campaigned on a platform of leading Nova Scotia out of Confederation.(  As such, throughout 1886, Macdonald begged Tupper to return to Canada to fight the Anti-Confederates.(  In January 1887, Tupper returned to Canada to rejoin the 3rd Canadian Ministry as Minister of Finance of Canada, all the while retaining his post as High Commissioner.(  During the 1887 federal election, Tupper again presented the pro-Confederation argument to the people of Nova Scotia, and again the Conservatives won 14 of Nova Scotias 21 seats in the Canadian Parliament.(During his year as finance minister, Tupper retained the governments commitment to protectionism, even extending it to the and steel industry.(  By this point, Tupper was convinced that Canada was ready to move on to its second stage of industrial development.(  In part, he held out the prospect of the development of a great iron industry as an inducement to keep Nova Scotia from seceding.(Tuppers unique position of being both Minister of Finance and High Commissioner to London served him well in an emerging crisis in relations: in 1885, the U.S. abrogated the fisheries clause of the Treaty of Washington (1871), and the Canadian government retaliated against American fishermen with a narrow reading of the of 1818.(  Acting as High Commissioner, Tupper pressured the British government (then led by Lord Salisbury) to stand firm in defending Canadas rights.(  The result was the appointment of a Joint Commission in 1887, with Tupper serving as one of the three British commissioners to negotiate with the Americans.(  Salisbury selected Chamberlain as one of the British commissioners.(  John Thompson served as the British delegations legal counsel.(  During the negotiations, Secretary of State F. Bayard complained that Mr. Chamberlain has yielded the control of the negotiations over to Sir Charles Tupper, who subjects the questions to the demands of Canadian politics.(  The result of the negotiations was a treaty (the Treaty of Washington of 1888) that made such concessions to Canada that it was ultimately rejected by the Senate in February 1888.(  However, although the treaty was rejected, the Commission had managed to temporarily resolve the dispute.Following the conclusion of these negotiations, Tupper decided to return to London to become High-Commissioner full-time.(  Macdonald attempted to persuade Tupper to stay in Ottawa: during the political crisis surrounding the 1885 Rebellion, Macdonald had pledged to nominate Sir Hector-Louis Langevin as his successor; Macdonald now told Tupper that he would break this promise and nominate Tupper as his successor.(  Tupper was not convinced, however, and resigned as Minister of Finance on May 23, 1888, and moved back to London.(Later years as High Commissioner, 18881895100px|thumb|left|Statuette of Tupper by W.C. Archibald, 1889.For Tuppers work on the Joint Commission, Joseph Chamberlain arranged for Tupper to become a baronet of the United Kingdom, and the Baronetcy was created on September 13, 1888.(In 1889, tensions were high between the U.S. and Canada when the U.S. banned Canadians from engaging in the hunt in the Sea as part of the ongoing Sea Dispute between the U.S. and Britain.(  Tupper traveled to D.C. to represent Canadian interests during the negotiations and was something of an embarrassment to the British diplomats.(When, in 1890, the provincial secretary of Newfoundland, Bond, negotiated a fisheries treaty with the U.S. that Tupper felt was not in Canadas interest, Tupper successfully persuaded the British government (then under Lord Salisburys second term) to reject the treaty.(As noted above, Tupper remained an active politician during his time as High Commissioner, which was controversial because diplomats are traditionally expected to be nonpartisan.(  (Tuppers successor as High Commissioner, Donald Smith would succeed in turning the High Commissioners office into a nonpartisan office.)  As such, Tupper returned to Canada to campaign on behalf of the Conservatives National Policy during the 1891 election.(  Image:Tupperfamily.jpg|150px|thumb|right|Sir Charles Tupper with his son Charles Hibbert Tupper and his grandson, March 1891.Tupper continued to be active in the Imperial Federation League, though after 1887, the League was split over the issue of regular colonial contribution to imperial defense.(  As a result, the League was ultimately dissolved in 1893, for which some people blamed Tupper.(With respect to the British Empire, Tupper advocated a system of mutual preferential trading.  In a series of articles in Nineteenth Century in 1891 and 1892, Tupper denounced the position that Canada should unilaterally reduce its tariff on British goods.(  Rather, he argued that any such tariff reduction should only come as part of a wider trade agreement in which tariffs on Canadian goods would also be reduced at the same time.(Sir John A. Macdonalds death in 1891 opened the possibility of Tupper replacing him as minister of Canada, but Tupper enjoyed life in London and decided against returning to Canada.(  He recommended that his son support Sir John Thompsons prime ministerial bid.(Tupper becomes prime minister, 18951896Sir John Thompson died suddenly in office in December 1894.  Many observers expected the General of Canada, Lord Aberdeen, to invite Tupper to return to Canada to become prime minister.(  However, Lord Aberdeen disliked Tupper and instead invited Mackenzie Bowell to replace Thompson as prime minister.(  Image:TupperCartoon.jpg|thumb|left|Sir Charles Tupper et le parlement: cartoon from February 1896.The greatest challenge facing Bowell as prime minister was the Schools Question.  The Conservative Party was bitterly divided as to how to handle the Manitoba Schools Question, and as a result, on January 4, 1896, seven cabinet ministers resigned, demanding the return of Tupper.(  As a result, Bowell and Aberdeen were forced to invite Tupper to join the Canadian Ministry and on January 15 Tupper became of State for Canada, with the understanding that he would become prime minister following the dissolution of the Canadian Parliament.(  Returning to Canada, Tupper was elected to the 7th Canadian Parliament as member for Cape Breton during a by-election held on February 4, 1896.(  At this point,  Tupper was the de facto prime minister, though legally Bowell was still prime minister.(Tuppers position on the Manitoba Schools Act was that French Catholics in Manitoba had been promised the right to separate state-funded French-language Catholic schools in the Act of 1870.(  Thus, even though he personally opposed French-language Catholic schools in Manitoba, he believed that the government should stand by its promise and therefore oppose McCarthys Schools Act.(  He maintained this position even after the Manitoba Schools Act was upheld by the Committee of the Privy Council.(  In 1895, the Judicial Committee of the Privy Council had also ruled that the Canadian federal government could pass remedial legislation to overrule the Manitoba Schools Act (see and reservation).(  Thus, in February 1896, Tupper introduced this remedial legislation in the House of Commons.(  The bill was filibustered by a combination of extreme Protestants led by McCarthy and Liberals led by Laurier.(  This filibuster resulted in Tupper abandoning the bill and asking for a dissolution.(Prime Minister of Canada, MayJuly 1896thumb|right|Portrait of Tupper, January 1896.Parliament was dissolved on April 24, 1896, and the Canadian Ministry with Tupper as prime minister was sworn in on May 1( making him, with Turner and Campbell, the only Prime Ministers to never sit in Parliament as Prime Minister. Tupper remains the oldest person ever to become Canadian prime minister, at 74.Throughout the 1896 election campaign, Tupper argued that the real issue of the election was the future of Canadian industry, and insisted that Conservatives needed to unite to defeat the of Industry.(  However, the Conservatives were so bitterly divided over the Manitoba Schools Question that wherever he spoke, he was faced with a barrage of criticism, most notably at a two-hour address he gave at Hall in Toronto, which was constantly interrupted by the crowd.(Wilfrid Laurier, on the other hand, modified the traditional Liberal stance on free trade and embraced aspects of the National Policy.(  In the end, the Conservatives won the most votes in the 1896 election (48.2% of the votes, in comparison to 41.4% for the Liberals).  However, they captured only about half of the seats in Canada, while Lauriers Liberals won a landslide victory in Quebec, where Tuppers reputation as an ardent imperialist was a major handicap.(  Tuppers inability to persuade Chapleau to return to active politics as his lieutenant was the nail in the coffin for the Conservatives campaign in Quebec.(Although Laurier had clearly won the election on June 24, Tupper initially refused to cede power, insisting that Laurier would be unable to form a government.(  However, when Tupper attempted to make appointments as prime minister, Lord Aberdeen stepped in, dismissing Tupper and inviting Laurier to form a government.(  Tupper maintained that Lord Aberdeens actions were unconstitutional.(Tuppers 68 days is the shortest term of all prime ministers.  His administration never faced a Parliament.Leader of the Opposition, 18961900Charles and Lady Tupper, October 1896.As Leader of the Opposition during the Canadian Parliament, Tupper attempted to regain the loyalty of those Conservatives who had deserted the party over the Schools Question.(  He played up loyalty to the British Empire.(  Tupper strongly supported Canadian participation in the Boer War, which broke out in 1899, and criticized Laurier for not doing enough to support Britain in the war.(The 1900 election saw the Conservatives pick up 17 Ontario seats in the Canadian Parliament.(  This was a small consolation, however, as Laurier and the Liberals won a definitive majority and had a clear mandate for a second term.(  What was worse for Tupper, for the first time ever, was the fact he had failed to carry his own seat, losing the Cape Breton seat to Liberal Alexander Johnston.(  In November 1900, two weeks after the election, Tupper stepped down as leader of the Conservative Party of Canada and Leader of the Opposition - the caucus chose as his successor fellow Nova Scotian Laird Borden.(Later years, 19011915Following his defeat in the 1900 election, Tupper and his wife settled with their daughter Emma in Bexleyheath in southeast London.(  He continued to make frequent trips to Canada to visit his sons Hibbert Tupper and Johnston Tupper, both of whom were Canadian politicians.(Image:TupperCrownLife.jpg|thumb|right|Tupper at a meeting of the directors of the Life Insurance Company in Toronto, ca 1900.On November 9, 1907, Tupper became a member of the British Privy Council.(  He was also promoted to the rank of Grand Cross of the Order of St Michael and St George, which made him entitled to use the postnominal letters GCMG.(Tupper remained interested in imperial politics, and particularly with promoting Canadas place within the British Empire.  He sat on the executive committee of the Empire League and advocated closer economic ties between Canada and Britain, while continuing to oppose Imperial Federation and requests for Canada to make a direct contribution to imperial defense costs (though he supported Bordens decision to voluntarily make an emergency contribution of dreadnoughts to the Navy in 1912).(In his retirement, Tupper wrote his memoirs, entitled Recollections of Sixty Years in Canada, which were published in 1914.(  He also gave a series of interviews to journalist W. A. Harkin which formed the basis of a second book published in 1914, entitled Political Reminiscences of the Right Honourable Sir Charles Tupper.(Tuppers wife, Lady Tupper died in May 1912.  His eldest son Orin died in April 1915 .On October 30, 1915, in Bexleyheath, Tupper died of heart failure.( He was the last of the original of Confederation to die, and had lived the longest life of any Canadian prime minister, at 94 years, four months. ( His body was returned to Canada on board the HMS Blenheim (the same vessel that had carried the body of Tuppers colleague, Sir John Thompson to Halifax when Thompson died in England in 1894) and he was buried in Johns Cemetery, Halifax in Halifax following a funeral with a mile-long procession.(LegacyTupper will be most remembered as a of Confederation, and his long career as a federal cabinet minister, rather than his brief time as Prime Minister. As the of Nova Scotia from 1864 to 1867, he led Scotia into Confederation and persuaded Howe to join the new federal government, bringing an end to the anti-Confederation movement in Nova Scotia.In their 1999 study of the Canadian Prime Ministers through Chrtien, Granatstein and Hillmer included the results of a survey of Canadian historians ranking the Prime Ministers.  Tupper ranked #16 out of the 20 up to that time, due to his extremely short tenure in which he was unable to accomplish anything of significance. Historians noted that despite Tuppers elderly age, he showed a determination and spirit during his brief time as Prime Minister that almost beat Laurier in the 1896 election(Granatstein and Hillman, Prime Ministers: Ranking Canadas Leaders, p. 45.)See also* of Canadian Prime MinistersExternal links* * *Biography from First Among Equals*Biography from Library and Archives Canada website*The Life of Sir Charles Tupper from the June 1939 edition of the Journal of the Canadian Medical Association*The Right Hon. Sir Charles Tupper, P.C., G.C.M.G., C.B., LL.D., M.D., 18211915 from the 12 June 1965 edition of the Journal of the Canadian Medical Association*Sir John and Sir Charles, or The Secrets of the Syndicate - an 1881 Shakespearean satire on Macdonald and Tuppers roles in awarding George Stephens syndicate control of the Canadian Pacific Railway*Tuppers grave site*Sir Charles Tupper- The Big Man, a short Film Board film about Tupper.References *Howe, Hon. Mr. Howes Speech on Dr. Tuppers Railway Resolution. House of assembly. Monday, 9 April 1860.  (1860)*Joseph Howe, Speech of the Honorable Provincial Secretary, In reply to Doctor Tupper, On the Subject of Retrenchment. Wednesday, March 25  (1863)*Charles Tupper, A Letter to the Right Honourable the Earl of Carnarvon: In Reply to a Pamphlet Entitled Confederation Considered in Relation to the Interests of the Empire  (1866)*Charles Tupper, Letter from the Hon. Dr. Tupper, C.B., to the Hon. James McDonald, M.P.P.  (1872)*The Pacific Railway: Speeches Delivered by Hon. Sir Charles Tupper, K.C.M.G., Minister of Railways and Canals, Hon. H.L. Langevin, C.B., Minister of Public Works, J.B. Plumbs, Esq., M.P., (Niagara), Thomas White, Esq., M.P., (Cardwell), During the Debate in the House of Commons, Session 1880  (1880)*Charles Tupper, Le chemin de fer canadien du Pacifique: discours. Expos complet de la question.  (1880)*Charles Tupper, Official Report of the Speech Delivered by Hon. Sir Charles Tupper, K.C.M.G., C.B., Minister of Raillways sic and Canals, On the Canadian Pacific Railway  (1882)*Charles Thibault, Biography of Sir Charles Tupper, Minister of Railway ... High Commissioner of Canada to England  (1883)*Charles Tupper, Unrestricted Reciprocity; Speech ... Delivered in the House of Commons, on Monday, March 19, 1888  (1888)*Charles Tupper, Preferential Trade Relations Between Great Britain and Her Colonies: An Address Delivered before the Montreal Board of Trade, January 20, 1896  (1896)*Charles Tupper, Speech on the Remedial Bill, Ottawa, 18 March 1896.  (1896)*Henry J. Morgan, Ad Multos Annos: A Tribute to Sir Charles Tupper on His Political Birthday, 1900  (1900)*E. M. Saunders, Three Premiers of Nova Scotia: The Hon. J. W. Johnstone, The Hon. Joseph Howe, The Hon. Charles Tupper   (1909)*Charles Tupper, Political Reminiscences of the Right Honourable Sir Charles Tupper, Bart., ed. W. A. Harkin (1914)*The Life and Letters of the Rt. Hon. Sir Charles Tupper, Bart., K.C.M.G., ed. E. M. Saunders, 2 vols.  (1916)*J. W. Longley, Sir Charles Tupper  (1916)*Supplement to the Life and Letters of the Rt. Hon. Sir Charles Tupper, Bart., G.C.M.G., ed. C. H. Tupper  (1926)*W. M. Whitelaw, The Maritimes and Canada Before Confederation  (1934)*H. G. Skilling, Canadian Representation Abroad: From Agency to Embassy  (1945)*A. W. MacIntosh, The Career of Sir Charles Tupper in Canada, 18641900, Ph.D. thesis, of Toronto  (1960)*G. R. Stevens, Canadian National Railways, 2 vols.  (196062)*D. H. Tait, The Role of Charles Tupper in Nova Scotian Politics, 18551870, M.A. thesis, University  (1962)*J. M. Robinson, A Canadian at the Court of Queen Victoria: The High Commissionership, 18801895, M.A. thesis, of Calgary  (1967)*L. C. Clark, A History of the Conservative Administrations, 1891 to 1896, Ph.D. thesis, University of Toronto  (1968)*Ian Wilson, Fleming and Tupper: The Fall of the Siamese Twins, 1880, in Character and Circumstance: Essays in Honour of Donald Grant Creighton, ed. J. S. Moir  (1970)*P. B. Waite, The Life and Times of Confederation, 18641867: Politics, Newspapers, and the Union of British North America  (1971)*P. B. Waite, Canada, 18741896: Arduous Destiny  (1971)*D. A. Muise, Elections and Constituencies: Federal Politics in Nova Scotia, 18671878, Ph.D. thesis, of Western Ontario  (1971)*K. M. McLaughlin, Race, Religion and Politics: The Election of 1896 in Canada, Ph.D. thesis, University of Toronto  (1974)*Robert Page, Tuppers Last Hurrah: The Years as Opposition Leader, 18961900 in The West and the Nation: Essays in Honour of W. L. Morton, ed. Carl Berger and Ramsay Cook  (1976)*H. C. Cameron, Nova Scotians in the Federal Cabinet, 18671878, M.A. thesis, University  (1976)*W. K. Lamb, History of the Canadian Pacific Railway  (1977)*K. G. Pryke, Nova Scotia and Confederation, 186474  (1979)*R. P. Langhout, Developing Nova Scotia: Railways and Public Accounts, 18491867, Acadiensis 14.2  (198485)*Vincent Durant, War Horse of Cumberland: The Life and Times of Sir Charles Tupper  (1985)*Ben Forster, A Conjunction of Interests: Business, Politics, and Tariffs, 18251879  (1986)*R. P. Langhout, Public Enterprise: An Analysis of Public Finance in the Maritime Colonies During the Period of Responsible Government, Ph.D. thesis, of New Brunswick  (1989)*Ben Forster, The 1870s: Political Integration in The Atlantic Provinces in Confederation, ed. E. R. Forbes and D. A. Muise  (1993)*I. P. A. Buckner, The 1860s: An End and a Beginning in The Atlantic Region to Confederation, ed. P. A. Buckner and John Reid  (1994)*Jock Murray and Janet Murray, Sir Charles Tupper: Fighting Doctor to Father of Confederation  (1998)*J.L. Granatstein and Norman Hillmer, Prime Ministers: Ranking Canadas Leaders (1999)*Johanna Bertin, Sir Charles Tupper: The Bully for Any Great Cause  (2006)list  PLACE OF DEATHBexleyheath, KentTupperTupperTupperTupperTupperTupperTupperTupperTupperTupperzh:
5987
Coal
Coal is a combustible black or brownish-black rock normally occurring in rock strata in layers or veins called coal beds or coal seams. The harder forms, such as anthracite coal, can be regarded as rock because of later exposure to elevated temperature and pressure. Coal is composed primarily of carbon along with variable quantities of other elements, chiefly  hydrogen, with smaller quantities of sulfur, oxygen and nitrogen. Formation Coal begins as layers of plant matter accumulating at the bottom of a body of water. For the process to continue, the plant matter must be protected from biodegradation and oxidization, usually by mud or acidic water.  This traps their carbon in immense peat bogs that are eventually covered over and deeply buried by sediments. Under this compression the plant material is metamorphosed into coal: over time, the chemical and physical properties of the plant remains are changed by geological action to create a solid material.()The wide shallow seas of the Carboniferous period provided ideal conditions for coal formation, although coal is known from most geological periods.  The exception is the gap in the Lower Triassic, where coal is rare: presumably a result of the mass extinction which prefaced this era.  Coal is even known from Precambrian strata, which predate land plants: this coal is presumed to have originated from algal residues.()()Coal, a fuel, is the largest source of energy for the generation of electricity worldwide, as well as one of the largest worldwide anthropogenic sources of dioxide releases. Gross carbon dioxide emissions from coal usage are slightly more than those from petroleum and about double the amount from gas.(The EIA reports the following emissions in million metric tons of carbon dioxide:*Nat gas: 5,840*Petroleum: 10,995*Coal: 11,357For 2005 as the official energy statistics of the US Government.http://www.eia.doe.gov/iea/carbon.html) Coal is extracted from the ground by mining, either underground by mining through the seams or in open pits. Types Mines Point Aconi Seam 038.JPG|thumb|300px|Coastal exposure of the Point Aconi Seam (bituminous coal; Pennsylvanian).File:LateCarboniferousGlobal.jpg|thumb|300px|Believed approximate position of the proto-continents toward the end of the period; the light blue represents shallow seas where many of todays coal deposits are found, as opposed to deeper waters which gave rise to oil-bearing rocks derived from marine species. The ice caps were known to be very large, lowering sea levels extensively by locking up oceanic waters into solid ice, though how large the ice caps became is a matter of debate.As geological processes apply pressure to dead material over time, under suitable conditions it is transformed successively into:* Peat, considered to be a precursor of coal, has industrial importance as a fuel in some regions, for example, Ireland and Finland. In its dehydrated form, peat is a highly effective absorbent for fuel and oil spills on land and water* Lignite, also referred to as brown coal, is the lowest rank of coal and used almost exclusively as fuel for electric power generation. Jet is a compact form of lignite that is sometimes polished and has been used as an ornamental stone since the Palaeolithic* coal, whose properties range from those of lignite to those of bituminous coal are used primarily as fuel for steam-electric power generation. Additionally, it is an important source of light hydrocarbons for the synthesis industry.* coal, dense sedimentary rock, black but sometimes dark brown, often with well-defined bands of bright and dull material, used primarily as fuel in steam-electric power generation, with substantial quantities also used for heat and power applications in manufacturing and to make coke* Steam coal is a grade between bituminous coal and anthracite, once widely used as a fuel for locomotives. In this specialized use it is sometimes known as sea-coal in the U.S.(and Wagnalls, quoted in ) Small steam coal (dry small steam nuts or DSSN) was used as a fuel for domestic heating* Anthracite, the highest rank; a harder, glossy, black coal used primarily for residential and commercial heating. It may be divided further into metamorphically altered bituminous coal and petrified oil, as from the deposits in Pennsylvania* Graphite, technically the highest rank, but difficult to ignite and is not so commonly used as fuel: it is mostly used in pencils and, when powdered, as a lubricant.The classification of coal is generally based on the content of volatiles. However, the exact classification varies between countries. According to the German classification, coal is classified as follows:(Eberhard Lindner; Chemie fr Ingenieure; Lindner Verlag Karlsruhe, S. 258)The middle six grades in the table represent a progressive transition from the English-language sub-bituminous to bituminous coal, while the last class is an approximate equivalent to anthracite, but more inclusive (the U.S. anthracite has 2) gas. This syngas can then be converted into transportation fuels like gasoline and diesel through the process. This technology is currently used by the Sasol chemical company of Africa to make gasoline from coal and natural gas. Alternatively, the hydrogen obtained from gasification can be used for various purposes such as powering a economy, making ammonia, or upgrading fossil fuels.During gasification, the coal is mixed with oxygen and steam (vapor) while also being heated and pressurized. During the reaction, oxygen and water molecules oxidize the coal into carbon monoxide (CO) while also releasing hydrogen (H2) gas. This process has been conducted in both underground coal mines and in coal refineries.: (Coal) + O2 + H2O  H2 + COIf the refiner wants to produce gasoline, the syngas is collected at this state and routed into a Fischer-Tropsch reaction. If hydrogen is the desired end-product, however, the syngas is fed into the gas shift reaction where more hydrogen is liberated.: CO + H2O  CO2 + H2High prices of oil and natural gas are leading to increased interest in BTU Conversion technologies such as gasification, methanation and liquefaction. The Fuels Corporation was a U.S. government-funded corporation established in 1980 to create a market for alternatives to imported fossil fuels (such as coal gasification). The corporation was discontinued in 1985.In the past, coal was converted to make coal gas, which was piped to customers to burn for illumination, heating, and cooking. At present, the safer natural gas is used instead.LiquefactionCoal can also be converted into liquid fuels such as gasoline or diesel by several different processes. In the direct liquefaction processes, the coal is either hydrogenated or carbonized. Hydrogenation processes are the process,(Robert Haul: Bergius (1884-1949), p. 62 in Chemie in unserer Zeit, VCH-Verlagsgesellschaft mbH, 19. Jahrgang, April 1985, Weinheim, Germany) the SRC-I and SRC-II (Solvent Refined Coal) processes and the NUS Corporation hydrogenation process.()() In the process of low-temperature carbonization, coal is coked at temperatures between 360 C (680 F) and 750 C (1,380 F). These temperatures optimize the production of coal tars richer in lighter hydrocarbons than normal coal tar. The coal tar is then further processed into fuels. Alternatively, coal can be converted into a gas first, and then into a liquid, by using the process. An overview of coal liquefaction and its future potential is available.(Hk, M., Aleklett, K., 2009. A review on coal to liquid fuels and its coal consumption, International Journal of Energy Research, article in press Link)Coal liquefaction methods involve carbon dioxide (CO2) emissions in the conversion process. If coal liquefaction is done without employing either capture and storage technologies or biomass blending, the result is lifecycle greenhouse gas footprints that are generally greater than those released in the extraction and refinement of liquid fuel production from oil. If CCS technologies are employed, reductions of 5-12% can be achieved in CTL plants and up to a 75% reduction is achievable when co-gasifying coal with commercially demonstrated levels of biomass (30% biomass by weight) in CBTL plants.() For most future fuel projects, dioxide sequestration is proposed to avoid releasing it into the atmosphere. Sequestration will, however, add to the cost of production. Currently all US and at least one Chinese synthetic fuel projects,() include sequestration in their process designs. Refined coal Refined coal is the product of a coal-upgrading technology that removes moisture and certain pollutants from lower-rank coals such as sub-bituminous and lignite (brown) coals. It is one form of several pre-combustion treatments and processes for coal that alter coals characteristics before it is burned. The goals of pre-combustion coal technologies are to increase efficiency and reduce emissions when the coal is burned. Depending on the situation, pre-combustion technology can be used in place of or as a supplement to post-combustion technologies to control emissions from coal-fueled boilers.Industrial processes  Finely ground bituminous coal, known in this application as sea coal, is a constituent of sand. While the molten metal is in the mould the coal burns slowly, releasing reducing gases at pressure and so preventing the metal from penetrating the pores of the sand. It is also contained in mould wash, a paste or liquid with the same function applied to the mould before casting.() Sea coal can be mixed with the clay lining (the bod) used for the bottom of a furnace. When heated the coal decomposes and the bod becomes slightly friable, easing the process of breaking open holes for tapping the molten metal.()Cultural usageCoal is the official state mineral of Kentucky() (even though coal is not a mineral) and the official state rock of Utah.() Both states have a historic link to coal mining.Some cultures uphold that children who misbehave will receive only a lump of coal from Claus for Christmas in their stockings instead of presents.It is also customary and lucky in Scotland and the North of England to give coal as a gift on New Years Day. It happens as part of First-Footing and represents warmth for the year to come.Coal as a traded commodityIn North America, Central Appalachian coal contracts are currently traded on the New York Mercantile Exchange (trading symbol QL). The trading unit is  per contract, and is quoted in U.S. dollars and cents per ton. Since coal is the principal fuel for generating electricity in the United States, coal futures contracts provide coal producers and the electric power industry an important tool for hedging and management.()In addition to the NYMEX contract, the IntercontinentalExchange (ICE) has European (Rotterdam) and South African (Richards Bay) coal futures available for trading. The trading unit for these contracts is , and are also quoted in U.S. dollars and cents per ton.()The price of coal increased from around $30.00 per ton in 2000 to around $150.00 per short ton as of September 2008. As of October 2008, the price per short ton had declined to $111.50. Prices further declined to $71.25 as of October 2010.(Coal News and Markets (Archive) Department of Energy -- see Bloomberg for realtime prices)Environmental effectsThere are a number of adverse health(Toxic Air: The Case for Cleaning Up Coal-fired Power PlantsReport by the American Lung Association http://www.lungusa.org/assets/documents/healthy-air/toxic-air-report.pdf) and environmental effects of coal burning(Environmental impacts of coal power:air pollution Union of Concerned Scientists http://www.ucsusa.org/clean_energy/coalvswind/c02c.html) especially in stations, and of mining. These effects include:* Coal-fired power plants shortened nearly 24,000 lives a year in the United States, including 2,800 from cancer(MSNBC Staff and Service. (2004)Deadly power plants? Study Fuels Debate: Thousands of Early Deaths Tied To Emissions. Retrieved 5 November 2008)* Generation of hundreds of millions of tons of waste products, including ash, ash, gas desulfurization sludge, that contain mercury, uranium, thorium, arsenic, and other metals* rain from high sulfur coal* Interference with groundwater and table levels* Contamination of land and waterways and destruction of homes from fly ash spills such as Fossil Plant coal fly ash slurry spill* Impact of water use on flows of rivers and consequential impact on other land-uses* Dust nuisance* Subsidence above tunnels, sometimes damaging infrastructure* Uncontrollable underground fires which may burn for decades or centuries.* Coal-fired power plants without effective fly ash capture are one of the largest sources of human-caused radiation exposure* Coal-fired power plants emit mercury, selenium, and arsenic which are harmful to human health and the environment(World Coal Association Environmental impact of Coal Use)* Release of carbon dioxide, a gas, which causes change and warming according to the IPCC and the EPA. Coal is the largest contributor to the human-made increase of CO2 in the air(http://www.columbia.edu/~jeh1/2007/IowaCoal_20071105.pdf) Economic aspects Coal liquefaction is one of the backstop technologies that could potentially limit escalation of prices and mitigate the effects of transportation energy shortage that will occur under oil. This is contingent on liquefaction production capacity becoming large enough to satiate the very large and growing demand for petroleum. Estimates of the cost of producing liquid fuels from coal suggest that domestic U.S. production of fuel from coal becomes cost-competitive with oil priced at around $35 per barrel,() with the $35 being the break-even cost. With oil prices as low as around $40 per barrel in the U.S. as of December 2008, liquid coal lost some of its economic allure in the U.S., but will probably be re-vitalized, similar to sand projects, with an oil price around $70 per barrel.  United StatesSome of the simplest economic costs of coal come in the form of subsidies and tax breaks which are not reflected in the market price of coal (for example the estimated $4.6 billion in coal-related subsidies in the 2009 stimulus package). Coal mining and combustion projects require major investments, and the risks and costs of those investments are often passed on to taxpayers via infrastructure subsidies and loan guarantees. An extreme example of this is the Healy Clean Coal Plant (HCCP), which has cost the State of Alaska and the Federal Government nearly $300 million since the mid 1990s yet is not producing power in return. Similarly, a recent study in Kentucky determined that the government spends $115 million more on subsidies for the coal industry in the state than it receives in taxes or other benefits.Taxpayers also pay the costs of cleaning up environmental disasters caused by the coal industry. Cleanup of the recent coal ash spill in Tennessee is estimated to cost up to $1 billion, not including pending litigation. Now that the cleanup at this site has been taken over by the EPA under the Superfund law, most of this cost will be borne by the US taxpayer.The health impacts of coal pollution have enormous economic costs, through health care costs and lost productivity. The Ontario government study estimated these costs as billions of dollars within Ontario alone. A similar recent study in West Virginia found that the cost associated with premature death due to coal mining was five times greater than all measurable economic benefits from the mining.Other industries depend on the ecosystems coal mining destroys. This economic impact on industries such as recreational fishing, commercial fishing, and tourism is particularly relevant in Alaska. Almost 55,000 direct jobs (full time equivalent basis, FTE) are closely linked to the health of Alaskas ecosystems. These jobs make up more than a quarter of Alaskan FTE employment and produce almost $2.6 billion of income for Alaska workers. These 55,000 ecosystem-dependent jobs dwarf the 350 estimated jobs that would be created by a project such as the Chuitna Coal strip mine.Negative effects on the economy lead to worse health in the population, which has an impact on health care costs, compounding the economic impact. Some people have used this to argue that coal has additional benefits to society. The argument is that coal provides cheap electricity, which is a boon to the economy, therefore health is improved, and health care costs are lowered. While this additional health effect should indeed be considered, it should be applied after the economic impacts discussed above. Once the costs of pollution, global warming, and habitat destruction are added to the benefits of cheap electricity, the economic impact of coal is no longer positive, and this additional health effect only makes it even more costly.ChinaIn China, due to an increasing need for liquid energy in the transportation sector, coal liquefaction projects were given high priority even during periods of oil prices below $40 per barrel.() This is probably because China prefers not to be dependent on foreign oil, instead utilizing its enormous domestic coal reserves. As oil prices were increasing during the first half of 2009, the coal liquefaction projects in China were again boosted, and these projects are profitable with an oil barrel price of $40.()China is by far the largest producer of coal in the world.(U.S. Energy Information Administration. 2008. World Coal Production, Most Recent Estimates 1980-2007 (October 2008). http://www.eia.doe.gov/emeu/international/coalproduction.html 11-2-08.) It has now become the worlds largest energy consumer() but relies on coal to supply about 70% of its energy needs.() An estimated 5 million people work in Chinas coal-mining industry.(Where The Coal Is Stained With Blood. TIME. March 2, 2007)Among commercially mature technologies, advantages for indirect coal liquefaction over direct coal liquefaction are reported by Williams and Larson (2003).Energy densityThe density of coal, i.e. its value, is roughly 24 megajoules per kilogram.()The energy density of coal can also be expressed in kilowatt-hours, the units that electricity is most commonly sold in, per units of mass to estimate how much coal is required to power electrical appliances. One kilowatt-hour is 3.6 MJ, so the energy density of coal is 6.67 kWh/kg. The typical thermodynamic efficiency of coal power plants is about 30%, so of the 6.67 kWh of energy per kilogram of coal, 30% of that2.0 kWh/kgcan successfully be turned into electricity; the rest is waste heat. So coal power plants obtain approximately 2.0 kWh per kilogram of burned coal.As an example, running one 100-watt lightbulb for one year requires 876 kWh (100 W  24 h/day  365 day/year  876000 Wh  876 kWh). Converting this power usage into physical coal consumption::\frac{876 \ \mathrm{kW \cdot h}}{2.0 \ \mathrm{kW} \cdot \mathrm{h/kg}}  438 \ \mathrm{kg \ of \ coal}  966 \ \mathrm{pounds \ of \ coal}For a coal power plant with a 40% efficiency, it takes 325 kg (714 lb) of coal to power a 100 W lightbulb for one year.() One should also take into account transmission and distribution losses caused by resistance and heating in the power lines, which is in the order of 510%, depending on distance from the power station and other factors. Carbon intensity Commercial coal has a carbon content of at least 70%. Coal with a heating value of 6.67 kWh per kilogram as quoted above has a carbon content of roughly 80%, which is: \frac{0.8 \ \mathrm{kg}}{\mathrm{12} \cdot \mathrm{kg/kmol}}  \frac{2}{30} \ \mathrm{kmol} , where 1 mol equals to NA (Avogadro Number) atoms.Carbon combines with oxygen in the atmosphere during combustion, producing carbon dioxide, with an atomic weight of (12 + 16  2  44 kg/kmol). The CO2 released to air for each kilogram of incinerated coal is therefore:\frac{2}{30} \ \mathrm{kmol} \cdot \frac{44 \ \mathrm{kg}}{\mathrm{kmol}}  \frac{88}{30} \ \mathrm{kg} \approx 2.93 \ \mathrm{kg}.This can be used to calculate an factor for CO2 from the use of coal power. Since the useful energy output of coal is about 30% of the 6.67 kWh/kg(coal), the burning of 1 kg of coal produces about 2 kWh of electrical energy. Since 1 kg coal emits 2.93 kg CO2, the direct CO2 emissions from coal power are 1.47 kg/kWh, or about 0.407 kg/MJ.The U.S. Energy Information Agencys 1999 report on CO2 emissions for energy generation,(CO2 Carbon Dioxide Emissions from the Generation of Electric Power in the United States, DOE, EPA, 1999) quotes a lower emission factor of 0.963 kg CO2/kWh for coal power. The same source gives a factor for oil power in the U.S. of 0.881 kg CO2/kWh, while natural gas has 0.569 kg CO2/kWh. Estimates for specific emission from power, hydro, and wind energy vary, but are about 100 times lower.Underground firesThere are hundreds of coal fires burning around the world.() Those burning underground can be difficult to locate and many cannot be extinguished. Fires can cause the ground above to subside, their combustion gases are dangerous to life, and breaking out to the surface can initiate surface wildfires. Coal seams can be set on fire by combustion or contact with a fire or surface fire. Lightning strikes are an important source of ignition, the coal continues to burn slowly back into the seam until oxygen (air) can no longer reach the flame front. A grass fire in a coal area can set dozens of coal seams on fire.()() Coal fires in China burn 109 million tons of coal a year, emitting 360 million metric tons of CO2. This contradicts the ratio of 1:1.83 given earlier, but it amounts to 2-3% of the annual worldwide production of CO2 from fuels.()() In Pennsylvania (a borough located in the Region of the States), an exposed vein of coal ignited in 1962 due to a trash fire in the borough landfill, located in an abandoned anthracite strip mine pit. Attempts to extinguish the fire were unsuccessful, and it continues to burn underground to this day. The Australian Mountain was originally believed to be a volcano, but the smoke and ash comes from a coal fire that has been burning for some 6,000 years.()At Kuh i Malik in Valley, Tajikistan, coal deposits have been burning for thousands of years, creating vast underground labyrinths full of unique minerals, some of them very beautiful. Local people once used this method to mine ammoniac. This place has been well-known since the time of Herodotus, but European geographers misinterpreted the Ancient Greek descriptions as the evidence of active volcanism in Turkestan (up to the 19th century, when the Russian army invaded the area).The reddish siltstone rock that caps many ridges and buttes in the River Basin (Wyoming), and in western Dakota is called porcelanite, which also may resemble the coal burning waste clinker or volcanic scoria.() Clinker is rock that has been fused by the natural burning of coal. In the Powder River Basin approximately 27 to 54 billion tons of coal burned within the past three million years.() Wild coal fires in the area were reported by the and Clark Expedition as well as explorers and settlers in the area.()Production trendsIn 2006, China was the top producer of coal with 38% share followed by the USA and India, according to the Geological Survey.World coal reservesThe 930 billion short tons of recoverable coal reserves estimated by the Energy Information Administration are equal to about 4,116 BBOE (billion barrels of oil equivalent). The amount of coal burned during 2007 was estimated at 7.075 billion short tons, or 133.179 quadrillion BTUs.() This is an average of 18.8 million BTU per short ton. In terms of heat content, this is about  of oil equivalent per day. By comparison in 2007, natural gas provided  of oil equivalent per day, while oil provided  per day.BP, in its 2007 report, estimated at 2006 end that there were 909,064 million tons of proven coal reserves worldwide, or 147 years ratio. This figure only includes reserves classified as proven; exploration drilling programs by mining companies, particularly in under-explored areas, are continually providing new reserves. In many cases, companies are aware of coal deposits that have not been sufficiently drilled to qualify as proven. However, some nations havent updated their information and assume reserves remain at the same levels even with withdrawals. Collective projections generally predict that global coal production may occur sometime around 2025 at 30 percent above current production in the best case scenario, depending on future coal production rates.(Coal: Resources and Future Production, 47 page report by Energy Watch group, March 28, 2007 (revised July 10, 2007))Of the three fossil fuels, coal has the most widely distributed reserves; coal is mined in over 100 countries, and on all continents except Antarctica. The largest reserves are found in the USA, Russia, China, India and Australia. Note the table below. Major coal producers The reserve life is an estimate based only on current production levels and proved reserves level for the countries shown, and makes no assumptions of future production or even current production trends. Countries with annual production higher than 100 million tonnes are shown. For comparison, data for the European Union is also shown.Shares are based on data expressed in tonnes oil equivalent. Major coal exporters Countries with annual export higher than 10 million tonnes are shown. Major coal importers Countries with annual import higher than 30 million tonnes are shown. See also * Asphaltene* Biochar* Carbochemistry* assay* dust* Measure (stratigraphic unit)* mining* phase out* Coal-tar* methane* bed combustion* coal producing regions* removal mining* Coal Question* Coal AssociationReferencesFurther reading* * * * * * * External links* Coal explained with coal terms for kids.* Energy KIDS  Coal page from USAs Department of Energy.* European Association for Coal and Lignite* Coal Online  International Energy Agency* World Coal Associationaf:Steenkoolan:Carbnas:ay:Killimakmrarangbn:zh-min-nan:Th-thobe:be-x-old:bs:Ugaljca:Carbcs:Uhlcy:Glo(bjergart)pdc:Kohlde:Kohlenv:Tsket:Kivissi()es:Carbneo:Terkarboeu:Ikatzfr:Charbonfur:Cjarbongd:Gualgl:Carbnko:hy:hi:hr:Ugljenio:Karbonobarais:Kolit:Carbonehe:Barakk:maweht:Chabonlbe:la:Carbolv:Akmeoglesanglislmo:Carbunmk:ml:mr:batumn:my:nah:Teconallinl:Steenkoolne:new:ja:no:Kullnn:Kolnov:Karboneoc:Carbonpcd:Carbonkopalnemineralro:Crbunequ:Killimsasq:Qymyriscn:Cravunisimple:Coalsk:Uhliesl:Premogsr:sh:Ugljenfi:Kivihiili(brnsle)(bato)ta:te:th:tg:tr:Kmrur:wa:Hoyewar:Uringzh-yue:zh:
6082
Cortex
Cortex (Latin: bark, rind, shell or husk) may refer to:* Inc., a touch sharing utility* Cortex (journal), a scientific journal founded in 1964 and produced by Masson Publishing* Cortex, a family of the architecture of CPUsSciences* (botany), the outer portion of the stem or root of a plant* (archaeology), the outer layer of rock formed on the exterior of raw materials by chemical and mechanical weathering processes* cortex, the region proximal to the cell surface, i.e. directly underneath the cell membraneAnatomy* (anatomy), the outermost or superficial layer of an organ* (hair), the middle layer of a strand of hairOrgans* the cortex, the outer portion of the kidney* the cortex, the portion of the Adrenal gland responsible for the production of cortisol and aldosteroneThe brain* the cortex (usually just cortex), the outer layer of the vertebrate cerebrum, part of which is the forebrain** the cortex, the regions of the cerebral cortex involved in voluntary motor functions** the cortex, the anterior part of the frontal lobes of the brain** the cortex, regions of the cerebral cortex involved in visual functions* the cortex, the outer layer of the vertebrate cerebellumVideo games* In the Crash Bandicoot series of video games:**The main antagonist, Doctor Neo Cortex**Neo Cortexs niece, Nina Cortex See also * Cordtex (explosive cord), a type of detonating cord generally used in mining. It uses an explosive core of pentaerythritol tetranitrate which is inside its plastic coating* Command, a 2-dimensional side-scrolling action game developed by Data Realms recovered names (17 non-redirects) * Pharmaceuticals, a pharmaceutical company based in Irvine, California specializing in positive allosteric modulators of the AMPA receptor known as Ampakines* Tectonics, the third studio album by American progressive metal band Canvas Solaris. It was released in 2007* area, a part of the cerebral cortex* blindness, the total or partial loss of vision in a normal-appearing eye caused by damage to the visual area in the brains occipital cortex* bone, one of the two types of osseous tissue that form bones* bundle* cooling, refers to the cooling methods restricted to the cerebral cortex, where most higher brain processes occur* cords, structures that develop from sex cords in the female. After further development they become the ovarian follicles* dysplasia, a congenital abnormality where the neurons in an area of the brain failed to migrate in the proper formation in utero* inheritance, structural inheritance was discovered by Tracy Sonneborn, and other researchers, during his study on protozoa in the late 1930s* lobule, a part of a renal lobe. It consists of the nephrons grouped around a single medullary ray, and draining into a single collecting duct* magnification, describes how many neurons in an area of the visual cortex are responsible for processing a stimulus of a given size, as a function of visual field location* map, collections (areas) of minicolumns in the brain cortex that have been identified as performing a specific information processing function (texture maps, color maps, contour maps, etc.)* minicolumn, a vertical column through the cortical layers of the brain, comprising perhaps 80120 neurons, except in the primate primary visual cortex (V1), where there are typically more than twice the number* pseudolaminar necrosis, the (uncontrolled) death of cells in (cerebral) cortex of the brain in a band-like pattern, with a relative perservation of cells immediately adjacent to the meninges* reaction, occurs when a sperm cell unites with the eggs plasma membrane, altering the zona pellucida which prevents other sperm from binding to and entering the egg* stimulation mapping, a type of electrocorticography which is used a method to determine the location in the brain where information of a certain kind is processedde:Cortexes:Cortex(homonymie)ko:io:Korticohe:nl:Cortexno:Cortexpt:Crtexsv:Cortex
6197
Clanking_replicator
A clanking replicator is an artificial self-replicating system that relies on conventional large-scale technology and automation. The term evolved to distinguish such systems from the microscopic assemblers that nanotechnology may make possible. They are also sometimes called Auxons, from the Greek word auxein which means to grow, or Neumann machines after von Neumann, who first rigorously studied the idea. This last term (von Neumann machine) is less specific and also refers to a completely unrelated computer architecture proposed by von Neumann, so its use is discouraged where accuracy is important. Von Neumann himself used the term Constructor.The term clanking replicator was used by Drexler,() is informal and is rarely used by others in popular or technical discussions.Basic conceptA machine would need to have the capacity to gather energy and materials, process the raw materials into finished components, and then assemble them into a copy of itself. It is unlikely that this would all be contained within a single monolithic structure, but would rather be a group of cooperating machines or an automated factory that is capable of manufacturing all of the machines that make it up.The factory could produce mining robots to collect raw materials, construction robots to put new machines together, and repair robots to maintain itself against wear and tear, all without human intervention or direction. The advantage of such a system lies in its ability to expand its own capacity rapidly and without additional human effort; in essence, the initial investment required to construct the first clanking replicator would have an arbitrarily large payoff with no additional labor cost, with future returns discounted by their value.Such a machine violates no laws, and we already possess the basic technologies necessary for some of the more detailed proposed designs.Noting another proof that self-replicating machines are possible is the simple fact that all living organisms are self replicating by definition.History of the conceptThe idea of non-biological self-replicating systems was introduced in Samuel Butlers article Darwin Among the Machines published only a few years after The Origin of Species. As a serious proposal, it was first suggested by mathematician Von Neumann in the late 1940s when he proposed a kinematic self-reproducing automaton model as a experiment. See Von Neumann, J., 1966, The Theory of Self-reproducing Automata, A. Burks, ed., Univ. of Illinois Press, Urbana, IL.Advanced Automation for Space MissionsIn 1980, NASA conducted a summer study entitledAdvanced Automation for Space Missions, edited by Freitas, to produce a detailed proposal for self-replicating factories to develop lunar resources without requiring additional launches or human workers on-site. The proposed system would have been capable of exponentially increasing productive capacity. The design could be modified to build Neumann probes to explore the galaxy.The reference design specified small computer-controlled electric carts running on rails.  Each cart could have a simple hand or a small bull-dozer shovel, forming a basic robot.Power would be provided by a canopy of solar cells supported on pillars.  The other machinery could run under the canopy.The study identified four key manufacturing capabilities out of the hundreds commonly used in modern industry:# casting for molded parts# machining for etching and fine tuning# deposition for electronics, solar cells, and mirror surfaces# Extrusion of spun basalt fiber for electrical insulation and fiberglassA casting robot would use a robotic arm with a few sculpting tools to make plaster molds.  Plaster molds are easy to make, and can make precise parts with good surface finishes.  The robot would then cast most of the parts either from nonconductive molten rock (basalt) or purified metals.  An electric or solar oven would melt the materials. A carbon dioxide laser cutting and welding system was also included.A more speculative, more complex chip factory was specified to produce the computer and electronic systems, but the designers also said that it might prove practical to ship the chips from Earth as if they were vitamins.Much of the design study was concerned with a simple, flexible chemical system for processing the ores, and the differences between the ratio of elements needed by the replicator, and the ratios available in lunar regolith.  The element that most limited the growth rate was chlorine, needed to process regolith for aluminium.  Chlorine is very rare in lunar regolith, so the design recycled it.Other references* Dyson expanded upon Neumanns automata theories, and advanced a biotechnology-inspired theory. See Astrochicken.*The first technical design study of a self-replicating interstellar probe was published in a 1980 paper by Freitas*Clanking replicators are also mentioned briefly in the fourth chapter of K. Eric Drexlers 1986 book of Creation.*Article about a proposed clanking replicator system to be used for developing Earthly deserts in the October 1995 Magazine, featuring forests of solar panels that powered desalination equipment to irrigate the land.* In 1995, Nick Szabo proposed a challenge to build a macroscale replicator from Lego(tm) robot kits and similar basic parts.  Szabo wrote that this approach was easier than previous proposals for macroscale replicators, but successfully predicted that even this method would not lead to a macroscale replicator within ten years.*In 1998, Phoenix suggested a general idea for a macroscale replicator on the sci.nanotech newsgroup, operating in a pool of ultraviolet-cured liquid plastic, selectively solidifying the plastic to form solid parts. Computation could be done by logic. Power for the process could be supplied by a pressurized source of the liquid.*In 2001, Ward mentioned an escaped clanking replicator destroying the human race in his book Evolution.*In 2004, General Dynamics completed a study for NASAs Institute for Advanced Concepts.  It  concluded that complexity of the development was equal to that of a Pentium 4, and promoted a design based on cellular automata.*In 2004, Robert Freitas and Merkle published the first comprehensive review of the field of self-replication, in their book Kinematic Self-Replicating Machines, which includes 3000+ literature references.*In 2005, Bowyer of the of Bath started the RepRap project to develop a prototyping machine which would be able to replicate itself, making such machines cheap enough for people to buy and use in their homes.  The project is releasing material under the GPL. http://staff.bath.ac.uk/ensab/replicator/Clanking replicators in fictionIn fiction, the idea dates back at least as far as &#268;apeks 1921 play (Rossums Universal Robots).E. van Vogt used the idea as a plot device in his story M33 in Andromeda (1943), which was later combined with the three other Space Beagle stories to became the novel, Voyage of the Space Beagle. The story describes the creation of self-replicating weapons factories designed to destroy the Anabis, a galaxy-spanning malevolent life form bent on destruction of the human race.An early treatment was the short story Autofac by K. Dick, published in 1955, which precedes von Neumanns original paper about self-reproducing machines. Dick also touched on this theme in his earlier 1953 short story Variety. Another example can be found in the 1962 short story Epilogue by Anderson, in which self-replicating factory barges were proposed that used minerals extracted from ocean water as raw materials.In his short story Crabs on the Island (1958) Dneprov speculated on the idea that since the replication process is never 100% accurate, leading to slight differences in the descendants, over several generations of replication the machines would be subjected to evolution similar to that of living organisms. In the story, a machine is designed, the sole purpose of which is to find metal to produce copies of itself, intended to be used as a weapon against an enemys war machines. The machines are released on a deserted island, the idea being that once the available metal is all used and they start fighting each other, selection will enhance their design. However, the evolution has stopped by itself when the last descendant, an enormously large crab, was created, being unable to reproduce itself due to lack of energy and materials.Lem has also studied the same idea in his novel Invincible (1964), in which the crew of a spacecraft landing on a distant planet finds non-biological life-form, which is the product of long, possibly of millions of years of mechanical evolution. This phenomenon is also key to the aforementioned Anderson story.Sladek used the concept to humorous ends in his first novel The Reproductive System (1968, also titled Mechasm in some markets), where a U.S. military research project goes out of control.NASAs Advanced Automation for Space Missions study directly inspired the science fiction novel of the Lifemaker (1983) by author James P. Hogan.The movie Screamers, based on Dicks short story Second Variety, features a group of robot weapons created by mankind to act as Von Neumann devices / berserkers. The original robots are subterranean buzzsaws that make a screaming sound as they approach a potential victim beneath the soil. These machines are self-replicating and, as is found out through the course of the movie, they are quite intelligent and have managed to evolve into newer, more dangerous forms, most notably human forms which the real humans in the movie cannot tell apart from other real humans except by trial and error.Other notable fiction literature containing clanking replicators*Autofac by K. Dick*The Berserker series of books and short stories by Saberhagen*Forge of God by Bear*Odyssey Two by C. Clarke*World at the End of Time by Pohl*Recursion by Ballantyne ISBN 0330426990*Evolution by Baxter*Prey  by Crichton(The nanorobot swarm in Prey are not true replicators but are rather nonhuman nanorobot/gamma assembler/bacteria cyborgs which gain the ability to build structures to reproduce themselves and eventually become symbiotic with humans.)*The popular TV series SG-1 introduces Replicators as some of the deadliest enemies of life.Prospects for implementationAs the use of industrial automation has expanded over time, some factories have begun to approach a semblance of self-sufficiency that is suggestive of clanking replicators. However, such factories are unlikely to achieve full closure until the cost and flexibility of automated machinery comes close to that of human labour and the manufacture of spare parts and other components locally becomes more economical than transporting them from elsewhere. Fully capable machine replicators are most useful for developing resources in dangerous environments which are not easily reached by existing transportation systems (such as space).A clanking replicator can be considered to be a form of life. Depending on its design, it might be subject to evolution over long time periods. However, with robust correction, and the possibility of external intervention, the common fiction theme of robotic life run amok is unlikely in the near term.EtymologyIt should probably be noted that clanking is an example of onomatopoeia, understandable to some English speakers, but not to all. The term is meant to evoke the image of a nineteenth century factory, powered by steam, pushing gears and rods, noisy and clamorous.References(
6230
Canadian_Shield
upper midwestern States.The Canadian Shield, also called the Laurentian Plateau, or Bouclier Canadien (French), is a vast geological shield covered by a thin layer of soil that forms the nucleus of the North American or Laurentia craton. It is an area mostly composed of rock which relates to its long volcanic history. It has a deep, common, joined bedrock region in Eastern and central Canada and stretches North from the Lakes to the Ocean, covering over half of Canada; it also extends South into the Northern reaches of the United States. Human population is scarce, and industrial development is minimal(Canadian Shield - Columbia Encyclopedia, Sixth Edition, 2005), while mining is very prevalent. Geographical extent The Canadian shield is physiographic division, consisting of five smaller physiographic provinces, the Upland, Region, Davis, Hudson, and James.() The shield extends into the United States as the Mountains (connected by the Axis) and the Superior Upland. The Canadian Shield is U-shaped, but almost semi-circular, which yields an appearance of a warriors shield, and is a subsection of the Laurentia craton signifying the area of greatest glacial impact (scraping down to bare rock) creating the thin soils.The Canadian Shield is a collage of Archean plates and accreted juvenile arc terranes and basins of Proterozoic age that were progressively amalgamated during the interval 2.45 to 1.24 Ga, with the most substantial growth period occurring during the orogeny, between ca. 1.90 to 1.80 Ga.() The Canadian Shield was the first part of North America to be permanently elevated above sea level and has remained almost wholly untouched by successive encroachments of the sea upon the continent. It is the Earths greatest area of exposed Archaean rock. The metamorphic base rocks are mostly from the Precambrian Era (between 4.5 billion and 540 million years ago), and have been repeatedly uplifted and eroded. Today it consists largely of an area of low relief  above sea level with a few monadnocks and low mountain ranges (including the Torngat and Mountains) probably eroded from the plateau during the Cenozoic era. During the Pleistocene epoch, continental ice sheets depressed the land surface (see Bay), scooped out thousands of lake basins, and carried away much of the regions soil.When the Greenland section is included, the Shield is approximately circular bounded on the northeast by the northeast edge of Greenland, with Bay in the middle. It covers much of Greenland, Labrador, most of Quebec north of the St. Lawrence River, much of Ontario including northern sections of the southern peninsula between the Lakes, the Mountains(Peterson Field Guide to Geology of Eastern North America by Roberts, David & Roger Tory Peterson.) of northern York, the northernmost part of Lower Michigan and all of Michigan, northern Wisconsin, northeastern Minnesota, the central/northern portions of Manitoba away from Hudson Bay, northern Saskatchewan, a small portion of northeastern Alberta,(Alberta Heritage - Alberta Online Encyclopedia - The Canadian Shield Region of Alberta) and the mainland northern Canadian territories to the east of a line extended north from the Saskatchewan/Alberta border (Territories and Nunavut).() In total, it covers approximately . It covers even more area and stretches to the Western Cordillera in the west and Appalachians in the east, but the formations are still underground. The underlying rock structure does include Hudson Bay and the submerged area between North America and Greenland. Geology Image:Temagami greenstone belt pillow lava.jpg|thumb|right|Weathered Precambrian lava in the greenstone beltThe multitude of rivers and lakes in the entire region is caused by the watersheds of the area being so young and in a state of sorting themselves out with the added effect of rebound. The Shield was originally an area of very large mountains (about )() with much volcanic activity, but over hundreds of million of years the area has been eroded to its current topographic appearance of relatively low relief. It has some of the oldest (extinct) volcanoes on the planet. It has over 150 belts (now deformed and eroded down to nearly flat plains) whose bedrock ranges from 600 to 1200 million years old.Each belt probably grew by the coalescence of accumulations erupted from numerous vents, making the tally of volcanoes reach the hundreds. Many of Canadas major ore deposits are associated with Precambrian volcanoes.The Lake Caldera in District, Ontario is one of the worlds best preserved mineralized Neoarchean caldera complexes, which is some 2.7 billion years old.(Caldera Volcanoes Retrieved on 2007-07-20) The Canadian Shield also contains the dike swarm, which is the largest swarm known on Earth.(Supressing Varying Directional Trends Retrieved on 2007-07-28)thumb|200px|left|Typical Canadian Shield: pines, lakes, bogs, and rock.Mountains have deep roots and float on the denser mantle much like an iceberg at sea. As mountains erode, their roots rise and are eroded in turn. The rocks that now form the surface of the Shield were once far below the Earths surface.The high pressures and temperatures at those depths provided ideal conditions for mineralization. Although these mountains are now heavily eroded, many large mountains still exist in Canadas far north called the Cordillera. This is a vast deeply dissected range, stretching from northernmost Island to the northernmost tip of Labrador. The ranges highest peak is Nunavuts Peak at  above level.() Precambrian rock is the major component of the bedrock.The American craton is the bedrock forming the heart of the North American continent and the Canadian Shield is the largest exposed part of the cratons bedrock.The Canadian Shield is part of an ancient continent called Arctica, which was formed about 2.5 billion years ago, during the Neoarchean era. It was split into Greenland, Laurentia, Scotland, Siberia, Antarctica and is now roughly situated in the Arctic around the current Pole. Ecology The current surface expression of the Shield is one of very thin soil lying on top of the bedrock, with many bare outcrops. This arrangement was caused by severe glaciation during the age, which covered the Shield and scraped the rock clean.The lowlands of the Canadian Shield have a very dense soil that is not suitable for forestation, but it also contains many marshes and bogs. The rest of the region has coarse soil that does not retain moisture well and is frozen as permafrost year round. Forests are not as dense in the north.The Shield is covered in parts by vast forests in the south that support natural ecosystems as well as a major logging industry. This boreal forest area includes ecoregions such as the Canadian Shield taiga that covers northern Quebec and most of Labrador, and the Canadian Shield forests that run westwards from Ontario. Hydrographical drainage is generally poor, the effects of glaciation being one of the many reasons. Tundra typically prevails in the northern regions. Many mammals such as caribou, wolverines, weasels, mink, otters, grizzlies, bears and black bears are present.(National Geographic - Northern Canadian Shield taiga) In the case of polar bears (Ursus maritimus) the Shield area contains many of the denning locations such as the National Park.(C. Michael Hogan (2008) Polar Bear: Ursus maritimus, Globaltwitcher.com, ed. Nicklas Stromberg) Mining and economics The Shield is one of the worlds richest areas in terms of mineral ores. It is filled with substantial deposits of nickel, gold, silver, and copper. Throughout the Shield there are many mining towns extracting these minerals. The largest, and one of the best known, is Sudbury, Ontario. Sudbury is an exception to the normal process of forming minerals in the Shield since there is significant evidence that the Basin is an ancient meteorite crater. Ejecta from the meteorite impact was found in the Formation in May 2007. The nearby, but less known Magnetic Anomaly, has striking similarities to the Sudbury Basin. This suggests it could be a second metal-rich impact crater.(3-D Magnetic Imaging using Conjugate Gradients: Temagami anomaly Retrieved on 2008-03-12)In northeastern Quebec, the giant Reservoir is the site of an extensive hydroelectric project (Manic-cinq, or Manic-5). This is one of the largest-known meteorite craters on Earth.The Flon greenstone belt in central Manitoba and east-central Saskatchewan is one of the largest Paleoproterozoic volcanic-hosted massive sulfide (VMS) districts in the world, containing 27 copper-zinc-(gold) deposits from which more than 183 million tons of sulfide have been mined.()The Shield, particularly the portion in the Territories, has recently been the site of several major diamond discoveries. The kimberlite pipes in which the diamonds are found are closely associated with cratons, which provide the deep lithospheric mantle required to stabilize diamond as a mineral. The kimberlite eruptions then bring the diamonds from over  depth to the surface. Currently the Ekati and Diavik mines are actively mining kimberlite diamonds. See also * history of Minnesota* Platform* rock* Basement* Platform basement* in CanadaReferencesFurther reading *Schwartzenberger, Tina (2005), The Canadian Shield, Weigl Educational ISBN 1553881419External links *The Canadian Shield - Worsley SchoolSkildttSchildkilpCanadiensetabulocanadienCanadensetitcanadeseskydasSchildja:kanadiske skjoldkanadiske skjoldetKanadyjskaCanadianokilpisklden
6250
Colorado_Springs,_Colorado
 Colorado Springs is a Home Rule Municipality that is the seat and most populous city of El Paso County, Colorado, States. Colorado Springs is located in South-Central Colorado, in the southern portion of the state. It is situated on Creek and is located  south of the State Capitol in Denver. At 6,035 feet (1839 m) the city stands over one mile (1.6 km) above sea level, though some areas of the city are significantly higher. Colorado Springs is situated near the base of one of the most famous American mountains, Peak, in the eastern edge of the Rocky Mountains.With a population of 416,427 as of the 2010 Census,(Colorado Trend Report 2: State and Complete Places (Sub-state 2010 Census Data). Missouri Census Data Center. Accessed 2011-02-25.) it is the second most populous city in the state of Colorado, behind Denver, and the 41st most populous city in the United States,() while the Springs Metropolitan Statistical Area had an estimated population of 645,613 in 2010.() The city covers , making it Colorados largest city in area. Colorado Springs was selected as the No. 1 Best Big City in Best Places to Live by Money magazine in 2006,() and placed number one in Outsides 2009 list of Americas Best Cities.()HistoryGeneral Palmer, city founderImage:Colorado Springs General William Palmer by David Shankbone.jpg|thumb|left|Statue of William Palmer in front of Palmer High School.thumb|The AntlersWilliam Jackson Palmer, a Civil War General (brevet) and of Honor recipient, came to the Territory as a surveyor with the Pacific Railroad. He explored the area south of Denver searching for possible railroad routes for the Kansas Pacific to strategically occupy.(nameTaming a Wilderness http://www.ghostdepot.com/rg/library/magazine/taming%201.htm) Palmer favorably viewed the valley in the shadow of Peak as an ideal town site.(nameBristol http://www.d11.org/bristol/Bristol_wall/1860/front_1860_palmer.htm) Since he could not persuade the Kansas Pacific to follow the Arkansas River to Pueblo and from there north to Denver, Palmer secured legislation and funding to build the & Rio Grande Railroad south from Denver with the declared intention of reaching City, Mexico.(nameTaming a Wilderness) Palmer founded Colorado Springs on July 31, 1871,(nameBristol) as the first destination served by his railroad. He had the intention of creating a high-quality resort community, and the infant town was soon nicknamed Little London because of the many English tourists who came, owing partly to Palmers financial connections in England who provided the capital for his railroad.( The stunning mountain view from anywhere in the valley as well as the nearby of the Gods made the citys location a natural choice.Within two years, his flagship resort the Antlers Hotel opened, welcoming US and international travelers as well as health-savvy individuals seeking the high altitude, sunshine, and dry climate, and Palmers visions of a thriving, quality resort town were coming true. Palmers Denver & Rio Grande Railroad became a critical regional railroad, faithfully serving the city and propelling the railroad south toward Pueblo. He maintained his presence in the citys early days by making many grants or sales of land to civic institutions. Palmer and his wife saw Colorado Springs develop into one of the most popular travel destinations in the late 19th century United States.The town of Palmer Lake, the Divide, and other more minor features are named after him, and a bronze sculpture of Palmer on a horse is prominently displayed downtown in front of Palmer High School, at the center of a busy intersection. To many residents who lived in Colorado Springs in the years since, Palmer became known as the man on the horse,(The Man on the Iron Horse by Rhoda Davis Wilcox) a fitting appellation because of his long association with the Rio Grande Railroad.Old Colorado City and the Pikes Peak Gold RushImage:Colorado Springs Pioneers Museum by David Shankbone.jpg|thumb|The Pioneers Museum (old court house) contains displays of the citys founding and history.Colorado Springs present downtown location, where General Palmer first founded the city, was partly due to Palmers dislike of nearby rough-and-ready Colorado City (now called Colorado City, and not to be confused with present-day Colorado City) and its many saloons. Palmer ensured his new planned city stayed alcohol free by buying a huge tract of land to the east of Colorado City. Legally, Colorado Springs stayed dry until the end of Prohibition in 1933, but practically, alcohol was readily available. Conveniently located druggists advertised whiskey, ale, stout and beer for medicinal purposes.In its earliest days of 18591860, Colorado City was a major hub for sending mining supplies to South Park, where a major strike in the Peak Gold Rush was found. After the Cripple Creek gold discovery in 1891, ore mills in Colorado City processed much of the gold ore at the Golden Cycle Mill using Palmers railroads. The affluent, who made money from the gold rush and industry, did not stay in Colorado City but built their large houses in the undeveloped downtown area of Colorado Springs (i.e. Wood Ave). Early pictures show several large stone buildings like College, St. Marys Church, the first Antlers Hotel, the library, and the county courthouse (pictured at right) sitting in large empty plains.(Colorado College Tutt Library. Colorado Springs Views Looking West on Pikes Peak Avenue. Inventory of the Colorado Springs Area: Early Views. Glass Plate Negatives C1-C12. Retrieved on: 2011-07-12.) This is unique during this period, to anticipate a citys civic infrastructure in stone with wide streets laid out before there was a population to justify the expense.(Loevy, R. (August 1, 2010). The Complete History of the Old North End Neighborhood in Colorado Springs, Colorado, pp. 1-2. Colorado College. Retrieved on: 2011-07-12.)Colorado City remained the county seat of El Paso County until 1873, when the courthouse moved to Colorado Springs. Colorado City was the location of a 1903 labor strike that spread to Cripple Creek and eventually led to the Labor Wars.(Colorados War on Militant Unionism, James H. Peabody and the Western Federation of Miners, George G. Suggs, Jr., 1972, page 47)W. S. Stratton, early benefactorIn 1891, Scott Stratton discovered and developed one of the richest gold mines on earth in the nearby Cripple Creek and Victor area, and was perhaps the most generous early contributor to those communities and to Colorado Springs.After he made his fortune he declined to build a mansion as the other gold rush millionaires were doing; instead, in later years, he lived in a house in Colorado Springs he had built when he was a carpenter in pre-gold days.Image:Tesla colorado.jpg|thumb|A publicity photo of Tesla sitting in the Colorado Springs experimental station with his transmitter generating millions of volts.In Colorado Springs, he funded the Myron Stratton Home for housing itinerant children and the elderly, donated land for City Hall, the Post Office, the Courthouse (which now houses the Pioneer Museum), and a park; he also greatly expanded the citys trolley car system and built the Mining Exchange building, and gave to all three communities in many other ways, great and small.As Strattons generosity became known, he was also approached by many people looking for money, and he became reclusive and eccentric in his later years.Spencer Penrose, early benefactorPenrose also made his mark on Colorado Springs in its early yearsthough not until two decades after its founding. Penrose started as a ladies-man and an adventurer. After making a fortune in the gold fields of nearby Cripple Creek in the 1890s, he married Julie Villiers Lewis McMillan, and settled down.Penrose used his wealth to invest in other national mineral concerns and financed construction of the Hotel, the Mountain Zoo, the Rogers Shrine of the Sun, the Pikes Peak Highway, what is now known as Penrose-St Francis Health Services, and established the El Pomar Foundation, which still oversees many of his contributions in Colorado Springs today.End of the Colorado Gold Rush and the start of health tourismThe flow of gold and silver ebbed as the decades passed, and Colorado Citys economic fortunes faded with it; the miners and those who processed the ore left or retired. Because of the healthy natural scenic beauty, mineral waters, and extremely dry climate, Colorado Springs became a tourist attraction and popular recuperation destination for tuberculosis patients. The healthy waters in Colorado Springs contained so much natural fluoride that some peoples teeth developed Colorado Stain. In 1909, Dr. McKay of Colorado Springs discovered the Colorado Stain connection and that a little fluoride added to water would prevent cavities, according to the permanent health exhibit at the Pioneers Museum. On June 14, 1950 Colorado Springs annexed Roswell which was founded in 1888 by coal miners and became a neighborhood. Other locations such as Austin Bluffs, Broadmoor, Woodman Valley, Pikeview, Papeton, Knob Hill, Ivywild, Stratton Meadows, Stratmoor, Elsmare, Cimarron Hills, Kelker, Stratmoor Hills, La Foret, Skinners,and Colorado City (now called Colorado City) became part of Colorado Springs. Old Colorado City is located on the west side of Colorado Springs and is a district and on the Register of Historic Places. Its old Victorian brick buildings and main street currently offer several tourist, boutique, and antique shops.Latter 20th century military boomColorado Springs saw its first military base in 1942 shortly after Pearl Harbor was attacked. For several years the city had been trying to attract a military installation to boost its flagging economy. In 1941, the city purchased  of what is now Fort Carson to try to lure a prospective Army installation. During this time the U.S. Army established Camp Carson near the southern borders of the city in order to train and house troops in preparation for World War II. It was also during this time that the Army began using Springs Municipal Airport. It was renamed Peterson Field and used as a training base for heavy bombers (the airport and base still share parts of the flightline).Image:Colorado Springs, downtown, 1950s.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Hi-res Kodachrome of downtown Colorado Springs, 1951.The Army expanded Camp Carson, a venture that increased growth in Colorado Springs and provided a significant area of industry for the city. Camp Carson was named for the Army scout General Christopher Kit Carson, who explored the vast western frontier during the 19th century.() After World War II the military stepped away from the Springs, Camp Carson was declining and the military was activating and deactivating Peterson Field irregularly. That all changed when the War erupted. Camp Carson, which had declined to only 600 soldiers, was revitalized along with many other parts of the Springs. In 1951, the United States Air Defense Command moved to Colorado Springs and opened Air Force Base (named for Major General Girard Ent, commander of the Air Force during World War II).After the Korean War, Peterson Field was renamed Peterson Air Force Base and was permanently activated. In 1954 Camp Carson became Fort Carson, Colorado Springs first Army post. Later that same year, President D. Eisenhower selected Colorado Springs, out of 300 other sites around the nation, to be the site of the States Air Force Academy. A new and growing Army post, an Air Force Base, and the Air Forces military academy together jump-started Colorado Springs growth.The military boom continued and in 1963, NORADs main facility was built in Mountain. This placed NORAD directly next to Colorado Springs and permanently secured the citys military presence. During the Cold War the city greatly expanded due to increased revenue from various industries and the prevailing military presence in the city. In the mid 1970s, Ent Air Force Base was shut down and later converted into the States Olympic Training Center. Military presence was further increased in 1983 with the founding of Falcon Air Force Base (later changed to Schriever Air Force Base), a base primarily tasked with missile defense and satellite control. Fort Carson and Peterson are still growing and continue to contribute to the citys growth. Force Space Command is located on Peterson AFB.GeographyImage:PikesPeakFromUCCS.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Peak, the Eastern-most 14er in the United States.Image:Ackerman Overlook, Colo Spgs., CO IMG 5631.JPG|300px|right|thumb|Ackerman Overlook near States Air Force Academy off 25 in Colorado Springs is named for Jasper D. Ackerman (18961988), a banker and rancher.(Colorado historical marker, Interstate 25, Colorado Springs, Colorado)GeographyAccording to the States Census Bureau, the city has a total area of 186.1  square miles (482.1 km), of which 185.7 square miles (481.1 km) is land and 0.4 square mile (1.0 km) (0.21%) is water.ClimateColorado Springs features a climate (Kppen BSk). The city receives approximately  of annual precipitation, which includes rain and snow. Snowfall rarely occurs outside the months between October and May with an average snowfall of . Due to unusually low precipitation for several years after flooding in 1999, Colorado Springs enacted lawn water restrictions in 2002. These were lifted in 2005.()January averages , yet the city has relatively mild winters, with large snow accumulations in the downtown area relatively rare, a strong warming sun due to the elevation, and only occasional episodic periods of sub-zero cold snaps and blizzards from October 31 to March/April. Snow often melts very quickly in arid climates as well, which makes the winters mild. Summers are typically very warm with occasional heat waves and generally arid with episodic heavy rainfalls and large hail, with a July average of  and highs reaching  on 16 days per annum. The normal high temperatures during the day are in the mid-80s into the low 90s, with cooler days in the low 80s and upper 70s. Also very hot days can reach the mid to upper 90s relatively often. The summers in Colorado Springs are generally hot and dry, but afternoon thunderstorms are common especially in July and August when the city receives the majority of its annual rainfall.Colorado Springs is just east of the Rocky Mountains, which protects the city from extreme weather. The city is made up of the mountains to the west, the mountain divide to the north, high plains further east, and desert land to the south once you leave Fountain and approach Pueblo.The winters in Colorado Springs are normal to mild usually, with winter snow storms occurring, but the snow often melts by the mid-to-late afternoon. The usual high temperatures in the winter are in the mid to upper 40s, with the lows in the mid to upper teens. Winter days into the 50s and 60s are relatively common as well. However, the mountains just west of the city can receive very large amounts of snow.The hottest temperature ever recorded in Colorado Springs was  on June 7, 1874, and the coldest temperature ever recorded was  on January 20, 1883. Although the coldest average monthly high temperature of the year in Colorado Springs has historically been January, in recent years December has had a colder average monthly high temperature.()Colorado Springs is also one of the most active lightning strike areas in the United States. This natural phenomenon led Tesla to select Colorado Springs as the preferred location to build his lab and study electricity.date  August 2010DemographicsAs of the April 2010 census, the population of Colorado Springs was 416,427(http://mcdc.missouri.edu/webrepts/pl94trends/Colorado_stplace2.html) (47th most populous U.S. city),() and the estimated population of the Springs Metropolitan Statistical Area was 617,714 in 2008 (84th most populous MSA),() and the population of the Range Urban Corridor in Colorado was an estimated 4,166,855.April 2010 census:(* White: 70.7%* Black or African American: 6.3%* Native American: 0.5%* Asian: 3.0%* Native Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islander: 0.2%* Some other race: 5.2%* Two or more races: 4.6%* Hispanic or Latino (of any race): 16.1%; Americans made up 14.5% of the citys population.()Source:(Military impact on diversity: The diversity of the military populations has had a lasting impact on the ethnic and racial makeup of the Colorado Springs area. Residents with military backgrounds, including retirees and former dependents, come from a much broader  population with wide-ranging  backgrounds, ethnicities, international experiences and connections, bringing a diversity which would otherwise not be seen in the region. Impact of Non-military Hispanic and European Immigration: Earlier influxes of European and European-American settlers of largely German, Irish and Italian heritage as well as an ongoing influx of Hispanic immigrants primarily of Mexican and Central American heritage have also increased diversity of the region. Native American population: Although comprising less than 1% of the current population, the local Native American population has links to the area going back thousands of years. Originally one of the homes of the Ute Indian Nation, descendants of Ute heritage continue to reside in greater Colorado Springs. As of the census of 2000 (limited only to the city limits and not including the very diverse Fort Carson area which many view as being a part of the Colorado Springs metropolitan area), there were 360,890 people, 141,516 households, and 93,117 families residing in the city. The density was 1,942.9 people per square mile (750.2/km). There were 148,690 housing units at an average density of 800.5 per square mile (309.1/km). The racial makeup of the city was 80.66% White, 6.56% African American, 0.88% Native American, 2.82% Asian, 0.21% Pacific Islander, 5.01% from other races, and 3.85% from two or more races. 12.01% of the population were Hispanic or Latino of any race.There were 141,516 households out of which 34.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.5% were married couples living together, 10.6% had a female householder with no husband present, and 34.2% were non-families. 27.0% of all households were made up of individuals and 6.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.50 and the average family size was 3.06.In the city the population was spread out with 26.5% under the age of 18, 10.3% from 18 to 24, 32.8% from 25 to 44, 20.8% from 45 to 64, and 9.6% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 34 years. For every 100 females there were 97.8 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 95.2 males.(Note: City statistics do not include the demographic influence of five local military bases).The median income for a household in the city was $45,081, and the median income for a family was $53,478. Males had a median income of $36,786 versus $26,427 for females. The capita income for the city was $22,496. About 6.1% of families and 8.7% of the population were below the line, including 10.8% of those under age 18 and 7.2% of those age 65 or over.Governmentthumb|City Hall.Colorado Springs is a government, with a mayor and city council that meets regularly to approve budgets, enact ordinances, and rule on land use, and a manager who deals with the day-to-day aspects of running the city.() The mayor is elected in a citywide vote. The city council consists of the mayor and eight additional members, four of whom are elected from districts and four who are elected at large. Both council members and the mayor are elected to four year terms and may serve two terms in both positions. A vice mayor is elected by council members from within their ranks.On November 2, 2010 Colorado Springs voters adopted a mayor-council form of government. The City of Colorado Springs transitions to the new system of government in 2011. Under the strong mayor-council system of government, the mayor is the chief executive and the city council is the legislative branch. The mayor will be full-time and will no longer be a member of the city council. The city council will add one additional at-large member and stay at nine members. The mayor will have veto authority, with the city council having the ability to override a mayoral veto by a 2/3 votes (6 out of 9).Current issuesIn order to combat the nearly $38 million budget shortfall projected in 2010 caused by current economic conditions resulting in decreased sales taxes, a proposal to increase property taxes by $10 million over five years was approved for the November 2009 ballot by the city council on August 25, 2009. Issue 2C was voted down on November 3, 2009. An attempt to reform the citys Taxpayers Bill of Rights (TABOR) was considered but not put on the ballot.() As a result the city reduced fire and police jobs, stopped paving roads, eliminated evening and weekend bus service, reduced public trash control, turned off city street lights, and asked residents to mow the grass in their neighborhood parks.()EconomyColorado Springs economy is driven primarily by the military, the high-tech industry, and tourism, in that order. The city is currently experiencing some growth mainly in the service sectors.Defense industryThe defense industry plays a major role in the Colorado Springs economy, with some of the citys largest employers coming from the sector.(Colorado Springs Gazette) A large segment of this industry is dedicated to the development and operation of various projects for missile defense. With its close ties to defense, the aerospace industry has also influenced the Colorado Springs economy. Although some defense corporations have left or downsized city campuses, a slight growth trend is still recorded.Significant defense corporations in the city include Boeing, Dynamics, Corporation, SAIC, ITT, Communications, Martin, and Grumman.High-tech industryA large percentage of Colorado Springs economy is still based on manufacturing tech and complex electronic equipment. The high tech sector in the Colorado Springs area has decreased its overall presence over the past six years (from around 21,000 down to around 8,000), with notable reductions in technology and complex electronic equipment.() Due to a slowing in tourism, the high tech sector still remains second to the military in terms of total revenue generated and employment.(SCEF  Southern Colorado Economic Forum) Current trends project the high tech employment ratio will continue to decrease in the near future.(()()()High tech corporations with connections to the city include:*Business  Software development  Formerly WorldCom and MCI, has a fairly large engineering presence. At its peak during the mid-to-late 1990s, with over 5,000 employees and currently has nearly 1300 employees in 2008.(Wayne Heilman gazette.com 09/19/08 email)*Hewlett-Packard  Computing  large sales, support, and SAN storage engineering center. The location was built by Equipment Corporation, renamed Compaq in the 1998 acquisition of Digital, and finally renamed Hewlett-Packard after the 2002 merger. Nearly 1000 positions will be transferred out of the Springs()()()*SNIA  Computing  home of the SNIA Technology Center*Agilent  Test and Measurement Manufacturing  In 1999, Agilent was spun off from HP as an independent, publicly-traded company.*Intel 2009 idled with 250 employees, down from 1000 employees in 2007() 2011, facility now used for the centralized unemployment and social services complex. *Atmel  Chip fabrication. Formerly Honeywell. Recently laid off 245 workers.()*Semiconductor Colorado Design Center  Chip fabrication R&D site*Sanmina-SCI Closing facility around December 2007 to January 2008 (800 jobs).(Sept 2007, Tammy Fields, Colorado Springs Economic Development Corporation)*Inc. Facility sold to Sanmina-SCI in 1996.(High Beam Research)Top employersAccording to the Citys 2009 Comprehensive Annual Financial Report,(City of Colorado Springs CAFR) the top employers in the city are:Military InstallationsThe United States Military plays a very important role in the city. Colorado Springs is home to both Army and Air Force bases. All these military installations border the city, to the north, south and east, excluding Schriever Air Force Base, which is located east of the city in El Paso County.Fort CarsonFort Carson is the citys largest military base, and until mid-2006 was home to the 3d Armored Cavalry Regiment, which relocated to Fort Hood, Texas.  As of 2009, Fort Carson is the home station of the 4th Infantry Division, which nearly doubles the bases population. Fort Carson is host to various training grounds for infantry, armor, and aviation units (specifically the Kiowa Warrior). Fort Carson is also the headquarters of the second and third battalions of the Special Forces Group.Peterson Air Force Basethumb|left|200px|AFSPC Headquarters, Peterson AFB, Colorado Springs.The Air Force has critical aspects of their service based at Colorado Springs which carry on missile defense operations and development. The Air Force bases a large section of the national missile defense operations here, with Peterson Air Force Base set to operate large sections of the program. Peterson AFB is currently the headquarters of the majority of Force Space Command and the operations half of Army Space and Missile Defense Command/Army Strategic Command (SMDC/ARSTRAT).Peterson is also headquarters for the States Northern Command (USNORTHCOM), one of the Combatant Commands. USNORTHCOM directs all branches of the U.S. military operations in their area of responsibility which includes the continental United States, Alaska, Canada, and Mexico. In the event of national emergencies the President or Secretary of Defense can call upon USNORTHCOM for any required military assistance. Service members from every branch of the US Military are stationed at the command.Schriever Air Force Base (formerly Falcon AFB)Schriever Air Force Base is home to the Space Wing, which controls warning, navigational, communications and spy satellites. It is also the home of the Space Warfare Center and the home for the 576th Flight Test Squadron.() It is the location of the Positioning System (GPS) master control station and GPS Operations Center() and the US Naval Observatory Alternate Master Clock,() used to synchronize GPS satellite time. Schriever is also developing parts of national missile defense and runs parts of the annual wargames used by the nations military.NORAD and Cheyenne Mountain Air StationImage:Air Force Academy Oath of Office.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Cadets in front of the Academy ChapelThe North American Aerospace Defense Command (NORAD), a component of Americas missile defense system, is located in Mountain Air Station. When it was built at the height of the War, NORAD caused some anxiety for the residents in and around Colorado Springs, who believed the installation would be a primary target during a attack. Although NORAD still operates today, it is primarily tasked with the tracking of ICBMs, and the military has recently decided to place Cheyenne Mountains NORAD/NORTHCOM operations on warm standby and move operations to nearby Peterson Air Force Base.({{Cite news|urlhttp://www.denverpost.com/nationworld/ci_4103478 |titleMilitary to put Cheyenne Mountain on standby  The Denver Post |publisherThe Denver Post Name Sport Founded League Venue  Springs Sky Sox Baseball 1988 Minor league; Pacific Coast League Service Field Springs Blizzard Soccer 2004-Folded in 2006 Soccer Leagues; Premier Development League Service Field Rush Mens Premier Soccer 2007 Arena Soccer League; Premier Soccer League (National Division III) Service Field Springs Rugby Football Club Rugby 1969 Rockies Rugby Football Union; Rugby; (National Division II) Bear Creek Park Springs Cricket Club Cricket 1999 Cricket League Rose Bowl, Memorial Park*The local colleges feature many sports teams. Notable among them are the following nationally-competitive NCAA Division I teams: States Air Force Academy (Fighting Falcons) Football, Basketball and Hockey, College (Tigers) Hockey, and Womens Soccer.* Colorado Springs hosted the 1962 International Ice Hockey Federation World Championships (together with Denver).** This nullifies a popular Canadian claim that the 2008 IIHF World Championships in City and Halifax marked the first time this event was organized on the American continent. However, the 2008 event was the first World Championship on the American continent in which NHL players were eligible to compete.Other* Colorado Springs was the original headquarters of the Bull Riders (PBR) from its founding in 1992 until 2005, when the organization was moved to Pueblo; the PBR used to hold an annual Ford Tough Series event at the World Arena from 2001 until 2005 when the organization made the move to Pueblo.Religious institutionsImage:Focus on the Family Welcome Center by David Shankbone.jpg|thumb|on the Family Visitors CenterAlthough houses of worship of almost every major religion can be found in the city, Colorado Springs has attracted a large influx of Evangelical Christians and Christian organizations in recent years. At one time Colorado Springs was counted to be the national headquarters for 81 different religious organizations, earning the city the tongue-in-cheek nickname the Evangelical Vatican() and The Christian Mecca. Religious groups with regional or international headquarters in Colorado Springs include: the of Christian Schools International, the and Missionary Alliance, International, Every Home for Christ, on the Family, HCJB, the Bible Society, The Navigators, the Catholic Diocese of Colorado Springs, Media Group, Andrew Wommack Ministries, and Life. The city is also home to one mosque, the Society of Colorado Springs.TransportationToday, Colorado Springs has many features of a modern urban area, such as parks, bike trails, and urban open-area spaces. However, it is not exempt from problems that typically plague cities that experience tremendous growth like overcrowded roads and highways, crime, sprawl, and government budget issues. Many of the problems are indirectly or directly caused by the citys difficulty in coping with the large population growth experienced in the last 20 years and the annexing of the Banning Lewis Ranch area for 175,000 future residents.Colorado Springs is served by a bus system called Mountain Metro (short for Metropolitan Transit). Mountain Metro also operates the Range Express (FREX) service, which connects Colorado Springs to Denver and several other metropolitan areas during weekdays. Although the transit system serves much of the city and its nearest suburbs, it lacks service to many important areas and has only limited hours of operation.Colorado Springs is served by the Springs Municipal Airport. In the state of Colorado, only Denver International has more passenger traffic. The airport has experienced a higher recovery rate in the post-9/11 era than the rest of the country() and is in the process of expanding its maintenance facilities, taxiways, and runways to accommodate future growth. In 2005 it served approximately two million passengers.(Major highwaysIn 2004, the voters of Colorado Springs and El Paso County established the Pikes Peak Rural Transportation Authority() and adopted a 1% sales tax dedicated to improving the regions transportation infrastructure. Together with state funding for the Colorado Springs Metro Interstate Expansion (COSMIX)(2007 completion) and the I-25 interchange with Highway 16 (2008 completion), significant progress has been made since 2003 in addressing the transportation needs of the area. Currently the City is trying to overcome a $23.3 million budget gap created by falling sales taxes and rising expenses.()Colorado Springs is primarily served by the interstate highways I-25 and Route 24.*25px Interstate 25 runs north-south from Mexico through Colorado Springs to Denver on its way northward towards Wyoming. I-25 in El Paso County running through Colorado Springs is known as Ronald Reagan Highway.*25px 24 traverses through eastern Colorado from Limon through several towns such as Matheson, Simla, Ramah, Calhan, Peyton and Falcon until it reaches the city and leaves the city through the mountains on its way to Minturn, CO.*25px SH 21 is a major east side expressway which begins near Black Forest and ends in Security-Widefield, also known more widely as Powers Boulevard.*25px SH 83 runs north-south from Denver to Colorado Springs.*25px SH 94 runs east-west from western Cheyenne County to Colorado Springs.*25px SH 115 begins from the US 50 interchange in Caon City to 85 (Nevada Avenue) in the city.*25px US 85 US 85 enters the city at Fountain and is signed as Nevada Avenue until it leaves the city at exit 153.*25px 87 US 87 remains concurrent with I-25 throughout Colorado.In addition, there were plans to develop a Front Range Toll Road, a privately-owned turnpike, which would begin south of Pueblo and end around Fort Collins. This toll road would allow rail and truck traffic to avoid the more highly traveled parts of I-25 along the Front Range. Initially, the project had support but has since been highly contested because of the need to condemn the land of many private citizens, through the use of domain, to make room for the corridor.()Concerns and ImprovementsIn order to combat congestion the Colorado Department of Transportation widened the Interstate 25 corridor throughout the city from four lanes (two in each direction) to six lanes. Ultimately, the plan is to make the interstate eight lanes through the city when funding becomes available.() This plan is similar in nature to Denvers T-Rex expansion plan.thumb|left|A Metro bus drives past a parking garage in downtown Colorado Springs.Several suggestions have been made to create a loop around the city though none have been implemented. The original plan to convert Powers Boulevard, a major eastside expressway, into a bypass for I-25 was abandoned, although some interchanges are overpasses and roads further east are being looked at.() Easier access to the airport has also been suggested. Overall the new thoroughfares would include one (or two) loop freeways, a spur into the city connecting the main freeway and the loop, east-west expressway upgrades, and easier access to the Colorado Springs Airport.Two grade separated interchanges were built in order to alleviate congestion at some of the citys worst intersections. Both the intersection at Powers and Woodmen and the intersection at Austin Bluffs and Union were converted into grade separated interchanges. A third interchange is being built at the intersection of Woodmen Road and Academy Boulevard and will be complete by 2011.In early 2010, the city of Colorado Springs approved an expansion of the northernmost part of Powers Boulevard in order to create an Interstate 25 bypass commonly referred to as the Copper Ridge Expansion. The project developers also have hopes of increasing business at the future I-25 Powers Boulevard connection by building a 2.8 million sq. ft. shopping mall on the East side of the Powers exit.() Developers hope to have the project finished by 2013, but have a deadline of 2018.()Colorado Springs is part of a consortium of cities trying to build the Range Commuter Rail.WalkabilityA 2011 study by Score ranked Colorado Springs 34th most walkable of fifty largest U.S. cities.()MediaEducationImage:Air Force Academy Doolittle Hall by David Shankbone.jpg|thumb|Doolittle Hall on the campus of the States Air Force Academy.Universities, colleges and special schools include:* College, founded in 1874* College, founded in 1969* The School for the Deaf and Blind, also founded in 1874* The States Air Force Academy, established on its present site in 1958* The of Colorado at Colorado Springs (UCCS), established on its present Cragmor grounds in 1965* Peak Community College* Bible College* College, acquired in December 1998 and offering degree and diploma programs(http://community.remingtoncollege.edu/timeline.php)* Technical University, established in 1965* State UniversityPueblo, Citadel Campus* University* University, Jesuit University* of the RockiesThe citys public schools are divided into several districts:* School District 3 On the south end* School District 20 On the north end* Springs School District 11 In the center of the city* School District 49 On the east side* Carson School District 8 On the far south end* School District 2 In the south central area* Irwin Charter Schools In the east central area* Mountain School District 12 In the southwest corner* School for the Deaf and BlindPrivate schools:* Colorado Springs School()* Springs Christian Schools* Evangelical Christian Academy* Valley School of Colorado* Baptist School* Springs Adventist Academy* St. Marys High School* Colorado Springs School* Redeemer Catholic School* Memorial Catholic School* Christi Catholic School* Peak Christian SchoolSister citiesImage:ArstanbekNogoev.jpg|thumb|right|Bishkek mayor Nogoev presents a gift for Colorado Springs mayor Rivera to a US airman at Air Base, in a ceremony aimed at reviving ties between the two sister cities()cities of Colorado Springs include:* Fujiyoshida, Japan (1962)* Kaohsiung, Taiwan (1983)* Smolensk, Russia (1993)* Kyrgyzstan (1994)* Nuevo Casas Grandes, Mexico (1996)* Bankstown, Australia (1999)Colorado Springs sister city organization began when Colorado Springs became partners with Fujiyoshida. The torii gate erected to commemorate the relationship stands at the corner of Bijou Street and Nevada Avenue, and is one of the citys most recognizable landmarks. The torii gate, crisscrossed bridge and shrine, located in the median between Platte and Bijou Streets in downtown Colorado Springs, were a gift to Colorado Springs, erected in 1966 by the Rotary Club of Colorado Springs to celebrate the friendship between the two communities. A plaque near the torii gate states that the purpose of the sister city relationship is to promote understanding between the people of our two countries and cities. The Fujiyoshida Student exchange program has become an annual event.To strengthen relations between the two cities, the Colorado Springs Youth Symphony regularly invites the Taiko drummers from the city to participate in a joint concert in the Pikes Peak Center. The orchestra played in Bankstown, Australia, in 2002 and again in June 2006 as part of their tours to Australia and New Zealand.Also, in 2006 and 2010, the Bankstown TAP (Talent Advancement Program), performed with the Youth Symphony, and the Colorado Springs Childrens Chorale, as a part of the annual In Harmony program.A notable similarity between Colorado Springs and its sister cities are their geographic positions, three of the six cities being located near the base of a major mountain or range.()Notable residentsColorado Springs has been home to a number of famous artists, including actor Chaney, Sr., members of the band OneRepublic, science fiction author Heinlein, Peanuts creator M. Schulz, conductor-composer Leide-Tedesco, and jazz guitarist Smith. Several athletes have also resided in Colorado Springs, including Baseball Hall of Fame member Gossage,NBA Hall of Famer Barry and 2008 Olympic Gold Medalist Cejudo. Additionally many well-known figure skaters, including Olympic champions Alan Jenkins, David Jenkins, and Fleming, have lived and trained in Colorado Springs during their competitive careers. Black Pegasus, a well known hip hop artist is from Colorado Springs. Award-winning author and lecturer A. ODonnell, Ph.D. resides here.In popular cultureColorado Springs has been the subject or setting for many books, movies and television shows, and is especially a frequent backdrop for political thrillers and military-themed stories because of its many military installations and vital importance to the United States continental defense. Notable television series using the city as a setting include Quinn, Medicine Woman and the Stargate series SG-1 and the films WarGames and The Prestige.See also*Citadel Mall*municipalities*Range Urban Corridor*At Austin Bluffs*Peak Library District*Central Colorado Urban Area*of ColoradoReferencesExternal links* City of Colorado Springs website* Colorado Springs Fine Arts Center* Colorado Springs Travel Information: Colorado Springs Convention & Visitors Bureau* Early Capitol and Legislative Assembly Locations* Colorado City Historical Society* 1905 Magazine Article with historical photos SpringsSpringsSpringsSpringsSpringsSpringsSprings (Colorado)SpringsSpringsSpringsko:SpringsSpringsSprings, ColoradoSprings, KoloradoSprings, ColoradoSprings, KoloradoColoratensesSpringsasSpringsSpringsSpringsja:SpringsSpringsSpringsSpringsru:-Springs, ColoradoSprings, ColoradoSpringsSprings, KoloradoSpringsSpringsSprings, ColoradoSpringsuk:-Springs, ColoradoSpringsSprings, Coloradozh:
6340
Canadian_English
Canadian English (CanE, CE, en-CA(en-CA is the code for Canadian English , as defined by standards (see 639-1 and 3166-1 alpha-2) and standards (see language tag).)) is the variety of English spoken in Canada. English is the language, or mother tongue, of approximately 24 million Canadians (77%), and more than 28 million (86%) are fluent in the language.() 82% of Canadians outside Quebec speak English natively, but within Quebec the figure drops to just 11% as most are native speakers of French.Canadian English contains elements of English and English in its vocabulary, as well as many distinctive Canadianisms. In many areas, speech is influenced by French, and there are notable local variations. Canada has very little dialect diversity compared to the United States.( The phonetics, phonology, morphology, syntax and lexicon for most of Canada are similar to that of the Western and Midland regions of the States.(Labov, p. 222.) The Canadian Great Lakes region has similarities to that of the Upper Midwest & Great Lakes region and/or dialect (in particular Michigan which has extensive cultural and economic ties with Ontario), while the phonological system of western Canadian English is virtually identical to that of the Pacific Northwest of the United States, and the phonetics are similar.(Boberg, C: Geolinguistic Diffusion and the U.S.-Canada Border, Language Variation and Change, 12(1):15) As such, Canadian English and English are sometimes classified together as American English. Canadian English spelling is largely a blend of British and American conventions.HistoryThe term Canadian English is first attested in a speech by the Reverend A. Constable Geikie in an address to the Institute in 1857. Geikie, a Scottish-born Canadian, reflected the Anglocentric attitude that would be prevalent in Canada for the next hundred years when he referred to the language as a corrupt dialect, in comparison to what he considered the proper English spoken by immigrants from Britain.(Chambers, p. xi.)Canadian English is the product of four waves of immigration and settlement over a period of almost two centuries. The first large wave of permanent English-speaking settlement in Canada, and linguistically the most important, was the influx of Loyalists fleeing the Revolution, chiefly from the States  as such, Canadian English is believed by some scholars to have derived from American English.(Canadian English. Brinton, Laurel J., and Fee, Marjery, ed. (2005). Ch. 12. in The Cambridge history of the English language. Volume VI: English in North America., Algeo, John, ed., pp. 422440. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, 1992.ISBN 0-521-26479-0, 9780521264792. On p. 422: It is now generally agreed that Canadian English originated as a variant of northern American English (the speech of New England, New York, New Jersey, and Pennsylvania).)(Canadian English. McArthur, T., ed. (2005). Concise Oxford companion to the English language, pp. 96102. Oxford, UK: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-280637-8. On p. 97: Because Canadian English and American English are so alike, some scholars have argued that in linguistic terms Canadian English is no more or less than a variety of (Northern) American English.) The historical development of Canadian English is underexplored, but recent studies suggest that Canadian English has been developing features of its own since the early 19th century,((New-Dialect Formation in Canada. (2008). Dollinger, Stefan. Amsterdam: Benjamins, 978 90 272 31068 6. On p. 279) while recent studies have shown the emergence of Canadian English features.(Labov, Ash, Boberg. 2006. The Atlas of North American English. Berlin: Mouton, ch. 15.) The second wave from Britain and Ireland was encouraged to settle in Canada after the of 1812 by the of Canada, who were worried about anti-English sentiment among its citizens. Waves of immigration from around the globe peaking in 1910 and 1960 had a lesser influence, but they did make Canada a multicultural country, ready to accept linguistic change from around the world during the current period of globalization.(Chambers, p. xixii.)The languages of peoples in Canada started to influence European languages used in Canada even before widespread settlement took place,() and the French of Canada provided vocabulary to the English of Canada.(Spelling and dictionariesCanadian spelling of the English language combines British and American conventions.* French-derived words that in American English end with -or and -er, such as color or center, retain British spellings (colour, honour and centre). While the United States uses the Anglo-French spelling defense (noun), Canadians use the British spellings defence and offence. (Note that defensive and offensive are universal.)* In other cases, Canadians and Americans differ from British spelling, such as in the case of nouns like curb and tire, which in British English are spelled kerb and tyre.* Words such as realize and paralyze are usually spelled with -ize or -yze rather than -ise or -yse. (The etymological convention that verbs derived from Greek roots are spelled with -ize and those from Latin with -ise is preserved in that practice.(Sir Ernest Gowers, ed., Fowlers Modern English Usage, 2nd ed. (Oxford: OUP, 1965), 314.))* Some nouns take -ice while matching verbs take -ise  for example, practice is a noun and practise is a verb; in addition, licence is a noun and license is a verb. (Note that prophecy and prophesy are universal.)* Canadian spelling sometimes retains the British practice of doubling consonant when adding suffixes to words even when the final syllable (before the suffix) is not stressed. Compare Canadian (and British) travelled, counselling, and controllable (always doubled in British, more often than not in Canadian) to American traveled, counseling, and controllable (only doubled when stressed). (Both Canadian and British English use balloted and profiting.())Canadian spelling conventions can be partly explained by Canadas trade history. For instance, the British spelling of the word cheque probably relates to Canadas once-important ties to British financial institutions. Canadas automobile industry, on the other hand, has been dominated by American firms from its inception, explaining why Canadians use the American spelling of tire and American terminology for the parts of automobiles (for example, truck instead of lorry, gasoline instead of petrol, trunk instead of boot).(Canadas political history has also had an influence on Canadian spelling. Canadas first prime minister, A. Macdonald, once issued an order-in-council directing that government papers be written in the British style.(Richard Gwyn, John A.: The Man Who Made Us, (of publication not listed: Random House Canada), 2007, pp. 34.)A contemporary reference for formal Canadian spelling is the spelling used for Hansard transcripts of the of Canada (see The Canadian Style in Further reading below). Many Canadian editors, though, use the Oxford Dictionary, often along with the chapter on spelling in Editing Canadian English, and, where necessary (depending on context), one or more other references. (See Further reading below.)The first Canadian dictionaries of Canadian English were edited by Walter Spencer Avis and published by Gage Ltd. The Beginners Dictionary (1962), the Intermediate Dictionary (1964) and, finally, the Senior Dictionary (1967) were milestones in Canadian English lexicography. Many secondary schools in Canada use these dictionaries. The dictionaries have regularly been updated since: the Senior Dictionary was renamed Gage Canadian Dictionary and exists in what may be called its 5th edition from 1997. Gage was acquired by Thomson Nelson around 2003. The latest editions were published in 2009 by HarperCollins.In 1997, the ITP Nelson Dictionary of the Canadian English Language was another product, but has not been updated since.In 1998, Oxford University Press produced a Canadian English dictionary, after five years of lexicographical research, entitled The Oxford Canadian Dictionary. A second edition, retitled The Canadian Oxford Dictionary, was published in 2004. Just as the older dictionaries it includes uniquely Canadian words and words borrowed from other languages, and surveyed spellings, such as whether colour or color was the more popular choice in common use. Paperback and concise versions (2005, 2006), with minor updates, are available.The scholarly Dictionary of Canadianisms on Historical Principles (DCHP) was first published in 1967 by Gage Ltd. It was a partner project of the Senior Dictionary (and appeared only a few weeks apart from it). The DCHP can be considered the Canadian OED, as it documents the historical development of Canadian English words that can be classified as Canadianisms. It therefore includes words such as mukluk, Canuck, bluff and grow op, but does not list common core words such as desk, table or car. It is a specialist, scholarly dictionary, but is not without interest to the general public. After more than 40 years, a second edition has been commenced at UBC in Vancouver in 2006.()Throughout most of the 20th century, Canadian newspapers generally adopted American spellings for example, color as opposed to the British-based colour. The use of such spellings was the long-standing practice of Canadian Press perhaps since that news agencys inception, but visibly the norm prior to War II.() The practice of dropping the letter u in such words was also considered a labour-saving technique during the early days of printing in which type was set manually.( Canadian newspapers also received much of their international content from American press agencies, therefore it was much easier for editorial staff to leave the spellings from the wire services as provided.()More recently, Canadian newspapers have adopted the British spelling variants such as -our endings, notably with Globe and Mail changing its spelling policy in October 1990.() Other Canadian newspapers adopted similar changes later that decade, such as the Southam newspaper chains conversion in September 1998.() The Star adopted this new spelling policy in September 1997 after that publications ombudsman discounted the issue earlier in 1997.(() The Star had always avoiding using recognized Canadian spelling, citing the Gage Canadian Dictionary in their defence. Controversy around this issue was frequent. When the Gage Dictionary finally adopted standard Canadian spelling, the Star followed suit.Phonemic incidenceThe pronunciation of certain words has both American and British influence; some pronunciations are more distinctively Canadian.* The name of the letter Z is normally the Anglo-European (and French) zed; the American zee is less common in Canada, and it is often stigmatized, though the latter is common in younger speakers.()()* In the words adult and composite  the emphasis is usually on the first syllable, as in Britain.* Canadians side with the British on the pronunciation of shone , often lever , and several other words; been is pronounced by many speakers as  rather than ; as in Southern England, either and neither are more commonly  and , respectively.* Schedule can sometimes be ; process, progress, and project are sometimes pronounced , , and ; leisure is often , harassment is sometimes .(The pronunciation with the stress on the second syllable is the most common pronunciation, but is considered incorrect by some people.  - Canadian Oxford Dictionary)* Again and against are often pronounced  rather than .* The stressed vowel of words such as borrow, sorry or tomorrow is  rather than .* Words such as fragile, fertile, and mobile are pronounced , , and . The pronunciation of fertile as  is also becoming somewhat common in Canada, even though  remains dominant.* Words like semi, anti, and multi tend to be pronounced , , and  rather than , , and .* Loanwords that have a low central vowel in their language of origin, such as llama, pasta, and pyjamas, as well as place names like Gaza, tend to have  rather than  (which is the same as  due to the fatherbother merger, see below); this also applies to older loans like drama or Apache. The word khaki is sometimes pronounced , the preferred pronunciation of the Army during the World War.(The pronunciation  was the one used by author and veteran Mowat.)*Pecan is usually /pikn/ or /pikn/, as opposed to /pkn/, more common in the US.(pecan pi:kan, pi:kan, pkn - Canadian Oxford Dictionary)* The most common pronunciation of vase is .(Vase. (2009). In Merriam-Webster Online Dictionary. Retrieved March 3, 2009.)* Words of French origin, such as clique and niche are pronounced more like they would be in French, so  rather than ,  rather than .* The word syrup is commonly pronounced .* The word premier leader of a provincial or territorial government is commonly pronounced , with  and  being rare variants.* Many Canadians pronounce asphalt as ash-falt .(Barber, p. 77.) This pronunciation is also common in Australian English, but not in General American English or British English.* Some Canadians pronounce predecessor as , and mom .(predecessor predsesr, pri:-| mom mm, mm - Canadian Oxford Dictionary)Regional variationCanada has very little dialect diversity compared to the United States.( The provinces east of Ontario show the largest dialect diversity. Northern Canada is, according to Labov, a dialect region in formation, and a homogenous dialect has not yet formed.(Labov, p. 214) A very homogeneous dialect exists in Western and Central Canada, a situation that is similar to that of the Western United States. Labov identifies an inland region that concentrates all of the defining features of the dialect centred on the Prairies, with periphery areas with more variable patterns including the metropolitan areas of Vancouver and Toronto.( This dialect forms a dialect continuum with the far Western United States, however it is sharply differentiated from the Inland Northern United States. This is a result of the relatively recent phenomenon known as the cities vowel shift; see below.Western and Central Dialect350px|right|thumb|Based on Labov et al.; averaged F1/F2 means for speakers from Western and Central Canada. Note that  and  are indistinguishable;  and  are very open.As a variety of North American English, this variety is similar to most other forms of North American speech in being a rhotic accent, which is historically a significant marker in differentiating different English varieties.Like General American, this variety possesses the merryMarymarry merger (except in Montreal, which tends towards a distinction between marry and merry(Labov p. 218)), as well as the merger.Canadian raisingPerhaps the most recognizable feature of Canadian English is raising. The diphthongs  and  are raised before voiceless consonants, namely , , , , and . In these environments,  becomes . One of the few phonetic variables that divides Canadians regionally is the articulation of the raised allophone of : in Ontario, it tends to have a mid-central or even mid-front articulation, sometimes approaching , while in the West and Maritimes a more retracted sound is heard, closer to .(Boberg) Among some speakers in the Prairies and in Nova Scotia, the retraction is strong enough to cause some tokens of raised  to merge with , so that couch and coach sound the same, and about sounds like a boat (though never like a boot, as in the American stereotype of Canadian raising). Canadian raising is found throughout western and central Canada, as well as in parts of the Provinces.( It is the strongest in the inland region, and is receding in younger speakers in Lower Mainland Columbia, as well as certain parts of Ontario.Many Canadians, especially in parts of the Atlantic provinces, do not possess Canadian raising. In the U.S., this feature can be found in areas near the border such as the Midwest and parts of England, although it is much less common than in Canada; raising of  alone, however, is increasing in the U.S., and unlike raising of , is generally not noticed by people who do not have the raising.Because of Canadian raising, many speakers are able to distinguish between words such as writer and rider  a feat otherwise impossible, because North American dialects turn intervocalic  into an alveolar flap. Thus writer and rider are distinguished solely by their vowels, even though the distinction between their consonants has since been lost. Speakers who do not have raising cannot distinguish between these two words.The cotcaught merger and the Canadian ShiftAlmost all Canadians have the merger, which also occurs in the Western U.S. Speakers do not distinguish  (as in caught) and  (as in cot), which merge as  or . Speakers with this merger produce these vowels identically, and often fail to hear the difference when speakers who preserve the distinction (for example, speakers of American and Northern American English) pronounce these vowels. This merger has existed in Canada for several generations.(Labov p. 218.)This merger creates a hole in the short vowel sub-system(Martinet, Andre 1955. Economie des changements phonetiques. Berne: Francke.) and triggers a sound change known as the Shift, which involves the front lax vowels . The  of bat is lowered and retracted in the direction of  (except in some environments, see below). Indeed,  is further back in this variety than almost all other North American dialects;(Labov p. 219.) the retraction of  was independently observed in Vancouver(Esling, John H. and Henry J. Warkentyne (1993). Retracting of  in Vancouver English.) and is more advanced for Ontarians and women than for people from the Prairies or Canada and men.(Charles Boberg, Sounding Canadian from Coast to Coast: Regional accents in Canadian English.) Then,  and  may be lowered (in the direction of  and ) and/or retracted; studies actually disagree on the trajectory of the shift.(Labov et al. 2006; Charles Boberg, The Canadian Shift in Montreal; Robert Hagiwara. Vowel production in Winnipeg; Rebecca V. Roeder and Lidia Jarmasz. The Canadian Shift in Toronto.) For example, Labov and others. (2006) noted a backward and downward movement of  in apparent time in all of Canada except the Atlantic Provinces, but no movement of  was detected.Therefore, in Canadian English, the short-a and the short-o are shifted in opposite directions to that of the Northern Cities shift, found across the border in the Inland Northern U.S., which is causing these two dialects to diverge: the Canadian short-a is very similar in quality to the Inland Northern short-o; for example, the production  would be recognized as map in Canada, but mop in the Inland North.Other featuresMost Canadians have two principal allophones of  (raised to lower-mid position before voiceless consonants and low-central or low-back elsewhere) and three of  (raised before voiceless consonants, fronted to  or  before nasals, and low-central elsewhere).Unlike in many American English dialects,  remains a low-front vowel in most environments in Canadian English. Raising along the front periphery of the vowel space is restricted to two environments  before nasal and voiced velar consonants  and varies regionally even in these. Ontario and Maritime Canadian English commonly show some raising before nasals, though not as extreme as in many American varieties. Much less raising is heard on the Prairies, and some ethnic groups in Montreal show no pre-nasal raising at all. On the other hand, some Prairie speech exhibits raising of  before voiced velars ( and ), with an up-glide rather than an in-glide, so that bag sounds close to vague.(Labov, p. 221.)The first element of  (as in start) tends to be raised. As with Canadian raising, the relative advancement of the raised nucleus is a regional indicator. A striking feature of Atlantic Canadian speech (the Maritimes and Newfoundland) is a nucleus that approaches the front region of the vowel space, accompanied by strong rhoticity, ranging from  to . Western Canadian speech has a much more retracted articulation with a longer non-rhotic portion, approaching a mid-back quality,  (though there is no tendency toward a merger with ). Articulation of  in Ontario is in a position midway between the Atlantic and Western values.(Labov, p. 219.)Another change in progress in Canadian English, part of a continental trend affecting many North American varieties, is the fronting of , whereby the nucleus of  moves forward to high-central or even high-front position, directly behind . There is a wide range of allophonic dispersion in the set of words containing  (i.e., the GOOSE set), extending over most of the high region of the vowel space. Most advanced are tokens of  in free position after coronals (do, too); behind these are tokens in syllables closed with coronals (boots, food, soon), then tokens before non-coronals (goof, soup); remaining in back position are tokens of  before  (cool, pool, tool). Unlike in some British speech, Canadian English does not show any fronting or unrounding of the glide of , and most Canadians show no parallel centralization of , which generally remains in back position, except in Breton and Newfoundland.Traditionally diphthongal vowels such as  (as in boat) and  (as in bait) have qualities much closer to monophthongs in some speakers especially in the Inland region.Some older speakers still maintain a distinction between whale and wail, and do and dew.(Labov p.218.)British ColumbiaBritish Columbia English has several words still in current use borrowed from the Jargon although the use of such vocabulary is observably decreasing. The most famous and widely used of these terms are skookum and saltchuck. However, among young Columbians, almost no one uses this vocabulary, and only a small percentage is even familiar with the meaning of such words. In the Yukon, cheechako is used for newcomers or greenhorns. A study shows that people from Vancouver exhibit more vowel retraction of  before nasals than people from Toronto, and this retraction may become a regional marker of West Coast English.(Erin Hall Regional variation in Canadian English vowel backing)Prairies (Manitoba, Saskatchewan and Alberta)A strong Canadian raising exists in the prairie regions together with certain older usages such as chesterfield and front room also associated with the Maritimes. Aboriginal Canadians are a larger and more conspicuous population in prairie cities than elsewhere in the country and certain elements of aboriginal speech in English are sometimes to be heard. Similarly, the linguistic legacy, mostly intonation but also speech patterns and syntax, of the Scandinavian, Slavic and German settlers  who are far more numerous and historically important in the Prairies than in Ontario or the Maritimes  can be heard in the general milieu. Again, the large Mtis population in Saskatchewan and Manitoba also carries with it certain linguistic traits inherited from French, Aboriginal and Celtic forebears.Some terms are derived from immigrant groups or are just local inventions:* Bluff: small group of trees isolated by prairie* Bunny hug: elsewhere hoodie or hooded sweat shirt (mainly in Saskatchewan, but also in Alberta)* Ginch/gonch/gitch/gotch: underwear (usually mens or boys underwear, more specifically briefs), probably of Eastern European or Ukrainian origin.() Gitch and gotch are primarily used in Saskatchewan and Manitoba while the variants with an n are common in Alberta and British Columbia.(Doubletongued.org, reference for gonch.)* Jam buster: jelly-filled doughnut.* Porch climber: moonshine or homemade alcohol.* Pot hole: usually a deeper slough; also used to refer to slough in plural. Pot hole more commonly refers to a hole in a paved road caused by the freezing and thawing cycle.* Slough: pond  usually a pond on a farm* Vi-Co: occasionally used in Saskatchewan instead of chocolate milk. Formerly a brand of chocolate milk.In farming communities with substantial Ukrainian, German or Mennonite populations, accents, sentence structure and vocabulary influenced by these languages is common.OntarioOttawa ValleyThe area to the north and west of Ottawa is heavily influenced by original Scottish, Irish, and German settlers, with many French loanwords. This is frequently referred to as the Valley Accent.TorontoAlthough only 1.5% of Torontonians speak French, a relatively low proportion of them (56.2%) are native speakers of English, according to the 2006 Census.() As a result Toronto shows a more variable speech pattern.(Labov p. 214215.) Although slang terms used in Toronto are synonymous with those used in other major North American cities, there is also an influx of slang terminology originating from Torontos many immigrant communities. These terms originate mainly from various European, Asian and African words. Among youths in predominantly West Indian areas, a large number of words borrowed from West Indian Patois can be heard.Northwest OntarioWith a smaller French population, and sizable Aboriginal population, this area is somewhat unique as having elements from both the Western provinces and the rest of Ontario. Communities receive media from both directions, and residents travel frequently to both areas, prompting a blending of dialects. Sharp eared locals can detect from word usage (soda versus pop, hoodie versus bunny hug) where one originated, Down east, east of (Ste. Marie and beyond the Lakes) or Out West (west of the Manitoba border).Quebec* Many people in Montreal distinguish between the words marry and merry.(* Quebec Anglophones generally pronounce French street names in Montreal as French words. Pie IX Boulevard is pronounced as in French (pea-nuf), not as pie nine. On the other hand, most Anglophones do pronounce final Ds, as in Bernard and Bouchard.* In the city of Montreal, especially in some of the western suburbs like Cte-St-Luc and Hampstead, there is a strong Jewish influence in the English spoken in these areas. A large wave of Jewish immigration from Europe and the former Union before and after War II is also evident today. Their English has a strong Yiddish influence; there are some similarities to English spoken in New York.* Words used mainly in Quebec and especially in Montreal are:(Boberg, p. 36.) stage for apprenticeship or internship, copybook for a notebook, dpanneur or dep for a convenience store, and guichet for an ABM/ATM. It is also common for Anglophones, particularly of Greek or Italian descent, to use translated French words instead of common English equivalents such as open and close for on and off or Open the lights, please for Turn on the lights, please. This is however, openly acknowledged as incorrect grammar. Maritimes350px|right|thumb|Based on Labov et al.; averaged F1/F2 means for speakers from NS, NB, NL.Many in the Maritime provinces  Scotia, Brunswick and Edward Island  have an accent that sounds more like English and, in some places, English than General American. Outside of major communities, dialects can vary markedly from community to community, as well as from province to province, reflecting ethnic origin as well as a past in which there were few roads and many communities, with some villages very isolated. Into the 1980s, residents of villages in northern Nova Scotia could identify themselves by dialects and accents distinctive to their village. The dialects of Prince Edward Island are often considered the most distinct grouping. The phonology of English has some unique features:* Pre-consonantal  is sometimes deleted.* The flapping of intervocalic  and  to alveolar tap  between vowels, as well as pronouncing it as a glottal stop , is less common in the Maritimes. Therefore, battery is pronounced  instead of .* Especially among the older generation,  and  are not merged; that is, the beginning sound of why, white, and which is different from that of witch, with, wear.* Like most varieties of CanE, Maritimer English contains Canadian raising.NewfoundlandThe dialect spoken in the province of and Labrador, an autonomous dominion until March 31, 1949, is often considered the most distinctive Canadian English dialect. Some Newfoundland English differs in vowel pronunciation, morphology, syntax, and preservation of archaic adverbal-intensifiers. The dialect can vary markedly from community to community, as well as from region to region, reflecting ethnic origin as well as a past in which there were few roads and many communities, and fishing villages in particular remained very isolated. A few speakers have a transitional pinpen merger.(Northern CanadaNations and Inuit people from Canada speak a version of Canadian English influenced by the phonology of their first languages. European Canadians in these regions are relatively recent arrivals, and have not produced a dialect that is distinct from southern Canadian English.(Lavov, William; Ash, Sharon; and Boberg, Charles. The Atlas of North American English: Phonetics, Phonology, and Sound Change. Walter de Gruyter, 2006, p. 216: In general, the English spoken in the Canadian North can be viewed as a dialect in formation ... The regions European population is too sparsely settled, too diverse in origin, and too recently arrived to have produced an identifiable, homogeneous dialect distinct from southern Canadian English, while its large Aboriginal population speaks a range of varieties influenced by non-English substrates ...)Grammar* When writing, Canadians will start a sentence with As well, in the sense of in addition; this construction is a Canadianism.(Trudgill and Hannah, International English (4th edition), p. 76.)* Canadian, Australian and British English share idioms like in hospital and to university,()() In American English, the definite article is mandatory in both cases. (However, in most situations where English speakers outside the U.S. use the phrase to university, American English speakers instead use the phrase to college, with no article required.)VocabularyWhere Canadian English shares vocabulary with other English dialects, it tends to share most with American English. Many terms are shared with Britain, but not with the majority of American speakers. In some cases British and the American terms coexist in Canadian English to various extents; a classic example is holiday, often used interchangeably with vacation, distinguishing the two between a trip elsewhere and general time off work respectively. In addition, the vocabulary of Canadian English also features words that are seldom (if ever) found elsewhere. A good resource for these and other words is the of Canadianisms on Historical Principles (Avis and others. 1967), which is currently being revised at the of British Columbia, Vancouver.As a member of the of Nations, Canada shares many items of institutional terminology and professional designations with the countries of the former Empire  for example, constable, for a police officer of the lowest rank, and chartered accountant.EducationThe term college, which refers to post-secondary education in general in the U.S., refers in Canada to either a post-secondary technical or vocational institution, or to one of the colleges that exist as schools within some Canadian universities. Most often, a college is a community college, not a university. It may also refer to a CEGEP in Quebec. In Canada, college student might denote someone obtaining a diploma in business management while university student is the term for someone earning a degree. For that reason, going to college does not have the same meaning as going to university, unless the speaker or context clarifies the specific level of post-secondary education that is meant.Within the public school system the chief administrator of a school is generally the principal, as in the United States, but the term is not used preceding his or her name, i.e. Principal Smith. The assistant to the principal is not titled as assistant principal, but rather as vice-principal, although the former is not unknown.Canadian universities publish calendars or schedules, not catalogs as in the U.S.. Canadian students write or take exams (in the U.S., students generally take exams while teachers write them); they rarely sit them (standard British usage). Those who supervise students during an exam are sometimes called invigilators as in Britain, or sometimes proctors as in the U.S.; usage may depend on the region or even the individual institution.Successive years of school are usually referred to as grade one, grade two, and so on. In Quebec, the speaker (if Francophone) will often say primary one, primary two (a direct translation from the French), and so on; while Anglophones will say grade one, grade two. (Compare American first grade, second grade (sporadically found in Canada), and English/Welsh Year 1, Year 2, Scottish/Nth.Irish Primary 1, Primary 2 or P1, P2, and Sth.Irish First Class, Second Class and so on.)(American Speech 80.1 (2005), p. 47.)In the U.S., the four years of high school are termed the freshman, sophomore, junior, and senior years (terms also used for college years); in Canada, the specific levels are used instead (ie, grade nine).(American Speech 80.1 (2005), p. 48.) As for higher education, only the term freshman (often reduced to frosh) has some currency in Canada.( The American usages sophomore, junior and senior are not used in Canadian university terminology, or in speech. The specific high-school grades and university years are therefore stated and individualized; for example, the grade 12s failed to graduate; John is in his second year at McMaster. The first year, third year designation also applies to Canadian law school students, as opposed to the common American usage of 1L, 2L and 3L.Canadian students use the term marks (more common in England) or grades (more common in the US) to refer to their results; usage is very mixed.(Units of measurementUnlike in the United States, use of metric units within a majority of industries (but not all) is standard in Canada, as a result of the national adoption of the Metric System during the mid-to-late 1970s; this has spawned some colloquial usages such as klick for kilometre (as also heard in the U.S. military). See in Canada. Nonetheless, Imperial units are still used in many situations. For example, many Canadians will usually state their weight and height in pounds and feet/inches, respectively. Temperatures for cooking are often given in Fahrenheit. Directions in the provinces are often given using miles, because the country roads generally follow the mile-based grid of the Land Survey. The letter size of 8.5 inches  11 inches is used instead of the international and metric A4 size of 210 mm  297 mm.Transportation* Although Canadian lexicon features both railway and railroad, railway is the usual term in naming (witness National Railway and Pacific Railway), though railroad can be heard fairly frequently in some regions; most terminology in Canada, however, follows American usage (for example, ties and cars rather than sleepers and carriages).* A two-way ticket can be either a round-trip (American term) or a return (British term).* The terms highway (for example, Highway), expressway (Central Canada, as in the Expressway) and freeway (Park Freeway, Edmonton) are often used to describe various high speed roads with varying levels of access control. Generally, but not exclusively, highway refers to a provincially funded road. Often such roads will be numbered. Similar to the US, the terms expressway and freeway are often used interchangeably to refer to highways, that is, divided highways with access only at grade-separated interchanges (for example, a 400-Series Highway in Ontario). However, expressway may also refer to a road that has control of access but has at-grade junctions, railway crossings (for example, the Expressway in Bay.) Sometimes the term Parkway is also used (for example, the Parkway in Guelph). In Saskatchewan, the term grid road is used to refer to minor highways or rural roads, usually gravel, referring to the grid upon which they were originally designed. In Quebec, freeways and expressways are called autoroutes. In Alberta, the generic Trail is often used to describe a freeway, expressway or major urban street (for example, Trail, Trail or Trail in Calgary, Trail in Edmonton). The British term motorway is not used. The American terms turnpike and tollway for a toll road are not common. The term throughway or thruway was used for first tolled limited-access highways (for example, the Deas Island Throughway, now Highway 99, from BC, to Washington, USA or the Saint John Throughway (Highway 1) in John, NB), but this term is not common anymore. In everyday speech, when a particular roadway is not being specified, the term highway is generally or exclusively used.* A railway at-grade junction is a level crossing; the U.S. term grade crossing is rarely, if ever, used.* A railway or highway crossing overhead is an overpass or underpass, depending on which part of the crossing is referred to (the two are used more or less interchangeably); the British term flyover is sometimes used in Ontario, and in the Maritimes as well as on occasion in the prairies (such as the 4th avenue flyover in Calgary, Alberta), subway is also used.* In Quebec, English speakers often use the word Metro to mean subway. Non-native Anglophones of Quebec will also use the designated proper title Metro to describe the Montral subway system.* The term Texas gate refers to the type of metal grid called a cattle guard in American English or a cattle grid in British English.*Depending on the region, large trucks used to transport and deliver goods are referred to as transport trucks (Eg. used in Ontario and Alberta) or transfer trucks (Eg. used in Prince Edward Island)Politics* While in standard usage the terms minister and premier are interchangeable terms for the head of an elected parliamentary government, Canadian English today generally follows a usage convention of reserving the title prime minister for the federal first minister and referring to provincial or territorial leaders as premiers. However, because French does not have separate terms for the two positions, using premier ministre for both, the title prime minister is sometimes seen in reference to a provincial leader when a francophone is speaking or writing English. As well, until the 1970s the leader of the Ontario provincial government was officially styled prime minister.* When a majority of the elected members of the House of Commons or a provincial legislature are not members of the same party as the government, the situation is referred to as a minority government rather than a hung Parliament.* To table a document in Canada is to present it (as in Britain), whereas in the U.S. it means to withdraw it from consideration. (However in non-governmental meetings using Roberts Rules of Order to table a document can be to postpone consideration until a later date.)* Several political terms are more in use in Canada than elsewhere, including riding (as a general term for a parliamentary constituency or electoral district). The term reeve was at one time common for the equivalent of a mayor in some smaller municipalities in Columbia and Ontario, but is now falling into disuse. The title is still used for the leader of a rural municipality in Saskatchewan and Manitoba.* The term Tory, used in Britain with a similar meaning, denotes a supporter of the federal Party of Canada, the historic federal or provincial Progressive Conservative Party. The term Tory is also used to denote the more socially liberal wings of the Tory parties. Tory is less commonly used, and refers to more strict fiscal (rather than social) conservatism. The U.S. use of Tory to mean the Loyalists in the time of the American Revolution is not used in Canada, where they are called Empire Loyalists, or simply Loyalists.* Members of the Party of Canada or a provincial Liberal party are sometimes referred to as Grits. Historically, the term comes from the phrase Clear Grit, used in Victorian times in Canada to denote an object of quality or a truthful person. The term was assumed as a nickname by Liberals by the 1850s.* Members of the Qubcois are sometimes referred to as Bloquistes. At the purely provincial level, members of Quebecs Qubcois are often referred to as Pquistes, and members of the Quebec provincial dmocratique du Qubec as Adquistes.* The term Socred is no longer common due to its namesake partys decline, but referred to members of the Social Credit Party, and was particularly common in British Columbia. It was not used for Social Credit members from Quebec, nor generally used for the federal caucus of that party; in both cases Crditiste, the French term, was used in English.* Members of the Senate are referred to by the title Senator preceding their name, as in the United States. Members of the House of Commons, following British parliamentary nomenclature, are termed Members of Parliament, and are referred to as Jennifer Jones, MP during their term of office only. This style is extended to the Premiers of the provinces during their service. Senators, and members of the Privy Council are styled The Honourable for life, and the Prime Minister of Canada is styled The Right Honourable for life, as is the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and the Governor-General. This honorific may also be bestowed by Parliament, as it was to retiring deputy prime minister Gray in 1996. Members of provincial legislatures do not have a pre-nominal style, except in certain provinces, such as Nova Scotia where members of the Queens Council of Nova Scotia are styled The Honourable for life, and are entitled to the use of the post-nominal letters ECNS.() The Cabinet of Ontario serves concurrently (and not for life) as the Council of Ontario, while serving members are styled The Honourable, but are not entitled to post-nominal letters.* Members of provincial/territorial legislative assemblies are called MLAs in all provinces and territories except: Ontario, where they have been called Members of Provincial Parliament (MPPs) since 1938; Quebec, where they have been called Members of the National Assembly (MNAs) since 1968; and and Labrador, where they are called Members of the House of Assembly (MHAs).LawLawyers in all parts of Canada, except Quebec, which has its own civil law system, are called barristers and solicitors because any lawyer licensed in any of the common law provinces and territories must pass bar exams for, and is permitted to engage in, both types of legal practice in contrast to other common-law jurisdictions such as England, Wales and Ireland where the two are traditionally separated (i.e., Canada has a fused legal profession). The words lawyer and counsel (not counsellor) predominate in everyday contexts; the word attorney refers to any personal representative. Canadian lawyers generally do not refer to themselves as attorneys, a term which is common in the United States.The equivalent of an American attorney, meaning the barrister representing the state in criminal proceedings, is called a attorney (in Ontario), crown counsel (in British Columbia), crown prosecutor or the crown, on account of Canadas status as a monarchy in which Crown is the locus of state power.The words advocate and notary  two distinct professions in Quebec civil law  are used to refer to that provinces equivalent of barrister and solicitor, respectively. In Canadas law provinces and territories, the word notary means strictly a public.Within the Canadian legal community itself, the word solicitor is often used to refer to any Canadian lawyer in general (much like the way the word attorney is used in the United States to refer to any American lawyer in general). Despite the conceptual distinction between barrister and solicitor, Canadian court documents would contain a phrase such as John Smith, solicitor for the Plaintiff even though John Smith may well himself be the barrister who argues the case in court. In a letter introducing him/herself to an opposing lawyer, a Canadian lawyer normally writes something like I am the solicitor for Mr. Tom Jones.The word litigator is also used by lawyers to refer to a fellow lawyer who specializes in lawsuits even though the more traditional word barrister is still employed to denote the same specialization.Judges of Canadas superior courts (which exist at the provincial and territorial levels) are traditionally addressed as My Lord or My Lady, like much of the Commonwealth, however there are some variances across certain jurisdictions, with some superior court judges preferring the titles Mister Justice or Madam Justice to Lordship.Masters are addressed as Mr. Master or simply Sir.Judges of provincial or inferior courts are traditionally referred to in person as Your Honour. Judges of the Court of Canada and of the federal-level courts prefer the use of Mister/Madam (Chief) Justice. Justices of The Peace are addressed as Your Worship. Your Honour is also the correct form of address for a Lieutenant Governor.As in England, a serious crime is called an offence, while a less-serious crime is called a offence. The older words felony and misdemeanour, which are still used in the United States, are not used in Canadas current Criminal Code (R.S.C. 1985, c. C-46) or by todays Canadian legal system. As noted throughout the Criminal Code, a person accused of a crime is called the accused and not the defendant, a term used instead in civil lawsuits.A county in British Columbia means only a regional jurisdiction of the courts and justice system and is not otherwise connected to governance as with counties in other provinces and in the United States. The rough equivalent to county as used elsewhere is a District.PlacesDistinctive Canadianisms are:* Bachelor: bachelor apartment, an apartment all in a single room, with a small bathroom attached (They have a bachelor for rent).(Oxford Advanced Learners Dictionary, bachelor.) The usual American term is studio. In Quebec, this is known as a one-and-a-half apartment;() some Canadians, especially in Prince Edward Island, call it a loft.(Boberg 2005.)* house: or more often pub. Drinking establishments which are not pubs may be termed bars, taverns or lounges, among other terms.* Camp: in Northern Ontario, it refers to what is called a cottage in the rest of Ontario and a cabin in the West.(Boberg 2005, p. 38.) It is also used, to a lesser extent, in New Brunswick, Nova Scotia, as well as in parts of New England.* Fire hall: station, firehouse.()* height of land: a divide. Originally American.(Websters New World College Dictionary, Wiley, 2004.)* Parkade: a garage, especially in the West.(* Washroom:() the general term for what is normally named public toilet or lavatory in Britain. In the U.S. (where it originated) the word was mostly replaced by restroom in the 20th century. Generally used only as a technical or commercial term outside of Canada. The word bathroom is also used.* Nation reserve, rather than the U.S. term Federal Indian Reservation. A slang variant of this term is the shortened res or rez.* Rancherie: the residential area of a First Nation reserve, used in BC only.* hole and/or quiggly: the depression in the ground left by a kekuli or pithouse. Groups of them are called quiggly hole towns. Used in the BC Interior only.* Gasbar: a station (gas station) with a central island, having pumps under a fixed metal or concrete awning.* Boozcan: an after-hours establishment where alcohol is served, often illegally.* The term dpanneur, or the diminutive form dep, is often used by English speakers in Quebec. This is because stores are called dpanneurs in Canadian French.* A Snye is a side-water channel that rejoins a larger river, creating an island.Daily lifeTerms common in Canada, Britain and Ireland but less frequent or nonexistent in the U.S. are:* Tin (as in tin of tuna), for can, especially among older speakers. Among younger speakers, can is more common, with tin referring to a can which is wider than it is tall.* Cutlery, for silverware or flatware.* Serviette, especially in Eastern Canada, for a paper table napkin.* Tap, conspicuously more common than faucet in everyday usage.The following are more or less distinctively Canadian:* ABM, bank machine: synonymous with ATM (which is also used).(Oxford Advanced Learners Dictionary, ABM; Boberg 2005.)* BFI bin: Dumpster, after a prominent Canadian waste management company, in provinces where that company does business; compare Kleenex, Xerox.* Chesterfield: originally British and internationally used (as in classic furnishing terminology) to refer to a sofa whose arms are the same height as the back, it is a term for any couch or sofa in Canada (and, to some extent, Northern California).(OUP.com )(Chesterfield. The American Heritage Dictionary of the English Language: Fourth Edition. 2000) Once a hallmark of CanE, chesterfield as with settee and davenport, is now largely in decline among younger generations in the western and central regions.(Utoronto.ca J.K. Chambers, The Canada-U.S. border as a vanishing isogloss: the evidence of chesterfield. Journal of English Linguistics 23 (1995): 156-66.) Couch is now the most common term; sofa is also used.* Eavestroughs: gutters. Also used, especially in the past, in the Northern and Western U.S.; the first recorded usage is in Melvilles Moby-Dick: The tails tapering down that way, serve to carry off the water, dye see. Same with cocked hats; the cocks form gable-end eave-troughs sic, Flask.(Oxford Advanced Learners Dictionary, eavestrough; Oxford English Dictionary; American Heritage Dictionary.)* Flush: Toilet, used primarily by older speakers throughout the Maritimes.* Garburator: (rhymes with carburetor) a disposal.(According to the Canadian Oxford Dictionary (second edition), garburator is Canadian and garbage disposal is North American.)* Homogenized milk or homo milk: Milk containing 3.25% milk fat, typically called whole milk in the US.* Hydro: a common synonym for electrical service, used primarily in New Brunswick, Quebec, Ontario, Manitoba and British Columbia. Most of the power in these provinces is hydroelectricity, and incorporate the term Hydro. Usage: I didnt pay my hydro bill so they shut off my lights. Hence hydrofield, a line of electricity transmission towers, usually in groups cutting across a city, and hydro lines/poles, electrical transmission lines/poles.(Oxford Advanced Learners Dictionary, hydro.) These usages of hydro are also standard in the Australian state of Tasmania. Also in slang usage can refer to hydroponically grown marijuana.* Loonie: the Canadian one-dollar coin; derived from the use of the common loon on the reverse. The toonie (less commonly spelled tooney, twooney, twoonie) is the two-dollar coin. Loonie is also used to refer to the Canadian currency, particularly when discussing the exchange rate with the U.S. dollar; neither loonie nor toonie can describe amounts of money beyond a very small amount. (for example, I have thirty dollars versus got a loonie/toonie?).* Pencil crayon:() coloured pencil.* Pogie or pogey: term referring to unemployment insurance, which is now officially called Employment Insurance in Canada. Derived from the use of pogey as a term for a poorhouse.() Not used for welfare, in which case the term is the dole, as in hes on the dole, eh?.ApparelThe following are common in Canada, but not in the U.S. or the U.K.* Runners:(Oxford Advanced Learners Dictionary, runner.) running shoes, especially in Canada.(American Speech 80.1 (2005).) Also used in English(Cambridge Advanced Learners Dictionary.) and English.(Sometimes the gym doesnt fix it, Irish Times, Tuesday, January 06, 2009)(Machismo . . . or masochism?, The Irish Times  Saturday March 22, 2008)(Stars in the running, The Irish Times, Tueesday October 7, 2008) Atlantic Canada prefers sneakers while central Canada (including Quebec and Ontario) prefer running shoes.(American Speech 80.1 (2005), p. 36.)* Toque (also spelled tuque or touque): a knitted winter hat. A similar hat would be called a beanie in the western U.S. and a watch cap in the eastern U.S, though these forms are generally closer-fitting, and may lack a brim as well as a pompom. There seems to be no exact equivalent outside Canada, since the tuque is of French Canadian origin.* Dressing Gown: in the US, called a bathrobe.Food and beverage* Most Canadians as well as Americans in the Northwest, North Central, Prairie and Inland North prefer pop over soda to refer to a carbonated beverage (but neither term is dominant in British English; see further at drink naming conventions). Soft drink is also extremely common throughout Canada.* What Americans call Canadian bacon is named bacon or, if it is coated in cornmeal or ground peas, cornmeal bacon or bacon in Canada.* What most Americans call a bar is usually known as a chocolate bar (as in the UK; however, some in the US, especially Americans in northern states, call it a bar). In certain areas surrounding the of Fundy, it is sometimes known as a nut bar; however this use is more popular amongst older generations.* Even though the terms French fries and fries are used by Canadians, some speakers use the word chips (and its diminutive, chippies) (chips is always used when referring to and chips, as elsewhere).* bread is often referred to as brown bread, as in Would you like white or brown bread for your toast?Vocabulary pertaining to race and ethnicity* Aboriginals (aka Natives, Indigenous Peoples, etc.) are not referred to as Indian, in part because there is a large and growing East Indian population in Canada. The term Nations is used as an adjective when referring in a respectful manner to persons who would be called American Indians in the United States. Northern aboriginal persons are Inuit and mixed-race (First Nations  European) are Mtis.Canadianisms* Double-double: a cup of coffee with two creams and two sugars, most commonly associated with the Hortons chain of coffee shops. By the same token, triple-triple.(CBC.ca Arts  Double-double? Now you can look it up)* Mickey: a  bottle of hard liquor (informally called a pint in the Maritimes and the US).* Two-six, twenty-sixer, twixer: a  bottle of hard liquor (called a quart in the Maritimes).* Texas mickey (esp. in Saskatchewan and New Brunswick; more often a Saskatchewan mickey in western Canada): a  bottle of hard liquor. (Despite the name, Texas mickeys are generally unavailable outside of Canada.)* Two-four: a case of 24 beers, also known as a flat in Western Canada, or simply a case in Eastern Canada.* Half-sack, Poverty-pack or Six-pack: a case of 6 beers* Poutine: a snack of french fries topped with cheese curds and hot gravy.* Cheezies: puffs. The name is a trademark based on a brand of crunchy cheese snack sold in Canada.* Freezies: A frozen flavoured sugar water snack common worldwide, but known by this name exclusively in Canada.* Dainty, dainties: Fancy cookies, pastries, or squares served at a social event (usually plural). Used in western Canada.* Smarties, Smarties: A bean sized, small candy covered chocolate, similar to M&Ms without peanuts. This is also seen in British English (Nestl Smaties  ...Its a brand name after all.) Smarties in the United States refer to small, tart powdered disc sold in rolls. In Canada these are sold as Rockets.* The United States of America is almost always called The States rather than America.Informal speechA rubber in the U.S. and Canada is slang for a condom; however, in Canada it is sometimes (rarely except for Newfoundland) another term for an eraser (as it is in the Kingdom and Ireland).The word bum can refer either to the buttocks (as in Britain or the U.S.), or, derogatorily, to a homeless person (as in the U.S.). However, the buttocks sense does not have the indecent character it retains in British and Australian use, as it and butt are commonly used as a polite or childish euphemism for ruder words such as arse (commonly used in Atlantic Canada and among older people in Ontario and to the west) or ass, or mitiss (used in the Prairie Provinces, especially in northern and central Saskatchewan; probably originally a Cree loanword). Older Canadians may see bum as more polite than butt, which before the 1980s was often considered rude.Similarly the word pissed can refer either to being drunk (as in Britain), or being mad or angry (as in the U.S.), though anger is more often said as pissed off, while piss drunk or pissed up is said to describe inebriation (though piss drunk is sometimes also used in the US, especially in the northern states).Canadian colloquialismsOne of the most distinctive Canadian phrases is the spoken interrogation eh, which is stereotyped as being said by almost all Canadians in modern culture. The only usage of eh exclusive to Canada, according to the Canadian Oxford Dictionary, is for ascertaining the comprehension, continued interest, agreement, etc., of the person or persons addressed as in, Its four kilometres away, eh, so I have to go by bike. In that case, eh? is used to confirm the attention of the listener and to invite a supportive noise such as mm or oh or okay. This usage is also common in Queensland, Australia. Other uses of eh  for instance, in place of huh? or what? meaning please repeat or say again  are also found in parts of the Isles and Australia.The term Canuck simply means Canadian in its demonymic form, and, as a term used even by Canadians themselves, it is not considered derogatory. In the 19th century and early 20th century it tended to refer to French-Canadians, but Canuck was used by Anglophone writer Murphy in the 1920s and the Canuck comic book character of the 1940s. Throughout the 1970s, Canadas winning World Cup mens downhill ski team was called the Canucks for their fearlessness on the slopes.() It is also the name of the Canucks, the Hockey League team of Vancouver.The term hoser, popularized by & Doug McKenzie, typically refers to an uncouth, beer-swilling male. Bob & Doug also popularised the use of Beauty, eh, another western slang term which may be used in variety of ways. This describes something as being of interest, of note, signals approval or simply draws attention to it.A Newf or Newfie is someone from Newfoundland and Labrador; sometimes considered derogatory.In the Maritimes, a Caper or Cape Bretoner is someone from Breton Island, a Bluenoser is someone with a thick, usually southern Nova Scotia accent or as a general term for a Nova Scotian (Including Cape Bretoners), while an Islander is someone from Edward Island (the same term is used in Columbia for people from Island, or the numerous islands along it). A Haligonian refers to someone from the city of Halifax.Miscellaneous Canadianisms* The code appended to mail addresses (the equivalent of the British postcode and the American code) is called a postal code.* The term Nations is often used in Canada to refer to what are called American Indians or Native Americans in the United States. This term does not include the Mtis and Inuit, however; the term peoples (and sometimes spelled with a capital A: Aboriginal peoples) is preferred when all three groups are included. The term Eskimo has been replaced by the term Inuit in the past few decades. It is now considered offensive to use the term Eskimo, but is still used commonly (without pejorative intent) by those born in the early-mid-20th century.* Going camping still refers to staying in a tent in a campground or wilderness area, while going out to camp may refer to a summer cottage or home in a rural area. Going to camp refers to childrens camps. In British Columbia, camp was used as a reference for certain company towns (for example, Bridge River). It is used in western Canada to refer to logging and mining camps such as Camp. It is also is a synonym for a mining district; the latter occurs in names such as Camp McKinney and usages such as Cariboo gold camp and Slocan mining camp for the Cariboo goldfields and Slocan silver-galena mining district, respectively. A cottage in British Columbia is generally a small house, perhaps with an English design or flavour, while in southern Ontario it more likely means a second home on a lake. Similarly, chalet  originally a term for a small warming hut  can mean a second home of any size, but refers to one located in a ski resort. Outside of southern Ontario and southern Quebec, these second homes tend to be called camps.* A stagette is a female bachelorette party (US) or hen party (UK).* A shag is thought to be derived from shower and stag, and describes a dance where alcohol, entry tickets, raffle tickets, and so on, are sold to raise money for the engaged couples wedding. Normally a Northwest Ontario, Northern Ontario and sometimes Manitoba term, a stag and doe or buck and doe is used elsewhere in Ontario. The more common term for this type of event in Manitoba is a social.* The humidex is a measurement used by meteorologists to reflect the combined effect of heat and humidity.* An date is the term used for the date when a perishable product will go bad (similar to the UK Use By date). The term expiration date is more common in the United States (where expiry date is seen mostly on the packaging of Asian food products). The term Best Before also sees common use, where although not spoiled, the product may not taste as good.See also* and British English spelling differences* creole* French* Gaelic* American English* American English regional phonology* Northwest English* French* accents of English* shiftReferencesFurther reading* ** Barber, Katherine, editor (2004). Canadian Oxford Dictionary, second edition. Toronto: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-541816-6.* Barber, Katherine. 11 Favourite Regionalisms Within Canada, in David Vallechinsky and Amy Wallace (2005). The Book of Lists, Canadian Edition. Knopf. ISBN 978-0-676-97720-2.* Boberg, Charles (2005). The North American Regional Vocabulary Survey: Renewing the study of lexical variation in North American English. American Speech 80/1. Dukejournals.org* Boberg, Charles, Sounding Canadian from Coast to Coast: Regional accents in Canadian English, McGill University.* Courtney, Rosemary, and others., senior editors (1998). The Gage Canadian Dictionary, second edition. Toronto: Gage Learning Corp. ISBN 0-7715-7399-5.* Chambers, J.K. (1998). Canadian English: 250 Years in the Making, in The Canadian Oxford Dictionary, 2nd ed., p. xi.* Clark, Joe (2008). Organizing Our Marvellous Neighbours: How to Feel Good About Canadian English (e-book). ISBN 978-0-9809525-0-6.* * * Peters, Pam (2004). The Cambridge Guide to English Usage. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-62181-X.* * Canadian Raising: OGrady and Dobrovolsky, Contemporary Linguistic Analysis: An Introduction, 3rd ed., pp. 6768.* Canadian English: Association of Canada, Editing Canadian English: The Essential Canadian Guide, 2nd ed. (Toronto: McClelland & Stewart, 2000).* Canadian federal government style guide: Works and Government Services Canada, The Canadian Style: A Guide to Writing and Editing, 2nd ed. (Toronto: Public Works and Government Services Canada, 1997).* Canadian usage: Margery Fee and Janice McAlpine, Guide to Canadian English Usage (Toronto: Oxford University Press, 2001).* Hamilton, Sandra A. M. (1997) Canadianisms and their treatment in dictionaries, Thesis (M.A.), University of Ottawa, ISBN 9780612199682* Canadian newspaper and magazine style guides:** J.A. McFarlane and Warren Clements, The Globe and Mail Style Book: A Guide to Language and Usage, 9th ed. (Toronto: McClelland & Stewart, 1998).** The Canadian Press, The Canadian Press Stylebook, 13th ed. and its quick-reference companion CP Caps and Spelling, 16th ed. (both Toronto: Canadian Press, 2004).External links*Canadian Broadcasting Corporations Words: Woe & Wonder* Dave VE7CNVs Truly Canadian Dictionary of Canadian Spelling  comparisons of Canadian English, American English, British English, French, and Spanish* Hover & Hear pronunciations in a standard Canadian accent, and compare side by side with other English accents from around the world.* Canadian Oxford Dictionaries (Oxford University Press  sales only)* Lexical, grammatical, orthographic and phonetic Canadianisms* Varieties of English: Canadian English from the University of Arizona* Dictionary of Newfoundland English list1  EngelscanadianuEnglischcanadiensecanadienInggris Kanadanl:Canadees-Engelsja:engelskcanadense  Englishfi:KanadanenglantiAnh Canadazh:
6427
Cheddar
 os_grid_reference ST458535Cheddar is a large village and civil parish in the Sedgemoor district of the English county of Somerset. It is situated on the southern edge of the Hills,  north-west of Wells. The civil parish includes the hamlets of Nyland and Bradley Cross. The village, which has its own parish council, has a population of 5,093 and the parish has an acreage of  as of 1961.()Gorge is the largest gorge in the United Kingdom and includes several show caves including Cave. The gorge has been a centre of human settlement since Neolithic times, including a Saxon palace. It has a temperate climate and provides a unique geological and biological environment that has been recognised by the designation of several of Special Scientific Interest.() It is also the site of several limestone quarries. The village gave its name to cheese and has been a centre for strawberry growing, with the crop being transported on the Valley line, which closed in the late 1960s but is now a cycle path. It is now a major tourist destination with several cultural and community facilities, including the Cheddar Show Caves Museum.()The village supports a variety of community groups including religious, sporting and cultural organisations. Several of these are based on the site of Kings of Wessex School, which is the largest educational establishment. History There is evidence of occupation from the Neolithic period in Cheddar. Britains oldest complete human skeleton, Man, estimated to be 9,000 years old, was found in 1903.() Older remains from the Upper Late Palaeolithic era (12,00013,000 years ago) have been found.() There is some evidence of a Age field system at the Combe quarry site. The remains of a Roman villa have been excavated in the grounds of the current vicarage.(thumb|Reconstruction of the Saxon royal palace at Cheddar around 1000 ADThe village of Cheddar had been important during the Roman and Saxon eras. There was a royal palace at Cheddar during the Saxon period, which was used on three occasions in the 10th century to host the Witenagemot.() The ruins of the palace were excavated in the 1960s.() They are located on the grounds of Kings of Wessex School, together with a 14th century chapel dedicated to St. Columbanus.() Roman remains have also been uncovered at the site.(() Cheddar was listed in the Book of 1086 as Ceder, meaning Shear Water, from the English scear and Celtic dwr.() As early as 1130 AD, the Gorge was recognised as one of the Four wonders of England. Historically, Cheddars source of wealth was farming and cheese making for which it was famous as early as 1170 AD.() The parish was part of the Winterstoke Hundred.()As early as 1527 there are records of watermills on the river.( In the 17th and 18th centuries, there were several watermills which ground corn and made paper, with 13 mills on the Yeo at the peak, declining to seven by 1791 and just three by 1915.()In the era it also became a centre for the production of clothing.() The last mill, used as a shirt factory, closed in the early 1950s.( Wilberforce saw the poor conditions of the locals when he visited Cheddar in 1789. He inspired More in her work to improve the conditions of the Mendip miners and agricultural workers.() In 1801,  of common land were enclosed under the Acts.()Tourism of the Cheddar gorge and caves began with the opening of the Valley Railway in 1869.()Cheddar, its surrounding villages and specifically the gorge has been subject to flooding. In the Flood of 1968 the flow of water washed large boulders down the gorge, washed away cars, and damaged the cafe and the entrance to Goughs Cave.()() Government Cheddar is recognised as a village.()() The adjacent settlement of Axbridge, although only about a third the population of Cheddar, is a town.()()() This apparently illogical situation is explained by the relative importance of the two places in historic times. While Axbridge grew in importance as a centre for cloth manufacturing in the Tudor period and gained a charter from King John, Cheddar remained a more dispersed mining and dairy-farming village. Its population grew with the arrival of the railways in the era and the advent of tourism.()The parish council, which has 15 members who are elected for four years,() is responsible for local issues, including setting an annual precept (local rate) to cover the councils operating costs and producing annual accounts for public scrutiny. The parish council evaluates local planning applications and works with the police, district council officers, and neighbourhood watch groups on matters of crime, security, and traffic. The parish councils role also includes initiating projects for the maintenance and repair of parish facilities, as well as consulting with the district council on the maintenance, repair, and improvement of highways, drainage, footpaths, public transport, and street cleaning. Conservation matters (including trees and listed buildings) and environmental issues are also the responsibility of the council.()thumb|Cheddar Fire Station has a crew of retained firefightersThe village falls within the district of Sedgemoor, which was formed on 1 April 1974 under the Government Act 1972. It was previously part of Rural District.() Sedgemoor is responsible for local planning and building control, local roads, housing, health, markets and fairs, refuse collection and recycling, cemeteries and crematoria, leisure services, parks, and tourism.()  County Council is responsible for running the largest and most expensive local services such as education, services, the library, roads, public transport, standards, waste disposal and strategic planning, although fire, police and ambulance services are provided jointly with other authorities through the and Somerset Fire and Rescue Service, and Somerset Constabulary and the Western Ambulance Service.()It is also part of the Wells constituency represented in the House of Commons of the of the United Kingdom.(Parliamentary Constituencies in the county of Somerset Government News, Retrieved 14 November 2001.) It elects one Member of Parliament (MP) by the past the post system of election, and is part of the South West England constituency of the Parliament which elects six MEPs using the method of proportional representation.Cheddar is twinned with Germany and Vernouillet, France, and it has an active programme of exchange visits.()() Initially, Cheddar twinned with Felsberg in 1984. In 2000, Cheddar twinned with Vernouillet, which had also been twinned with Felsberg.() Cheddar also has a friendship link with Rios in Ann Parish, Jamaica.(() Geography thumb|right|Cheddar Gorge c. 1907The area is underlain by Black Rock slate, Burrington Oolite and Clifton Down Limestone of the Carboniferous Limestone Series, which contain ooliths and fossil debris on top of Red Sandstone, and by Dolomitic Conglomerate of the Keuper. Evidence for orogeny is seen in the sheared rock and cleaved shales. In many places weathering of these strata has resulted in the formation of immature calcareous soils.() Gorge and caves Gorge, which is located on the edge of the village, is the largest gorge in the United Kingdom.()The gorge is the site of the Cheddar Caves, where Man was found in 1903.( Older remains from the Upper Late Palaeolithic era (12,00013,000 years ago) have been found.( The caves, produced by the activity of an underground river, contain stalactites and stalagmites. Cave, which was discovered in 1903,() leads around  into the rock-face, and contains a variety of large rock chambers and formations. Cave, discovered in 1837,() is smaller but contains many intricate formations. A further cave houses a childrens entertainment walk known as the Crystal Quest.()Cheddar Gorge, including Coxs Cave, Goughs Cave and other attractions, has become a tourist destination, attracting about 500,000 visitors per year.()In a 2005 poll of Times readers, following its appearance on the 2005 television programme Natural Wonders, Cheddar Gorge was named as the second greatest natural wonder in Britain, surpassed only by the yr Ogof caves.() Sites of Special Scientific Interest Image:Cheddarreser.JPG|thumb|right|Reservoir at dusk, looking towards the western edge of the Hills and Crook PeakThere are several large and unique of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI) around the village.Reservoir is a near-circular artificial reservoir operated by Water. Dating from the 1930s, it has a capacity of 135 million gallons (614,000 cubic metres).() The reservoir is supplied with water taken from the Yeo, which rises in Goughs Cave in Cheddar Gorge and is a tributary of the River Axe. The inlet grate for the  water pipe that is used to transport the water can be seen next to the garden in Cheddar Gorge.()  It has been designated as a Site of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI) due to its wintering waterfowl populations.()Wood and the smaller Macalls Wood form a Site of Special Scientific Interest from what remains of the wood of the of Bath and Wells in the 13th century and of King Edmund the Magnificents wood in the 10th. During the 19th century, its lower fringes were grubbed out to make strawberry fields. Most of these have been allowed to revert to woodland. The wood was coppiced until 1917.() This site compromises a wide range of habitats which include ancient and secondary semi-natural broadleaved woodland, unimproved neutral grassland, and a complex mosaic of grassland and acidic dry dwarf-shrub heath. Cheddar Wood is one of only a few English stations for Wood-sedge (Carex depauperata).( Purple Gromwell (Lithospermum purpurocaeruleum), a nationally rare plant, also grows in the wood.( Butterflies include Fritillary (Argynnis paphia), Green Fritillary (Argynnis aglaja), Fritillary (Boloria euphrosyne), Blue (Celastrina argiolus) and Argus (Aricia agestis). The slug (Arion fasciatus), which has a restricted distribution in the south of England, and the beetle (Cantharis fusca) also occur.()By far the largest of the SSSIs is called Complex and covers  of the gorge, caves and the surrounding area. It is important for both biological and geological features. It includes four SSSIs, formerly known as Cheddar Gorge SSSI, August Hole/Longwood Swallet SSSI, GB Cavern Charterhouse SSSI and Charterhouse on-Mendip SSSI.() It is partly owned by the National Trust who acquired it in 1910() and partly managed by the Wildlife Trust.(() Quarries File:Batts Combe Quarry from tower.JPG|altExposed stone face of quarry, and buildings|thumb|Batts Combe Quarry from the lookout tower above GorgeClose to the village and gorge are Combe quarry and Rock quarry, two of the active of the Mendip Hills where limestone is still extracted. Operating since the early 20th century, Batts Combe is owned and operated by Hanson Aggregates. The output in 2005 was around 4,000 tonnes of limestone per day, one third of which was supplied to an on-site lime kiln, which closed in 2009;() the remainder was sold as coated or dusted aggregates. The limestone at this site is close to 99 percent carbonate of calcium and magnesium (dolomite).()The Chelmscombe Quarry finished its work as a limestone quarry in the 1950s and was then used by the Electricity Generating Board as a testing station.() During the 1970s and 1980s it was also used to test the ability of containers of radioactive material to withstand impacts and other accidents.() Climate Along with the rest of West England, Cheddar has a temperate climate which is generally wetter and milder than the rest of the country.() The annual mean temperature is approximately . Seasonal temperature variation is less extreme than most of the United Kingdom because of the adjacent sea, which moderates temperature. The summer months of July and August are the warmest with mean daily maxima of approximately . In winter mean minimum temperatures of  or  are common.( In the summer the Azores high-pressure system affects the south-west of England. Convective cloud sometimes forms inland, reducing the number of hours of sunshine; annual sunshine rates are slightly less than the regional average of 1,600 hours.( In December 1998 there were 20 days without sun recorded at Yeovilton. Most the rainfall in the south-west is caused by Atlantic depressions or by convection. Most of the rainfall in autumn and winter is caused by the Atlantic depressions, which are most active during those seasons. In summer, a large proportion of the rainfall is caused by sun heating the ground leading to convection and to showers and thunderstorms. Average rainfall is around . About 815 days of snowfall per year is typical. November to March have the highest mean wind speeds, and June to August have the lightest winds. The predominant wind direction is from the south-west.( Demography The parish has a population of 5,093,( with a mean age of 43 years.() Residents live in 2,209 households. The vast majority of households (2,183) give their ethnic status as white.() Economy The village gave its name to cheese,() which is the most popular type of cheese in the United Kingdom.() The cheese is now made and consumed worldwide, and only one producer remains in the village.Since the 1880s, Cheddars other main produce has been the strawberry,()which is grown on the south-facing lower slopes of the Mendip hills.( As a consequence of its use for transporting strawberries to market, the since-closed Valley line became known as The Strawberry Line after it opened in 1869.()()The line closed in the 1960s, when it became part of the Cheddar Valley Railway Nature Reserve.() It ran from Yatton to Wells. When the rest of the line was closed and all passenger services ceased, the section of the line between Cheddar and Yatton remained open for goods traffic. It provided a fast link with the main markets for the strawberries in Birmingham and London, but finally closing in 1964.()Ales is a small brewery based in the village, producing beer for local houses.() Tourism is a significant source of employment. Around 15 percent of employment in Sedgemoor is provided by tourism,() but within Cheddar it is estimated to employ as many as 1,000 people.()The village also has a hostel,() and a number of camping and caravan sites.() Culture and community Cheddar has a number of active service clubs including Cheddar Vale Lions Club, Mendip Rotary and Mendip Wheel Club.() The clubs raise money for projects in the local community and hold annual events such as a fireworks display, duck races in the Gorge, a boat race on the reservoir and concerts on the grounds of the nearby St Michaels Cheshire Home.()Several notable people have been born or lived in Cheddar. Musician Bessant, the bass guitarist with the band Reef grew up on his parents strawberry farm,() and Goss and Goss, former members of Bros, lived in Cheddar for nine months as children.() Gulliver, eight-time World Professional Darts Champion, currently lives in Cheddar.()The comedian Herring grew up in Cheddar.() His 2008 Festival Fringe show, The Headmasters Son is based on his time at Kings of Wessex School, where his father Keith was the headmaster.() The final performance of this show was held at the school in November 2009.() He also visited the school in March 2010 to perform his show Hitler Moustache.() Landmarks Image:Cheddar Cross.jpg|thumb|Photochrom of Cheddar Market Cross in the 1890sThe market cross in Bath Street dates from the 15th century, with the shelter having been rebuilt in 1834. It has a central octagonal pier, a socket raised on four steps, hexagonal shelter with six arched four-centred openings, shallow two-stage buttresses at each angle, an and embattled parapet. The shaft is crowned by an abacus with figures in niches, probably from the late 19th century, although the cross is now missing. It was rebuilt by Thomas, Marquis of Bath. It is a Ancient Monument (Somerset County No 21) and Grade II* building.()In January 2000, the cross was seriously damaged in a traffic accident.()() By 2002, the cross had been rebuilt and the area around it was redesigned to protect and enhance its appearance.()More, a philanthropist and educator,  founded a school in the village in the late 18th century for the children of miners. Her first school was located in a 17th-century house. Now named Hannah Mores Cottage,() the Grade II-listed building is used by the local community as a meeting place.() Transport File:Cheddar First 46253.jpg|thumb|A Somerset and Avon bus picks up passengers at the Market cross on service 126 from Weston-super-Mare to Wells, the principal bus service through CheddarThe village is situated on the road which runs from Wincanton, to Weston-super-Mare.() It is approximately  from the route of the motorway with around a  drive to junction 21 or 22.()It was on the Valley line, a railway line that was opened in 1869 and closed in 1963. It became known as The Strawberry Line because of the large volume of locally-grown strawberries that it carried. It ran from railway station through  to (Tucker Street) railway station and joined the Somerset Railway to make a through route via Mallet (High Street) railway station to Witham. Sections of the now-disused railway have been opened as the Strawberry Line Trail, which currently runs from Yatton to Cheddar. The Cheddar Valley line survived until the Axe. Towards the end of its life there were so few passengers that diesel railcars were sometimes used. The Cheddar branch closed to passengers on 9 September 1963 and to goods in 1964.( The line closed in the 1960s, when it became part of the Cheddar Valley Railway Nature Reserve,( and part of the Cycle Network route 26. The cycle route also interests with the West Way and various other footpaths.() Education Image:S3010334-cropped.jpg|thumb|left|Kings of Wessex School seen from the tower of St. Andrews Church (looking north-west)Cheddar has three schools belonging to the Cheddar Valley Group of Schools, twelve schools that provide Cheddar Valleys education system.() Cheddar First School has ten classes for children between 4 and 9 years.() Middle School, a school categorised as a middle-deemed-secondary school, has 510 pupils between 9 and 13.() Fairlands takes children moving up from Cheddar First School as well as other first schools in the Cheddar Valley. Kings of Wessex School, a coeducational school, has been rated as outstanding by Ofsted.() It has 1,182 students aged 13 to 18,() including 302 in the form. Kings is a school linked to the of England. It was awarded the specialist status of College in 2001, enabling it to develop its Technology (IT) facilities and improve courses in science, mathematics and design technology. In 2007 it became a school, giving it more control over its own finances. The school owns and runs a sports centre and swimming pool, Kings Fitness & Leisure, with facilities that are used by students as well as residents. Community education project I.T. for the Terrified, which was originally set up in Wedmore in 1999,() is based in an old cow shed on the schools grounds.() Religious sites of St AndrewThe Church of St Andrew dates from the 14th century. It was restored in 1873 by Butterfield. It is a Grade I building and contains some 15th-century glass and an altar table of 1631. The chest tomb in the chancel is believed to contain the remains of Sir Cheddar and is dated 1442.() The tower, which rises to ,() contains a bell dating from 1759 made by Thomas Bilbie of the family.()There are also churches for Roman Catholic, Methodist and other denominations, including Cheddar Valley Community Church, who not only meet at The Kings of Wessex School on Sunday, but also have their own site on Tweentown for meeting during the week.() The Baptist chapel was built in 1831.() Sport Kings Fitness & Leisure, situated on the grounds of Kings of Wessex School, provides a venue for various sports and includes a 20-metre swimming pool, racket sport courts, a sports hall, dance studios and a gym.() A youth sports festival was held on Sharpham Road Playing Fields in 2009.() In 2010 a skatepark was built in the village,() funded by the Cheddar Local Action Team.()Cheddar Football Club, founded in 1892 and nicknamed The Cheesemen,() play in the County Football League Premier Division.() In 2009 plans were revealed to move the club from its present home at Bowdens Park on Draycott Road to a new larger site.(Cheddar Cricket Club was formed in the late 19th century and moved to Sharpham Road Playing Fields in 1964.() They now play in the of England Premier League Somerset Division. Cheddar Rugby Club, who own part of the Sharpham playing fields, was formed in 1836. The club organises an annual Cheddar Rugby Tournament.() Cheddar Tennis Club, was formed in 1924,() and play in the North Somerset League and also has social tennis and coaching. Cheddar Running Club organised an annual marathon until 2009.() References  External links * cy:Cheddar(Somerset)es:Cheddarfr:Cheddaris:Cheddarit:Cheddarla:Cheddar(Somerset)ja:(Anglia)()Englandvo:Cheddar
6458
Ceramic
Image:Firebrick_electric_furnace_ceramic_fibre_gasket.jpg|thumb|right|test furnace insulated with firebrick and ceramic fibre insulation.File:Bridge from dental porcelain.jpg|thumb|right|Fixed partial denture, or bridgeA ceramic is an inorganic, nonmetallic solid prepared by the action of heat and subsequent cooling.(Ceramic Tile and Stone Standards) Ceramic materials may have a crystalline or partly crystalline structure, or may be amorphous (e.g., a glass). Because most common ceramics are crystalline, the definition of ceramic is often restricted to inorganic crystalline materials, as opposed to the noncrystalline glasses.The earliest ceramics were pottery objects made from clay, either by itself or mixed with other materials, hardened in fire. Later ceramics were glazed and fired to create a colored, smooth surface. Ceramics now include domestic, industrial and building products and art objects. In the 20th century, new materials were developed for use in advanced engineering; for example, in semiconductors. The word ceramic comes from the Greek word  (keramikos), of pottery or for pottery,(, Henry George Liddell, Robert Scott, A Greek-English Lexicon, on Perseus Digital Library) from  (keramos), potters clay, tile, pottery.(, Henry George Liddell, Robert Scott, A Greek-English Lexicon, on Perseus Digital Library) The earliest mention on the root ceram- is the Greek ke-ra-me-we, workers of ceramics, written in b syllabic script.(Palaeolexicon, Word study tool of ancient languages) Ceramic may be used as an adjective describing a material, product or process; or as a singular noun, or, more commonly, as a plural noun, ceramics.(Oxford English Dictionary)Types of ceramic productsFor convenience, ceramic products are usually divided into four sectors; these are shown below with some examples:*Structural, including bricks, pipes, floor and tiles*Refractories, such as kiln linings, gas fire radiants, steel and glass making crucibles*Whitewares, including tableware, cookware, wall tiles, pottery products and sanitary ware*Technical, is also known as engineering, advanced, special, and in Japan, fine ceramics. Such items include tiles used in the Shuttle program, gas burner nozzles, ballistic protection, fuel uranium oxide pellets, biomedical implants, coatings of engine turbine blades, missile nose cones, (mechanical). Frequently, the raw materials do not include clays.(Introduction To Ceramics, American Ceramic Society)Examples of whiteware ceramics*Earthenware, which is often made from clay, quartz and feldspar.*Stoneware*Porcelain, which is often made from kaolin*chinaClassification of technical ceramicsTechnical ceramics can also be classified into three distinct material categories: * Oxides: alumina, beryllia, ceria, zirconia* Nonoxides: carbide, boride, nitride, silicide* materials: particulate reinforced, fiber reinforced, combinations of oxides and nonoxides.Each one of these classes can develop unique material properties because ceramics tend to be crystalline.Other applications of ceramics*Knife blades: the blade of a knife will stay sharp for much longer than that of a steel knife, although it is more brittle and can be snapped by dropping it on a hard surface.*Vehicle ceramic brake discs are resistant to abrasion at high temperatures.*Advanced composite ceramic and metal matrices have been designed for most modern fighting vehicles because they offer superior penetrating resistance against shaped charges such as high explosive antitank (HEAT) rounds and kinetic energy penetrators.*Ceramics such as alumina and carbide have been used in ballistic armored vests to repel large-calibre rifle fire. Such plates are known commonly as small arms protective inserts (SAPIs). Similar material is used to protect cockpits of some military airplanes, because of the low weight of the material.*Ceramic balls can be used to replace steel in bearings. Their higher hardness means they are much less susceptible to wear and can offer more than triple lifetimes. They also deform less under load, meaning they have less contact with the bearing retainer walls and can roll faster. In very high speed applications, heat from friction during rolling can cause problems for metal bearings, which are reduced by the use of ceramics. Ceramics are also more chemically resistant and can be used in wet environments where steel bearings would rust. In some cases, their electricity-insulating properties may also be valuable in bearings. The two major drawbacks to using ceramics are a significantly higher cost and susceptibility to damage under shock loads. *In the early 1980s, Toyota researched production of an adiabatic engine using ceramic components in the hot gas area. The ceramics would have allowed temperatures of over 3000F (1650C). The expected advantages would have lighter materials, no or reduced cooling system, and hence a major weight reduction. The expected increase of efficiency of the engine (caused by the higher temperature, as shown by Carnots theorem) could not be verified experimentally; it was found that the heat transfer on the hot ceramic cylinder walls is higher than the transfer to a cooler metal wall. Obviously the cooler gas film on the metal surface works as a insulator. Thus, despite all of these desirable properties, such engines have not succeeded in production because of costs for the ceramic components and the limited advantages. (Small imperfections in the ceramic material with its low toughness lead to cracks, which can lead to potentially dangerous equipment failure.) Such engines are possible in laboratory settings, but mass production is not feasible with current technology. *Work is being done in developing ceramic parts for turbine engines. Currently, even blades made of advanced metal alloys used in the engines hot section require cooling and careful limiting of operating temperatures. Turbine engines made with ceramics could operate more efficiently, giving aircraft greater range and payload for a set amount of fuel.*Recent advances have been made in ceramics which include bioceramics, such as dental implants and synthetic bones. Hydroxyapatite, the natural mineral component of bone, has been made synthetically from a number of biological and chemical sources and can be formed into ceramic materials. Orthopedic implants coated with these materials bond readily to bone and other tissues in the body without rejection or inflammatory reactions so are of great interest for gene delivery and engineering scaffolds. Most hydroxyapatite ceramics are very porous and lack mechanical strength, and are used to coat metal orthopedic devices to aid in forming a bond to bone or as bone fillers. They are also used as fillers for orthopedic plastic screws to aid in reducing the inflammation and increase absorption of these plastic materials. Work is being done to make strong, fully dense nano crystalline hydroxyapatite ceramic materials for orthopedic weight bearing devices, replacing foreign metal and plastic orthopedic materials with a synthetic, but naturally occurring, bone mineral. Ultimately, these ceramic materials may be used as bone replacements or with the incorporation of protein collagens, synthetic bones.*High-tech ceramic is used in watchmaking for producing watch cases. The material is valued by watchmakers for its light weight, scratch resistance, durability and smooth touch. IWC is one of the brands that initiated the use of ceramic in watchmaking. The case of the IWC 2007 Top Gun edition of the Pilots Watch chronograph is crafted in black ceramic.(Ceramic in Watchmaking)Types of ceramic materialsfractured SEM.TIF|right|thumb|A low magnification SEM micrograph of an advanced ceramic material, the properties of ceramics make fracturing an important inspection method.A ceramic material is often understood as restricted to inorganic crystalline oxide material. It is solid and inert. Ceramic materials are brittle, hard, strong in compression, weak in shearing and tension. They withstand chemical erosion that occurs in other materials subjected to acidic or caustic environments. Ceramics generally can withstand very high temperatures, such as temperatures that range from 1,000 C to 1,600 C (1,800 F to 3,000 F). Exceptions include inorganic materials that do not include oxygen, such as carbide or nitride. A glass is often not understood as a ceramic because of its amorphous (noncrystalline) character. However, glass making involves several steps of the ceramic process and its mechanical properties are similar to ceramic materials.Traditional ceramic raw materials include clay minerals such as kaolinite, whereas more recent materials include aluminium oxide, more commonly known as alumina. The modern ceramic materials, which are classified as advanced ceramics, include silicon carbide and carbide. Both are valued for their abrasion resistance, and hence find use in applications such as the wear plates of crushing equipment in mining operations. Advanced ceramics are also used in the medicine, electrical and electronics industries.Crystalline ceramicsCrystalline ceramic materials are not amenable to a great range of processing. Methods for dealing with them tend to fall into one of two categories  either make the ceramic in the desired shape, by reaction in situ, or by forming powders into the desired shape, and then sintering to form a solid body. forming techniques include shaping by hand (sometimes including a rotation process called throwing), slip casting, casting (used for making very thin ceramic capacitors, e.g.), molding, dry pressing, and other variations. Details of these processes are described in the two books listed below. A few methods use a hybrid between the two approaches.Noncrystalline ceramicsNoncrystalline ceramics, being glasses, tend to be formed from melts. The glass is shaped when either fully molten, by casting, or when in a state of toffee-like viscosity, by methods such as blowing to a mold. If later heat treatments cause this glass to become partly crystalline, the resulting material is known as a glass-ceramic, widely used as cooktop.See also* materials* engineering* Matrix Composite* art* Pottery* wheelReferencesExternal links*How pottery is made*Ceramic Whistles*How sanitaryware is made*World renowned ceramics collections at Stoke-on-Trent Museum Click on Quick Links in the right-hand column to view examples.*The Gardiner Museum  The only museum in Canada entirely devoted to ceramics*Introduction, Scientific Principles, Properties and Processing of Ceramics*Deruta Museum and History of Ceramics Art*Advanced Ceramics  The Evolution, Classification, Properties, Production, Firing, Finishing and Design of Advanced Ceramics*Cerame-Unie, aisbl  The European Ceramic Industry Associationar:az:Keramikabe:be-x-old:bs:Keramikabg:ca:Cermicacs:Keramikada:Keramikde:Keramiket:Keraamikael:es:Cermicaeo:Ceramikaoeu:Zeramikafa:fr:Cramiquegl:Cermicako:hi:hr:Keramikaio:Ceramikajoid:Keramikia:Ceramicait:Ceramicahe:jv:Keramikkk:ht:Seramikla:Fictilelv:Keramikalt:Keramikahu:Kermiamk:ms:Seramiknl:Keramiekja:nap:Ceramicano:Keramikknn:Keramikkoc:Ceramicapl:Ceramikapt:Cermicaro:Ceramicqu:Kapraru:simple:Ceramic(plen vrobky)sl:Keramikafi:Keraamisv:Keramik()te:th:tr:Seramikuk:ur:vi:Gmzh:
6621
Cnidaria
parasites::PolypodiozoaparasitesCnidaria ( with a silent c) is a phylum containing over 9,000 species of animals found exclusively in aquatic and mostly marine environments. Their distinguishing feature is cnidocytes, specialized cells that they use mainly for capturing prey. Their bodies consist of mesoglea, a non-living jelly-like substance, sandwiched between two layers of epithelium that are mostly one cell thick. They have two basic body forms: swimming medusae and sessile polyps, both of which are radially symmetrical with mouths surrounded by tentacles that bear cnidocytes. Both forms have a single orifice and body cavity that are used for digestion and respiration. Many cnidarian species produce colonies that are single organisms composed of medusa-like or polyp-like zooids, or both. Cnidarians activities are coordinated by a decentralized nerve net and simple receptors. Several free-swimming Cubozoa and Scyphozoa possess balance-sensing statocysts, and some have simple eyes. Not all cnidarians reproduce sexually. Many have complex lifecycles with asexual polyp stages and sexual medusae, but some omit either the polyp or the medusa stage.Cnidarians were for a long time grouped with Ctenophores in the phylum Coelenterata, but increasing awareness of their differences caused them to be placed in separate phyla. Cnidarians are classified into four main groups: the almost wholly sessile Anthozoa (anemones, corals, pens); swimming Scyphozoa (jellyfish); Cubozoa (box jellies); and Hydrozoa, a diverse group that includes all the freshwater cnidarians as well as many marine forms, and has both sessile members such as Hydra and colonial swimmers such as the Man o War. Staurozoa have recently been recognised as a class in their own right rather than a sub-group of Scyphozoa, and there is debate about whether Myxozoa and Polypodiozoa are cnidarians or closer to bilaterians (more complex animals).Most cnidarians prey on organisms ranging in size from plankton to animals several times larger than themselves, but many obtain much of their nutrition from endosymbiotic algae, and a few are parasites. Many are preyed upon by other animals including starfish, sea slugs, fish and turtles. reefs, whose polyps are rich in endosymbiotic algae, support some of the worlds most productive ecosystems, and protect vegetation in zones and on shorelines from strong currents and tides. While corals are almost entirely restricted to warm, shallow marine waters, other cnidarians live in the depths, in polar seas and in freshwater.Fossil cnidarians have been found in rocks formed about , and other fossils show that corals may have been present shortly before  and diversified a few million years later. Fossils of cnidarians that do not build mineralized structures are very rare. Scientists currently think that cnidarians, ctenophores and bilaterians are more closely related to calcareous sponges than these are to other sponges, and that anthozoans are the evolutionary aunts or sisters of other cnidarians, and the most closely related to bilaterians. Recent analyses have concluded that cnidarians, although considered more primitive than bilaterians, have a wider range of genes.Jellyfish stings killed several hundred people in the 20th century, and cubozoans are particularly dangerous. On the other hand, some large jellyfish are considered a delicacy in eastern and southern Asia. Coral reefs have long been economically important as providers of fishing grounds, protectors of shore buildings against currents and tides, and more recently as centers of tourism. However, they are vulnerable to over-fishing, mining for construction materials, pollution, and damage caused by tourism.ClassificationCnidarians were for a long time grouped with Ctenophores in the phylum Coelenterata, but increasing awareness of their differences caused them to be placed in separate phyla. Cnidarians are classified into four main groups: sessile Anthozoa (anemones, corals, pens); swimming Scyphozoa (jellyfish); Cubozoa (box jellies); and Hydrozoa, a diverse group that includes all the freshwater cnidarians as well as many marine forms, and has both sessile members such as Hydra and colonial swimmers such as the Man o War. Staurozoa have recently been recognised as a class in their own right rather than a sub-group of Scyphozoa, and there is debate about whether Myxozoa and Polypodiozoa are cnidarians or closer to bilaterians.Modern cnidarians are generally classified into four classes:(Stauromedusae, small sessile cnidarians with stalks and no medusa stage, have traditionally been classified as members of the Scyphozoa, but recent research suggests they should be regarded as a separate class, Staurozoa.()The Myxozoa, microscopic parasites, were first classified as protozoans,() but recently as heavily modified cnidarians, and more closely related to Hydrozoa and Scyphozoa than to Anthozoa.() However other recent research suggests that hydriforme, a parasite within the egg cells of sturgeon, is closely related to the Myxozoa and that both Polypodium and the Myxozoa are intermediate between cnidarians and bilaterian animals.()Some researchers classify the extinct conulariids as cnidarians, while others propose that they form a completely separate phylum.()Ecology Image:Coral reef in Ras Muhammad nature park (Iolanda reef).jpg|thumb| right| 250px| reefs support rich ecosystems Many cnidarians are limited to shallow waters because they depend on endosymbiotic algae for much of their nutrients. The life cycles of most have polyp stages, which are limited to locations that offer stable substrates. Nevertheless major cnidarian groups contain species that have escaped these limitations. Hydrozoans have a worldwide range: some, such as Hydra, live in freshwater; Obelia appears in the coastal waters of all the oceans; and Liriope can form large shoals near the surface in mid-ocean. Among anthozoans, a few scleractinian corals, pens and sea fans live in deep, cold waters, and some sea anemones inhabit polar seabeds while others live near vents over  below sea-level. Reef-building corals are limited to tropical seas between 30N and 30S with a maximum depth of , temperatures between 20C and 28C, high salinity and low dioxide levels. Stauromedusae, although usually classified as jellyfish, are stalked, sessile animals that live in cool to Arctic waters.( Cnidarians range in size from Hydra,  long,() to the mane jellyfish, which may exceed  in diameter and  in length.(Prey of cnidarians ranges from plankton to animals several times larger than themselves.(() Some cnidarians are parasites, mainly on jellyfish but a few are major pests of fish.( Others obtain most of their nourishment from endosymbiotic algae or dissolved nutrients.( Predators of cnidarians include: sea slugs, which can incorporate nematocysts into their own bodies for self-defense;() starfish, notably the of thorns starfish, which can devastate corals;( fish and fish, which eat corals;() and marine turtles, which eat jellyfish.() Some sea anemones and jellyfish have a symbiotic relationship with some fish; for example fish live among the tentacles of sea anemones, and each partner protects the other against predators.(reefs form some of the worlds most productive ecosystems. Common coral reef cnidarians include both Anthozoans (hard corals, octocorals, anemones) and Hydrozoans (fire corals, lace corals) The endosymbiotic algae of many cnidarian species are very effective primary producers, in other words converters of inorganic chemicals into organic ones that other organisms can use, and their coral hosts use these organic chemicals very efficiently. In addition reefs provide complex and varied habitats that support a wide range of other organisms.() reefs just below low-tide level also have a mutually beneficial relationship with mangrove forests at high-tide level and grass meadows in between: the reefs protect the mangroves and seagrass from strong currents and waves that would damage them or erode the sediments in which they are rooted, while the mangroves and seagrass protect the coral from large influxes of silt, fresh water and pollutants. This additional level of variety in the environment is beneficial to many types of coral reef animals, which for example may feed in the sea grass and use the reefs for protection or breeding.()HistoryFossil cnidarians have been found in rocks formed about , and other fossils show that corals may have been present shortly before  and diversified a few million years later. Fossils of cnidarians that do not build mineralized structures are very rare. Scientists currently think that cnidarians, ctenophores and bilaterians are more closely related to calcareous sponges than these are to other sponges, and that anthozoans are the evolutionary aunts or sisters of other cnidarians, and the most closely related to bilaterians. Recent analyses have concluded that cnidarians, although considered more primitive than bilaterians, have a wider range of genes.Distinguishing featuresCnidarians form an animal phylum that is more complex than sponges, about as complex as ctenophores (comb jellies), and less complex than bilaterians, which include almost all other animals. However, both cnidarians and ctenophores are more complex than sponges as they have: cells bound by inter-cell connections and carpet-like membranes; muscles; systems; and some have sensory organs. Cnidarians are distinguished from all other animals by having cnidocytes that fire like harpoons and are used mainly to capture prey but also as anchors in some species.()Like sponges and ctenophores, cnidarians have two main layers of cells that sandwich a middle layer of jelly-like material, which is called the mesoglea in cnidarians; more complex animals have three main cell layers and no intermediate jelly-like layer. Hence, cnidarians and ctenophores have traditionally been labelled diploblastic, along with sponges.(( However, both cnidarians and ctenophores have a type of muscle that, in more complex animals, arises from the middle cell layer.() As a result some recent text books classify ctenophores as triploblastic,( and it has been suggested that cnidarians evolved from triploblastic ancestors.(DescriptionMain cell layersCnidaria are diploblastic animals, in other words they have two main cell layers, while more complex animals are triploblasts having three main layers. The two main cell layers of cnidarians form epithelia that are mostly one cell thick, and are attached to a fibrous membrane, which they secrete. They also secrete the jelly-like mesoglea that separates the layers. The layer that faces outwards, known as the ectoderm (outside skin), generally contains the following types of cells:(*Epitheliomuscular cells whose bodies form part of the epithelium but whose bases extend to form muscle fibers in parallel rows.() The fibers of the outward-facing cell layer generally run at right angles to the fibers of the inward-facing one. In Anthozoa (anemones, corals, etc.) and Scyphozoa (jellyfish), the mesoglea also contains some muscle cells.()                                                *Cnidocytes, the harpoon-like nettle cells that give the phylum Cnidaria its name. These appear between or sometimes on top of the muscle cells.(*Nerve cells. Sensory cells appear between or sometimes on top of the muscle cells,( and communicate via synapses (gaps across which chemical signals flow) with nerve cells, which lie mostly between the bases of the muscle cells.(*Interstitial cells, which are unspecialized and can replace lost or damaged cells by transforming into the appropriate types. These are found between the bases of muscle cells.(In addition to epitheliomuscular, nerve and interstitial cells, the inward-facing gastroderm (stomach skin) contains gland cells that secrete digestive enzymes. In some species it also contains low concentrations of cnidocytes, which are used to subdue prey that is still struggling.((The mesoglea contains small numbers of amoeba-like cells,( and muscle cells in some species.( However the number of middle-layer cells and types are much lower than in sponges.(Cnidocytesnematocyst 01.png|thumb| right| 200px| A hydras nematocyst, before firing. trigger cilium(thumb| right| 200px| Firing sequence of the cnida in a hydras nematocyst( Operculum (lid) Finger that turns inside out/ / / Barbs Venom Victims skin Victims tissuesThese nettle cells function as harpoons, since their payloads remain connected to the bodies of the cells by threads. Three types of cnidocytes are known:((*Nematocysts inject venom into prey, and usually have barbs to keep them embedded in the victims. Most species have nematocysts.(*Spirocysts do not penetrate the victim or inject venom, but entangle it by means of small sticky hairs on the thread. Only members of the class Anthozoa (anemones and corals) have spirocysts.(*Ptychocysts are not used for prey capture  instead the threads of discharged ptychocysts are used for building protective tubes in which their owners live. Ptychocysts are found only in the order Cerianthria, tube anemones.(The main components of a cnidocyte are:((*A cilium (fine hair) which projects above the surface and acts as a trigger. Spirocysts do not have cilia.*A tough capsule, the cnida, which houses the thread, its payload and a mixture of chemicals which may include venom or adhesives or both. (cnida is derived from the Greek word , which means nettle())*A tube-like extension of the wall of the cnida that points into the cnida, like the finger of a rubber glove pushed inwards. When a cnidocyte fires, the finger pops out. If the cell is a venomous nematocyte, the fingers tip reveals a set of barbs that anchor it in the prey.*The thread, which is an extension of the finger and coils round it until the cnidocyte fires. The thread is usually hollow and delivers chemicals from the cnida to the target.*An operculum (lid) over the end of the cnida. The lid may be a single hinged flap or three flaps arranged like slices of pie.*The cell body which produces all the other parts.It is difficult to study the firing mechanisms of cnidocytes as these structures are small but very complex. At least four hypotheses have been proposed:(*Rapid contraction of fibers round the cnida may increase its internal pressure.*The thread may be like a coiled spring that extends rapidly when released.*In the case of Chironex (the sea wasp), chemical changes in the cnidas contents may cause them to expand rapidly by polymerization.*Chemical changes in the liquid in the cnida make it a much more concentrated solution, so that pressure forces water in very rapidly to dilute it. This mechanism has been observed in nematocysts of the class Hydrozoa, sometimes producing pressures as high as 140 atmospheres, similar to that of scuba air tanks, and fully extending the thread in as little as 2 milliseconds (0.002 second).(Cnidocytes can only fire once, and about 25% of a hydras nematocysts are lost from its tentacles when capturing a shrimp. Used cnidocytes have to be replaced, which takes about 48 hours. To minimise wasteful firing, two types of stimulus are generally required to trigger cnidocytes: their cilia detect contact, and nearby sensory cells smell chemicals in the water. This combination prevents them from firing at distant or non-living objects. Groups of cnidocytes are usually connected by nerves and, if one fires, the rest of the group requires a weaker minimum stimulus than the cells that fire first.((Basic body forms Exoderm Gastroderm (Endoderm) Mesoglea Digestive cavity}}Image:Actinodiscus macro.JPG|thumb|right|220px|Oral end of actinodiscus polyp, with close-up of the mouthAdult cnidarians appear as either swimming medusae or sessile polyps. Both are radially symmetrical, like a wheel and a tube respectively. Since these animals have no heads, their ends are described as oral (nearest the mouth) and aboral (furthest from the mouth). Most have fringes of tentacles equipped with cnidocytes around their edges, and medusae generally have an inner ring of tentacles around the mouth. The mesoglea of polyps is usually thin and often soft, but that of medusae is usually thick and springy, so that it returns to its original shape after muscles around the edge have contracted to squeeze water out, enabling medusae to swim by a sort of jet propulsion.(Colonial formsthumb|right| 100px| Tree-like polyp colony(Cnidaria produce a variety of colonial forms, each of which is one organism but consists of polyp-like zooids. The simplest is a connecting tunnel that runs over the substrate (rock or seabed) and from which single zooids sprout. In some cases the tunnels form visible webs, and in others they are enclosed in a fleshy mat. More complex forms are also based on connecting tunnels but produce tree-like groups of zooids. The trees may be formed either by a central zooid that functions as a trunk with later zooids growing to the sides as branches, or in a zig-zag shape as a succession of zooids, each of which grows to full size and then produces a single bud at an angle to itself. In many cases the connecting tunnels and the stems are covered in periderm, a protective layer of chitin.( Some colonial forms have other specialized types of zooid, for example, to pump water through their tunnels.()Siphonophores form complex colonies that consist of: an upside-down polyp that forms a central stem with a gas-filled float at the top; one or more sets of medusa-like zooids that provide propulsion; leaf-like bracts that give some protection to other parts; sets of tentacles that bear nematocytes that capture prey; other tentacles that act as sensors; near the base of each set of tentacles, a polyp-like zooid that acts as a stomach for the colony; medusa-like zooids that serve as gonads. Although some of these zooids resemble polyps or medusae in shape, they lack features that are not relevant to their specific functions, for example the swimming medusae have no digestive, sensory or reproductive cells. The best-known siphonophore is the Man o War (Physalia physalis).(()()SkeletonsIn medusae the only supporting structure is the mesoglea. Hydra and most anemones close their mouths when they are not feeding, and the water in the digestive cavity then acts as a skeleton, rather like a water-filled balloon. Other polyps such as Tubularia use columns of water-filled cells for support. pens stiffen the mesoglea with carbonate spicules and tough fibrous proteins, rather like sponges.(In some colonial polyps a chitinous periderm gives support and some protection to the connecting sections and to the lower parts of individual polyps. Stony corals secrete massive calcium carbonate exoskeletons. A few polyps collect materials such as sand grains and shell fragments, which they attach to their outsides. Some colonial sea anemones stiffen the mesoglea with sediment particles.(LocomotionImage:Chrysaora quinquecirrha-Sea nettle (jellyfish).ogg|thumb| right| 200px| quinquecirrha (sea nettle) swimmingMedusae swim by a form of jet propulsion: muscles, especially inside the rim of the bell, squeeze water out of the cavity inside the bell, and the springiness of the mesoglea powers the recovery stroke. Since the tissue layers are very thin, they provide too little power to swim against currents and just enough to control movement within currents.(Hydras and some anemones can move slowly over rocks and sea or stream beds by various means: creeping like snails, crawling like inchworms, or by somersaulting. A few can swim clumsily by waggling their bases.(Nervous system and sensesCnidaria have no brains or even nervous systems. Instead they have decentralized nets consisting of : neurons that generate signals in response to various types of stimulus, such as odors; neurons that tell muscles to contract; all connected by cobwebs of intermediate neurons. As well as forming the signal cables, intermediate neurons also form ganglia that act as local coordination centers. The cilia of the cnidocytes detect physical contact. Nerves inform cnidocytes when odors from prey or attackers are detected and when neighbouring cnidocytes fire. Most of the communications between nerve cells are via synapses, small gaps across which chemicals flow. As this process is too slow to ensure that the muscles round the rim of a medusas bell contract simultaneously in swimming the neurons which control this communicate by much faster electrical signals across junctions.(Medusae and complex swimming colonies such as siphonophores and chondrophores sense tilt and acceleration by means of statocysts, chambers lined with hairs which detect the movements of internal mineral grains called statoliths. If the body tilts in the wrong direction, the animal rights itself by increasing the strength of the swimming movements on the side that is too low. They also have ocelli (little eyes), which can detect the direction from which light is coming. Box jellies have eyes, although these probably do not form images, and their lenses simply produce a clearer indication of the direction from which light is coming.(Feeding and excretionCnidarians feed in several ways: predation, absorbing dissolved organic chemicals, filtering food particles out of the water, and obtaining nutrients from symbiotic algae within their cells. Most obtain the majority of their food from predation but some, including the corals Hetroxenia and Leptogorgia, depend almost completely on their endosymbionts and on absorbing dissolved nutrients.( Cnidaria give their symbiotic algae dioxide, some nutrients and a place in the sun.(Predatory species use their cnidocytes to poison or entangle prey, and those with venomous nematocysts  may start digestion by injecting digestive enzymes. The smell of fluids from wounded prey makes the tentacles fold inwards and wipe the prey off into the mouth. In medusae the tentacles round the edge of the bell are often short and most of the prey capture is done by oral arms, which are extensions of the edge of the mouth and are often frilled and sometimes branched to increase their surface area. Medusae often trap prey or suspended food particles by swimming upwards, spreading their tentacles and oral arms and then sinking. In species for which suspended food particles are important, the tentacles and oral arms often have rows of cilia whose beating creates currents that flow towards the mouth, and some produce nets of mucus to trap particles.(Once the food is in the digestive cavity, gland cells in the gastroderm release enzymes that reduce the prey to slurry, usually within a few hours. This circulates through the digestive cavity and, in colonial cnidarians, through the connecting tunnels, so that gastroderm cells can absorb the nutrients. Absorption may take a few hours, and digestion within the cells may take a few days. The circulation of nutrients is driven by water currents produced by cilia in the gastroderm or by muscular movements or both, so that nutrients reach all parts of the digestive cavity.( Nutrients reach the outer cell layer by diffusion or, for animals or zooids such as medusae which have thick mesogleas, are transported by mobile cells in the mesoglea.(Indigestible remains of prey are expelled through the mouth. The main waste product of cells internal processes is ammonia, which is removed by the external and internal water currents.(RespirationThere are no respiratory organs, and both cell layers absorb oxygen from and expel dioxide into the surrounding water. When the water in the digestive cavity becomes stale it must be replaced, and nutrients that have not been absorbed will be expelled with it. Some Anthozoa have ciliated grooves on their tentacles, allowing them to pump water out of and into the digestive cavity without opening the mouth. This improves respiration after feeding and allows these animals, which use the cavity as a skeleton, to control the water pressure in the cavity without expelling undigested food.(Cnidaria that carry photosynthetic symbionts may have the opposite problem, an excess of oxygen, which may prove toxic. The animals produce large quantities of antioxidants to neutralize the excess oxygen.(RegenerationAll cnidarians can regenerate, allowing them to recover from injury and to reproduce asexually. Medusae have limited ability to regenerate, but polyps can do so from small pieces or even collections of separated cells. This enables corals to recover even after apparently being destroyed by predators.(Reproduction annotationsSexualIn the Cnidaria reproduction often involves a complex life cycle with both polyp and medusa stages. For example in Scyphozoa (jellyfish) and Cubozoa (box jellies) a larva swims until it finds a good site, and then becomes a polyp. This grows normally but then absorbs its tentacles and splits horizontally into a series of disks that become juvenile medusae, a process called strobilation. The juveniles swim off and slowly grow to maturity, while the polyp re-grows and may continue strobilating periodically. The adults have gonads in the gastroderm, and these release ova and sperm into the water in the breeding season.((Shortened forms of this life cycle are common, for example some oceanic scyphozoans omit the polyp stage completely, and cubozoan polyps produce only one medusa. Hydrozoa have a variety of life cycles. Some have no polyp stages and some (e.g. hydra) have no medusae. In some species the medusae remain attached to the polyp and are responsible for sexual reproduction; in extreme cases these reproductive zooids may not look much like medusae. Anthozoa have no medusa stage at all and the polyps are responsible for sexual reproduction.(Spawning is generally driven by environmental factors such as changes in the water temperature, and their release is triggered by lighting conditions such as sunrise, sunset or the phase of the moon. Many species of Cnidaria may spawn simultaneously in the same location, so that there are too many ova and sperm for predators to eat more than a tiny percentage  one famous example is the Barrier Reef, where at least 110 corals and a few non-cnidarian invertebrates produce enough to turn the water cloudy. These mass spawnings may produce hybrids, some of which can settle and form polyps, but it is not known how long these can survive. In some species the ova release chemicals that attract sperm of the same species.(The fertilized eggs develop into larvae by dividing until there are enough cells to form a hollow sphere (blastula) and then a depression forms at one end (gastrulation) and eventually become the digestive cavity. However in cnidarians the depression forms at the end further from the yolk (at the pole), while in bilaterians it forms at the other end (pole).( The larvae, called planulae, swim or crawl by means of cilia.( They are cigar-shaped but slightly broader at the front end, which is the aboral, vegetal-pole end and eventually attaches to a substrate if the species has a polyp stage.(Anthozoan larvae either have large yolks or are capable of feeding on plankton, and some already have endosymbiotic algae that help to feed them. Since the parents are immobile, these feeding capabilities extend the larvaes range and avoid overcrowding of sites. Scyphozoan and hydrozoan larvae have little yolk and most lack endosymbiotic algae, and therefore have to settle quickly and metamorphose into polyps. Instead these species rely on their medusae to extend their ranges.(AsexualAll known cnidaria can reproduce asexually by various means, in addition to regenerating after being fragmented. Hydrozoan polyps only bud, while the medusae of some hydrozoans can divide down the middle. Scyphozoan polyps can both bud and split down the middle. In addition to both of these methods, Anthozoa can split horizontally just above the base.((Evolutionary historyFossil recordImage:Cladocora.jpg|right|thumb|The fossil coral Cladocora from Pliocene rocks in CyprusThe earliest widely accepted animal fossils are rather modern-looking cnidarians, possibly from around , although fossils from the Formation can only be dated approximately.() The identification of some of these as embryos of animals has been contested, but other fossils from these rocks strongly resemble tubes and other mineralized structures made by corals.() Their presence implies that the cnidarian and bilaterian lineages had already diverged.()  Although the Ediacaran fossil Charnia used to be classified as a jellyfish or pen,() more recent study of growth patterns in Charnia and modern cnidarians has cast doubt on this hypothesis,()() and there are now no bona-fide cnidarian body fossils in the Ediacaran. Few fossils of cnidarians without mineralized skeletons are known from more recent rocks, except in lagersttten that preserved soft-bodied animals.()A few mineralized fossils that resemble corals have been found in rocks from the Cambrian period, and corals diversified in the Early Ordovician.( These corals, which were wiped out in the extinction about ,( did not dominate reef construction since sponges and algae also played a major part.() During the Mesozoic era rudist bivalves were the main reef-builders, but they were wiped out in the extinction ,() and since then the main reef-builders have been scleractinian corals.(Family tree2Scyphozoa(jellyfish, excludingStaurozoa)                              }}            }}            |22                      }}        }}      }}    }}  }}}}Family tree of Cnidaria and the origins of animals(((()It is difficult to reconstruct the early stages in the evolutionary family tree of animals using only morphology (their shapes and structures), because the large differences between Porifera (sponges), Cnidaria plus Ctenophora (comb jellies), Placozoa and Bilateria (all the more complex animals) make comparisons difficult. Hence reconstructions now rely largely or entirely on phylogenetics, which groups organisms according to similarities and differences in their biochemistry, usually in their DNA or RNA.()It is now generally thought that the Calcarea (sponges with carbonate spicules) are more closely related to Cnidaria, Ctenophora (comb jellies) and Bilateria (all the more complex animals) than they are to the other groups of sponges.()()() In 1866 it was proposed that Cnidaria and Ctenophora were more closely related to each other than to Bilateria and formed a group called Coelenterata (hollow guts), because Cnidaria and Ctenophora both rely on the flow of water in and out of a single cavity for feeding, excretion and respiration. In 1881 it was proposed that Ctenophora and Bilateria were more closely related to each other, since they shared features that Cnidaria lack, for example muscles in the middle layer (mesoglea in Ctenophora, mesoderm in Bilateria). However more recent analyses indicate that these similarities are rather vague, and the current view, based on molecular phylogenetics, is that Cnidaria and Bilateria are more closely related to each other than either is to Ctenophora. This grouping of Cnidaria and Bilateria has been labelled Planulozoa because it suggests that the earliest Bilateria were similar to the planula larvae of Cnidaria.()()Within the Cnidaria, the Anthozoa (sea anemones and corals) are regarded as the sister-group of the rest, which suggests that the earliest cnidarians were sessile polyps with no medusa stage. However it is unclear how the other groups acquired the medusa stage, since Hydrozoa form medusae by budding from the side of the polyp while the other Medusozoa do so by splitting them off from the tip of the polyp. The traditional grouping of Scyphozoa included the Staurozoa, but morphology and molecular phylogenetics indicate that Staurozoa are more closely related to Cubozoa (box jellies) than to other Scyphozoa. Similarities in the double body walls of Staurozoa and the extinct Conulariida suggest that they are closely related. The position of Anthozoa nearest the beginning of the cnidarian family tree also implies that Anthozoa are the cnidarians most closely related to Bilateria, and this is supported by the fact that Anthozoa and Bilateria share some genes that determine the main axes of the body.(()However in 2005 Katja Seipel and Volker Schmid suggested that cnidarians and ctenophores are simplified descendants of triploblastic animals, since ctenophores and the medusa stage of some cnidarians have muscle, which in bilaterians arises from the mesoderm. They did not commit themselves on whether bilaterians evolved from early cnidarians or from the hypothesized triploblastic ancestors of cnidarians.(In molecular phylogenetics analyses from 2005 onwards, important groups of developmental genes show the same variety in cnidarians as in chordates.() In fact cnidarians, and especially anthozoans (sea anemones and corals), retain some genes that are present in bacteria, protists, plants and fungi but not in bilaterians.()Interaction with humansJellyfish stings killed about 1,500 people in the 20th century,() and cubozoans are particularly dangerous. On the other hand, some large jellyfish are considered a delicacy in eastern and southern Asia. Coral reefs have long been economically important as providers of fishing grounds, protectors of shore buildings against currents and tides, and more recently as centers of tourism. However, they are vulnerable to over-fishing, mining for construction materials, pollution, and damage caused by tourism.Beaches protected from tides and storms by reefs are often the best places for housing in tropical countries. Reefs are an important food source for low-technology fishing, both on the reefs themselves and in the adjacent seas.() However despite their great productivity reefs are vulnerable to over-fishing, because much of the carbon they produce is exhaled as dioxide by organisms at the middle levels of the chain and never reaches the larger species that are of interest to fishermen.( Tourism centered on reefs provides much of the income of some tropical islands, attracting photographers, divers and sports fishermen. However human activities damage reefs in several ways: mining for construction materials; pollution, including large influxes of fresh water from drains; commercial fishing, including the use of dynamite to stun fish and the capture of young fish for aquariums; and tourist damage caused by boat anchors and the cumulative effect of walking on the reefs.( Coral, mainly from the Ocean has long been used in jewellery, and demand rose sharply in the 1980s.()Some large jellyfish species have been used in cuisine at least since 200 AD, and are now fished in the seas around most of East Asia. Japan is the largest single consumer of edible jellyfish, importing at first only from China but now from all of South East Asia as prices rose in the 1970s. This fishing industry is restricted to daylight hours and calm conditions in two short seasons, from March to May and August to November.() The commercial value of jellyfish food products depends on the skill with which they are prepared, and Jellyfish Masters guard their secrets carefully. Jellyfish is very low in cholesterol and sugars, but cheap preparation can introduce undesirable amounts of heavy metals.()The sea wasp fleckeri has been described as the worlds most venomous animal and is held responsible for 67 deaths, although it is difficult to identify the animal as it is almost transparent. Most stingings by C. fleckeri cause only mild symptoms.() Seven other box jellies can cause a set of symptoms called syndrome,() which takes about 30 minutes to develop,() and from a few hours to two weeks to disappear.() Hospital treatment is usually required, and there have been a few deaths.(NotesFurther reading Books *Arai, M.N. (1997). A Functional Biology of Scyphozoa. London: Chapman & Hall 316. ISBN 0-412-45110-7.*Ax, P. (1999). Das System der Metazoa I. Ein Lehrbuch der phylogenetischen Systematik. Gustav Fischer, Stuttgart-Jena: Gustav Fischer. ISBN 3-437-30803-3.*Barnes, R.S.K., P. Calow, P. J. W. Olive, D. W. Golding & J. I. Spicer (2001). The invertebratesa synthesis. Oxford: Blackwell. 3rd edition 3.4.2, p. 54. ISBN 0-632-04761-5.*Brusca, R.C., G.J. Brusca (2003). Invertebrates. Sunderland, Mass.: Sinauer Associates. 2nd edition 8, p. 219. ISBN 0-87893-097-3.*Dalby, A. (2003). Food in the Ancient World: from A to Z. London: Routledge.*Moore, J.(2001). An Introduction to the Invertebrates. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press 4, p. 30. ISBN 0-521-77914-6.*Schfer, W. (1997). Cnidaria, Nesseltiere. In Rieger, W. (ed.) Spezielle Zoologie. Teil 1. Einzeller und Wirbellose Tiere. Stuttgart-Jena: Gustav Fischer. Spektrum Akademischer Verl., Heidelberg, 2004. ISBN 3-8274-1482-2.*Werner, B. 4. Stamm Cnidaria. In: V. Gruner (ed.) Lehrbuch der speziellen Zoologie. Begr. von Kaestner. 2 Bde. Stuttgart-Jena: Gustav Fischer, Stuttgart-Jena. 1954, 1980, 1984, Spektrum Akad. Verl., Heidelberg-Berlin, 1993. 5th edition. ISBN 3-334-60474-8. Journal articles * D. Bridge, B. Schierwater, C. W. Cunningham, R. DeSalle R, L. W. Buss: Mitochondrial DNA structure and the molecular phylogeny of recent cnidaria classes. in: Proceedings of the Academy of Natural Sciences of Philadelphia. Philadelphia USA 89.1992, p. 8750. * D. Bridge, C. W. Cunningham, R. DeSalle, L. W. Buss: Class-level relationships in the phylum CnidariaMolecular and morphological evidence. in: Molecular biology and evolution. Oxford University Press, Oxford 12.1995, p. 679. * D. G. Fautin: Reproduction of Cnidaria. in: Canadian Journal of Zoology. Ottawa Ont. 80.2002, p. 1735. (PDF, online) * G. O. Mackie: Whats new in cnidarian biology? in: Canadian Journal of Zoology. Ottawa Ont. 80.2002, p. 1649. (PDF, online) * P. Schuchert: Phylogenetic analysis of the Cnidaria. in: Zeitschrift fr zoologische Systematik und Evolutionsforschung. Paray, Hamburg-Berlin 31.1993, p. 161. * G. Kass-Simon, A. A. Scappaticci Jr.: The behavioral and developmental physiology of nematocysts. in: Canadian Journal of Zoology. Ottawa Ont. 80.2002, p. 1772. (PDF, online) * External links*YouTube: Nematocysts Firing*YouTube:My Anemone Eat Meat Defensive and feeding behaviour of sea anemone* Cnidaria - Guide to the Marine Zooplankton of south eastern Australia, Tasmanian Aquaculture & Fisheries Institute* A Cnidaria homepage maintained by University of California, Irvine* Cnidaria page at Tree of Life* Fossil Gallery: Cnidarians* The Hydrozoa Directory* Hexacorallians of the Worldar:roa-rup:Cnidariaz:Dalayclarbs:arnjacibr:Knidariedbg:ca:Cnidarics:ahavcicy:Cnidariadda:Nldecelledyrde:Nesseltiereet:Ainussedes:Cnidariaeo:Kniduloeu:Cnidariafa:fr:Cnidariagv:Cnidariagl:Cnidariosko:hi:hr:arnjaciio:Kniduloid:Cnidariais:Holdrit:Cnidariahe:jv:Cnidariala:Cnidarialv:Dzljzarndobumaiilb:Nesseldierenlt:Duobagyviaihu:Csalnozkmk:nl:Neteldierenja:no:Nesledyrnn:Nesledyroc:Cnidariands:Cnidariapl:Parzydekowcept:Cnidriosqu:Karachiqru:scn:Cnidariasimple:Cnidariask:Phlivcesl:Oigalkarjisr:sh:arnjacifi:Polttiaiselimetsv:Nsseldjurtl:Cnidariate:th:tr:Knidlileruk:zea:Cnidariazh:
6658
October_2003
__NOTOC__October 2003: January  February  March  April  May  June  July  August  September  October  November  DecemberEventsOctober 1, 2003* South Korean President Moo Hyun reiterates offer to the United States to consider a request for Korean participation in Force  Iraq in exchange for positive movement to resolve the standoff over North Koreas nuclear weapons program.* Anti-Americanism: A panel chosen by the administration of President George W. Bush concludes that the United States must drastically increase and overhaul its relations efforts to recast its image among Muslims and Arabs abroad. Hostility toward America has reached shocking levels ... What is required is not merely tactical adaptation but strategic, and radical, transformation. The panel adds that spin and manipulation are not the answer, nor is avoiding the debate.* of the European Commission Prodi unveils a proposal to boost flagging economic growth in Europe. The plan has two main parts: increasing spending on European transport networks and promoting research and development. * establishing a Constitution for Europe: Following talks with Prime Minister pidla on the draft Union constitution and the Republics position on the document, the Czech President Klaus decides not to travel to Rome and attend the forthcoming intergovernmental conference. * Canada: of the Northwest Territories Kakfwi announces he will not seek re-election in the November election.*The website 4chan.org is created.October 2, 2003* Korea claims to have already processed 8,000 rods from its nuclear reactor north of Pyongyang and is using the plutonium extracted during the process to make bombs to boost its nuclear capabilities for nuclear deterrent force. Citing a hostile policy by the United States, Vice Foreign Minister Su Hon states this is a means to safeguard the countrys territory. http://www.cnn.com/2003/WORLD/asiapcf/east/10/01/nkorea.nukes/index.html * of Iraq: The Nations Security Council discusses a new United States draft resolution on Iraq, which would enhance the Nations role in Iraq. Secretary General Annan states draft did not go in the direction he recommended.  A quicker transfer of sovereignty may change the dynamics on the ground, in terms of the security situation, and send a message. http://www.un.org/apps/news/story.asp?NewsID8436&Criraq&Cr1* Technology  Genome: The genome chip arrived with several companies rushing to sell the known human genes.  The products will allow scientists to scan all genes in a human tissue sample at once to determine which are active, with lower cost and increased speed. http://www.iht.com/articles/112288.html* relations: The States Navy blames the Peoples Republic of China for 2001 Island incident.  A report released to Defense Weekly under the Freedom of Information Act said that the pilot of the Chinese fighter made three passes at the U.S. propeller-driven plane over waters. On the third pass, the Chinese fighter hit a propeller on the American plane. http://www.washtimes.com/national//20030912-110434-9850r.htm* general election, 2003: McGuinty becomes the new premier of Ontario when his party defeats Evess incumbent Tories and Hamptons NDP.* M. Coetzee wins Prize for literature. http://www.nobel.se/literature/laureates/2003/press.html* Union: United States draft legislation which urges Pentagon to buy defence parts from American manufacturers has turned heads in Brussels, with some warning of yet another dispute at the WTO. http://www.euobserver.com/index.phtml?sid9&aid12889* Union: The first bilateral meeting between France and Austria since 1998 is marked by disagreements over the Constitution.  Austria heads the group of small countries seeking to make changes to the text, but France wants to leave the draft by Giscard dEstaing broadly untouched. http://www.euobserver.com/index.phtml?sid9&aid12888* Media: A on International Policy Attitudes (PIPA) study conducted with California-based Knowledge Networks, titled Misperceptions, the Media, and the Iraq War, is released.  According to this study, misperceptions about the invasion of Iraq are most common among consumers of News Channel and supporters of President W. Bush and least common among consumers of PBS and NPR and supporters of Democratic presidential candidates.  The study also found that frequent viewers of Fox News are more likely to believe in the  misconceptions than less frequent ones. One example misconception is the belief that of mass destruction have already been found in Iraq. http://www.atimes.com/atimes/Middle_East/EJ04Ak01.htmlOctober 3, 2003* asteroid: Confirmation on the closest near-miss of a natural object ever recorded. The asteroid (designated SQ222), about the size of a small house, flew past Earth at a distance of around 88,000 kilometres. It would have made a fireball had it entered the atmosphere. http://www.newscientist.com/news/news.jsp?idns99994228* and weapons of mass destruction: The world continues to digest David Kays report that finds very little evidence of of mass destruction in Iraq, although the regime did intend to develop more weapons with additional capabilities. Such plans and programs appear to have been dormant, the existence of these were also concealed from the Nations during the inspections that began in 2002. Weapons inspectors in Iraq do find clandestine network of biological laboratories and a deadly strain of botulinum. The US-sponsored search for WMD has so far cost  and is projected to cost around  more. http://washingtontimes.com/upi-breaking/20031003-104756-7758r.htm http://www.etaiwannews.com/World/2003/10/05/1065322964.htm* California recall: Schwarzenegger denies admiring Hitler. Arnold Schwarzeneggers denial comes days before the vote for the next governor of California. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/americas/3160706.stm* Politics: General Wesley Clark made a bold political move and arguably a risky one by suggesting that members of the Bush administration may be liable to criminal charges in connection with the Iraq war.  Mr. Clark alleges that the plans for the invasion of Iraq, and other interventions in the East (possibly including Lebanon and Syria), pre-dated the inauguration of the President and that the reasons for the war were misleadingly presented to the US people.*Morales said that Snchez de Lozada, president of Bolivia, may be preparing a coup.  http://www.lapatriaenlinea.com/index.php?optioncontent&taskview&id1246 (in Spanish)* Missiles: Polish soldiers of the United States-led Coalition discovered four advanced missiles around central Iraq in the Hilla region near a highway. The Roland-type French-made missiles (which are fired from a launcher vehicle against low flying aircraft) were initially believed to have been manufactured earlier in 2003. exports to Iraq had been barred by the United Nations after the 1990 invasion of Kuwait. France says it last shipped Roland missiles to Iraq in 1986. The Polish soldiers were later found to have misinterpreted markings that read 07-01-KND 2003 as a date on the missiles. http://www.thescotsman.co.uk/index.cfm?id1099272003 http://www.channelnewsasia.com/stories/middleeast/view/50640/1/.html http://www.reuters.com/newsArticle.jhtml?typetopNews&storyID3558401October 4, 2003* conflict: A Palestinian bomber blows herself up in a crowded beach restaurant in the northern Israeli port city of Haifa, killing at least 19 people and wounding about two dozen, at least six seriously. http://www.msnbc.com/news/801833.asp?vts100420030702&cp11.  Hours later Israeli helicopter gunships retaliate by attacking targets in Gaza City and Central Gaza.* Cook, former United Kingdom Foreign Secretary who resigned from the British Government in protest prior the Iraq war, publishes his personal diaries. In them he alleges inter alia that Blair knew before the Iraq war began that the 45 minutes to launch claim was false.* Horn, of the magic team & Roy, is hospitalized with critical injuries after being mauled on-stage in Las Vegas by a 600-pound seven-year-old male white tiger.* Poland apologizes to France for its claims that it had found newly produced  Roland missiles in Iraq. It is believed that the Polish soldiers misinterpreted a use-by date or installation date marked on the missiles as a date of production. http://www.reuters.com/newsArticle.jhtml?typetopNews&storyID3558401October 5, 2003*Arar is reported to have been freed from a Syrian jail. The Canadian engineer was deported to Syria by the United States as he changed planes in New York, over a year ago. http://www.cbc.ca/stories/2003/10/05/arar031005 He will arrive in Montreal the following afternoon. http://www.cbc.ca/stories/2003/10/06/arar_back03*es Saheb airstrike: Israeli warplanes attack an alleged Islamic Jihad training base deep in Syria in retaliation for a bombing at a Haifa restaurant that killed 19 people, the army said Sunday. Israeli media state this is the first Israeli attack on Syrian soil in more than two decades. An emergency session of the UN Security Council is scheduled to debate the action.  France and Germany condemn the attack. The international community calls for restraint by all parties involved. http://www.hinduonnet.com/thehindu/holnus/01052200.htm* John Paul II canonizes Comboni (18311881), Janssen (18371909) and Freinademetz (18521908).* on Sunday claims that John Paul II is suffering from terminal cancer which has spread to his colon. The newspaper reports that the Pope has dictated a will which gives instructions as to how the Roman Catholic Church is to be administered when the medical treatment he is receiving makes it impossible for him to function as pope. According to the paper, Cardinals have been told to be ready at a moments notice to fly to Rome for a funeral and conclave.*The band Hell on Earth reports that an Internet broadcast of a concert that was to feature a suicide of a terminally ill person did not happen on Saturday evening, because the Web site was attacked. Band members state that the concert still went on, but they are unsure whether the suicide took place.October 6, 2003* 2004 U.S. Democratic Primaries: Senator Graham announces on King Live that he is ending his 2004 presidential campaign. http://washingtontimes.com/national/20031006-111049-1385r.htm* Election: Moscows choice, the Kremlin-backed Kadyrov swept presidential election in the Russian of Chechnya, winning 81 percent of the votes. http://www.pbs.org/newshour/updates/chechnya_10-06-03.html* SCO v. IBM: In an open letter to the Linux community published by Graphics (SGI), SGI states it conducted a comprehensive comparison of the kernel and the System V code owned by The Group. According to the letter (authored by SGI President of Software Altmaier), SGIs exhaustive comparison of the source codes turned up only trivial code segments that may arguably be related to SCOs software. The letter also disputed SCOs claims that SGI inappropriately contributed its XFS (eXtensible File System). http://www.itworld.com/Man/2685/031006sgisco/* East:  Facing renewed threats from Israel, Palestinian leader Arafat, declares a of emergency in Palestinian areas and installs a new government by decree. Qurei is appointed minister and head of the eight-member emergency cabinet. http://www.iht.com/articles/112555.html* Israel: In his first public comments since the Israeli attack on Syria, President Bush says that Israel has the right to defend its homeland; at the same time Mr. Bush asks Prime Minister Sharon to avoid any further actions that might destabilize the region.* Lauterbur and Sir Mansfield are jointly awarded the Prize in Physiology or Medicine for their discoveries concerning Resonance Imaging. http://www.nobel.se/medicine/laureates/2003/press.html* of Iraq: Some in the international community have rejected a revised United States draft UN resolution concerning Iraq (calling for a multinational force of peacekeeping troops in Iraq under American command; transferring power gradually to elected civilian rule there is no handover timetable for sovereignty). The resolution is being supported by the United Kingdom. France, Germany, and Russia (which opposed the invasion of Iraq) have joined Annan in opposing the resolution. Annan states that the Nations itself will not become heavily involved unless there are early moves toward passing sovereignty to the Iraqi people. Annans stance is similar to that of John Paul II and some members of the Union. http://www.finalcall.com/artman/publish/article_1050.shtml http://www.ajc.com/news/content/news/ap/ap_story.html/Intl/AP.V6661.AP-UN-Iraq.html http://www.wishtv.com/Global/story.asp?S1470372 http://www.voanews.com/article.cfm?objectID55C8D482-E130-4E0F-88E43A2F02B92964 http://www.swisspolitics.org/en/news/index.php?sectionint&pagenews_inhalt&news_id4312369*Irish political magazine Magill is closed down by its publishers, blaming poor readership numbers. The magazine, which played a central part in Irish politics in the 1970s and 1980s, has never regained the readership it attracted under its founder, maverick journalist and political commentator Browne, who, after an earlier closure, relaunched the title and sold it to its current owners. http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1006/publishing.html*Attempts by the of Irelands government to ban smoking in pubs, restaurants and hotels run into more trouble as a government minister who will have responsibility for enforcing the ban, Fahey, refuses to deny that he is critical of the plan and wants a compromise that would allow smoking in some areas to continue. A former Mayor of Galway and Fil councillor who has links with the pub industry resigns from a health authority in protest at the refusal of the Fianna Fil-Progressive Democrat government to compromise on the proposed ban. This follows an earlier announcement that publicans in Kerry will refuse to obey the new law and indications of growing popular opposition to the ban.  http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1006/tobacco.html*Former News correspondent Furlong, who resigned over allegations that he had faked a report during the Iraq War, is found dead. Furlong, aged 44, had served as Sky News Defence and Royal Correspondent. He had previously worked for ITN. http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1006/forlongj.html*A Nations report says that almost  people worldwide are living in slums. By 2050 , out of a world urban population of , may be living in slums, unless radical policies are implemented, according to the UN. Dr Anna Tibaijuka of the UN says the persistence of the slums should shame the whole world. http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1006/slums.htmlOctober 7, 2003* California recall:  The state of California held a special election to decide whether to recall Governor Davis, and, if so, who to replace him with.  Also on the ballot:  Proposition 53, the California Twenty-First Century Infrastructure Investment Fund, and Proposition 54, the Racial Privacy Initiative.* Prize: The Prize in Physics is awarded jointly to Alexei Abrikosov, Ginzburg and Leggett for their work on the theory of superconductors and superfluids. http://www.nobel.se/physics/laureates/2003/index.html* East: Nations envoy and Special Coordinator for the East peace process, Roed-Larsen, condemns attack from territory that killed an Israeli soldier across the southern withdrawal line and urges Beirut to control the use of force everywhere in its jurisdiction. Roed-Larsen, states the attack constitutes a clear violation of the Blue Line and Security Council resolutions and could escalate tension between Israel and its northern neighbours and he calls on all sides to use diplomacy and take no action that could increase the already high level of tension in the region. http://www.un.org/apps/news/story.asp?NewsID8474&Crmiddle&Cr1east* Congo: UN spokesman states that a Nations operation in the Republic of the Congo (DRC) has discovered 65 bodies, mostly children, apparently massacred. http://www.un.org/apps/news/story.asp?NewsID8472&CrDR&Cr1Congo* of Iraq: The Turkish Parliament votes (358-to-183) to approve the dispatch of peacekeepers to Iraq, in a major victory for United States efforts to broaden foreign involvement in Iraq. In Baghdad, Governing Council officials state that they would oppose any new foreign troop deployment to Iraq. No formal decision had been made by the Council and leaders of the council have stated they would support this if the United States requested this. http://www.iht.com/articles/112829.html* punishment: Some legal and medical professionals are stating warnings about the apparent tranquillity of a lethal injection, declaring this may be deceptive. According to these professional the standard chemical combination used to execute people may lead to paralysis that masks intense distress, leaving a wide-awake inmate unable to speak or cry out as he slowly suffocates. http://www.iht.com/articles/112788.html* engineering: Small group of protesters brave chilly winds and strip off outside Zealand Parliament to lobby against lifting the modified food moratorium. http://www.stuff.co.nz/stuff/0,2106,2684335a10,00.html* Africa: The African government announce they would not prosecute the five policemen accused of killing Biko in 1977, citing insufficient evidence to support a murder charge. http://www.news24.com/News24/South_Africa/News/0,,2-7-1442_1426929,00.html* Asia: The of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) announces its intention to form a single-market Asian Community by 2020.October 8, 2003* Prize: The Prize in Chemistry is awarded jointly to Agre and MacKinnon for discoveries concerning aquaporins and channels in membranes. http://www.nobel.se/chemistry/laureates/2003/press.html*California recall: Republican Schwarzenegger wins the election with 48.6% after voters decide to recall California Governor Davis. Schwarzeneggers closest rival was the Democratic Lieutenant Governor Bustamante, with 31.7%. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/americas/3173276.stmhttp://vote2003.ss.ca.gov/Returns/gov/00.htm* Surveillance: The FBI admits that hidden listening devices planted in the office of the Mayor of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, were placed there by FBI agents. It is currently not known if the Mayor of Philadelphia is a target of an investigation nor is there any details provided about the nature of the probe that the device was part of. A law enforcement official cautions that the presence of the listening devices does not necessarily mean that the mayor, himself, is under investigation. http://abcnews.go.com/wire/US/ap20031008_1841.html http://www.nbc10.com/politics/2541019/detail.html* Palestinians: Arafat has suffered a mild heart attack. Palestinian leadership officials tried to hide condition of the president. Although he has had a slight heart attack, the doctors say he will make a full recovery. He is in full control. There is nothing to worry about, states close aide to Arafat. Officials state that it would have created panic at a critical time when the Israelis are threatening Arafats life. http://www.guardian.co.uk/israel/Story/0,2763,1058298,00.html http://msnbc.com/news/801833.asp?0cvCB10*general election, 2003: NDP Premier Calvert calls an election for November 5.October 9, 2003* Palestinians: Time magazine reports that Arafat, whose health has led to confused reporting over the past days, with him variously reported as having had flu and having had a heart attack, in actuality has cancer. http://www.time.com/time/world/article/0,8599,516827,00.html* Weapons: Pakistan successfully fires a medium-range, nuclear-capable missile, the second such test in less than a week, the army states. The missile, also known as the Shaheen 1, was fired off, according to the army. The missile has a range of 435 miles, meaning it can hit most major targets in India. The test followed a similar launching on Friday of the short-range Ghaznavi after which Pakistan said it was in the middle of a series of such tests. Pakistani army spokesman General Sultan said India had been told of each of the launches beforehand and he states the tests should not affect the relations between the two neighbors. http://www.lasvegassun.com/sunbin/stories/news/2003/oct/08/100807434.html* conflict: Defense Minister Mofaz ordered dispatches of Israeli troop reinforcements to the Areas, Bank and Strip, and weighed a call-up of reserves, citing new warnings about planned attacks by Palestinian militants. The Israeli military also extended a two-week lockdown on Palestinians travel within the West Bank and Gaza in what it states as a bid to prevent further attacks. http://www.lasvegassun.com/sunbin/stories/news/2003/oct/08/100807921.html Meanwhile, prime minister Ahmed Qurei is reported to have declined to form a government and told President Yasser Arafat he wants to quit his post.http://www.rte.ie/aertel/p113.htm* of Iraq: Twin attacks in Baghdad killed a Spanish diplomat (by gunshot) and, in the other, at least ten people following an attack on a police station in Baghdads main Shiite neighbourhood, exactly half a year since troops occupied the Iraqi city. http://www.kansas.com/mld/kansas/6969196.htm http://www.reuters.com/newsArticle.jhtml?typetopNews&storyID3584347* sex: A BBC report claims that the Roman Catholic Church is incorrectly claiming that condoms are ineffective to prevent the spread of AIDS for ideological reasons, and hence putting lives at risk in high-risk countries. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/health/3176982.stm http://www.guardian.co.uk/aids/story/0,7369,1059068,00.htmlOctober 10, 2003* Prize: Ebadi, Iranian human rights lawyer, is awarded the Peace Prize. http://www.nobel.se/peace/laureates/2003/press.html*In Iraq two more soldiers are killed and four wounded in an ambush in the Sadr district of Baghdad.  The troops are lured into the ambush by civilians in what could be a new tactic by hostile forces in Iraq. http://abcnews.go.com/sections/business/World/iraq031010.html* X-ray: The United States policy of detaining up to 600 people in Guantanamo Bay comes under fierce attack from the Cross and a group of American former judges, diplomats and military officers who are asking the Court of the United States to review the situation. The Red Cross criticises the policy of holding detainees without legal representation and in contravention of legal conventions; it reports a worrying deterioration in the mental health of detainees. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/3179858.stm* Canadian Census: NDP MP Blaikie accuses the Canadian federal government of contracting out the census to American manufacturer Martin, a charge Industry Minister Rock does not confirm or deny. Blaikie raises dire concerns of privacy. http://www.globeandmail.com/servlet/story/RTGAM.20031009.wlock1009/BNStory/National/* conflict: Israeli military officer states Palestinian militants are feared to be using a tunnel to smuggle missiles and portable missiles, though no tunnels had been found yet. The army states it is encountering strong resistance from Palestinians using dozens of homemade bombs, grenades and other grenades and automatic weapons. One Palestinian child and four adults killed in overnight attack on Rafah refugee camp in Gaza. http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1010/mideast.html* Sports  union: The Rugby World Cup, with 20 countries competing for the Webb Ellis Trophy over a seven week period, starts after a spectacular opening ceremony at the Telstra Stadium, Sydney, Australia, with Australia defeating Argentina 248 in the opening match. http://news.bbc.co.uk/sport1/hi/rugby_union/rugby_world_cup/3176038.stm* Royalty: Johan-Friso of the Netherlands, second son of Queen Beatrix and second in line of succession to the throne will lose his succession rights when he marries Mabel Wisse Smit without the Dutch Parliaments permission. Government assent was refused because the couple had been less than candid about the brides interactions with gangster Klaas Bruisma in the late 1980s. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/europe/3181514.stm* The flagship channel of the Adventist Television Network (ATN), Hope Channel is launchedOctober 11, 2003* conflict: Israeli troops pull back in Gaza. Israel will continue to demolish tunnels. The Israeli army states it discovers three tunnels in the camp, but no weapons have been found. A Palestinian teenager is shot dead and up to 10 homes were demolished and water and electricity facilities were hit. Palestinian militants were seeking to smuggle from Egypt shoulder-fired missiles that could be used against tanks, helicopters, and jets. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/middle_east/3183390.stm* species: President W. Bush proposes a change in States Fish and Wildlife Service regulations which would allow American citizens to travel abroad to capture, kill, and import species. The regulation would not allow Americans to do the same to endangered species inside the United States.http://seattletimes.nwsource.com/html/nationworld/2001763582_animals110.html* East: German magazine Spiegel reports that Israel is preparing an attack on Iranian atomic plants. http://www.spiegel.de/politik/ausland/0,1518,269355,00.html* East: Syria says that it will retaliate if attacked by Israel again. A week after Israels attack the two countries continue to exchange insults; the Security Council is unable to agree on a resolution condemning Israels attack. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3183788.stm* of Iraq: The Organisation of the Islamic Conference (OIC), a grouping of Muslim nations meeting in Malaysia, calls on the US to quit Iraq as soon as possible and to hand over to the UN; the OIC also pledges support to Syria. http://www.reuters.com/newsArticle.jhtml;jsessionidN1LZ2WG3FLI5KCRBAEKSFEY?typetopNews&storyID3597303* Japanese Politics: The House of Representatives of the of Japan is dissolved by the Prime Minister Junichiro and the election will take place on November 9, 2003. See general election, 2003 for more. http://www.japantimes.co.jp/cgi-bin/getarticle.pl5?nn20031011a1.htm* The Spanish rail company RENFE opens its second AVE high-speed line, serving Madrid, Guadalajara, Calatayud, Zaragoza, and Lleida. It is expected to reach Barcelona by 2005. (Another line is being built from Madrid to Valladolid, and others to Valencia and Lisbon are planned.)http://edition.cnn.com/2003/WORLD/europe/10/12/biz.trav.spain.train.ap/*During the ALCS, after a series of tense moments, Martnez of the Red Sox moved toward York Yankees pitcher Clemens resulting in a bench clearing brawl that included 74 year old Zimmer of the Yankees charging and being thrown to the ground by Martinez.October 12, 2003*Sports  Cricket: Zealand prevents India from snatching victory in the first cricket at Ahmedabad. http://news.bbc.co.uk/sport2/hi/cricket/3183880.stm*Syria: Relations between Syria and the United States fall to a low point as Syria criticizes the US for its failure to censure Israel. http://www.nytimes.com/2003/10/12/international/middleeast/12SYRI.html?th*The Peoples Republic of China confirms that it will launch its first space mission between October 15 and 17.  The spacecraft plans to orbit Earth 14 times before landing in an undisclosed location. (See 5) http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/asia-pacific/3180618.stmhttp://english.peopledaily.com.cn/200310/10/eng20031010_125762.shtml*Medicine: The operation to separate two-year old Egyptian twins joined at the head is going well in Dallas; the two boys have been separated and no troublesome complications have arisen. The next steps are to reconstruct the boys skulls including the skin. http://story.news.yahoo.com/news?tmplstory&cid514&e3&u/ap/20031012/ap_on_he_me/egyptian_twins*Asia: India, Thailand and the Peoples Republic of China press ahead with efforts and a study group aimed at creating a Trade Area. http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/cms.dll/xml/uncomp/articleshow?msid230379*2003 occupation of Iraq: A huge explosion occurs in the center of Baghdad, possibly caused by car bomb. A number of fatalities are reported. The blast takes place in Hotel. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3185014.stm* Oncology: Researchers announced that they have discovered the detailed relationship between the v12 gene, genes, and metastasis of cancer in fruit flies. http://www.newhavenregister.com/site/news.cfm?newsid10297208&BRD1281&PAG461&dept_id517515&rfi6* relations of Liberia: Liberia drops diplomatic relations with the of China (on Taiwan) and re-establishes ties with the Peoples Republic of China. This move was seen largely as a result of the PRCs lobbying in the UN, which is planning to deploy a peacekeeping force to Liberia. ROC Foreign Minister Eugene Chien offers to resign as a result.http://famulus.msnbc.com/FamulusIntl/reuters10-12-054050.asp?regPACRIMOctober 13, 2003* 2003 occupation of Iraq: New draft resolution being circulated at UN aims at getting international aid. The resolution sets a deadline for initial steps, if only for a transitional step, toward restoring Iraqi sovereignty, giving the Governing Council until December 15 to develop a timetable for writing a constitution and holding elections. The Bush administration proposes that the United Nations recognize the Iraqi Governing Council as a unit that will embody the sovereignty of Iraq until the country returns to self-rule. http://www.iht.com/articles/113570.html http://www.nytimes.com/2003/10/13/international/middleeast/13CND-NATI.html?ex1066708800&en32c2d9e8470660f5&ei5062&partnerGOOGLE* media: Limbaughs addiction revealed by housekeeper. Newsweek reports Limbaughs exposure as a pain-pill addict began when Wilma Cline (who had worked at Limbaugh from 1997 to July 2001) showed up at the Palm Beach County attorneys office late last year eager to sic the cops on her former boss. Cline had delivered enough pills to Limbaugh to kill an elephant, she stated to National Enquirer. http://www.msnbc.com/news/979355.asp?0qlc7p&cp11* conflict: Israeli incursion leaves 1,240 Palestinians homeless, UN agency finds. The Israeli demolition of shelters in Rafah camp on the southern Strip last week has left 1,240 people homeless, Nations relief workers state. http://www.un.org/apps/news/story.asp?NewsID8533&Crunrwa&Cr1* Ireland: The Taoiseach, Ahern, and the British Prime Minister, Blair, have begun talks in Downing Street on a possible restoration of devolved government in Ireland.http://www.rte.ie/aertel/p104.htm* 2003 occupation of Iraq: Three more US soldiers have been killed in separate incidents. http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,99861,00.html* Medicine-The conjoined twins do well after their first night apart.  They are in drug-induced comas, and will be for several more days, to aid their recovery. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3188734.stm* Science and publishing: The Library of Science commences publication of an open-access journal, PLoS Biology and its website is immediately overwhelmed by traffic. http://news.com.com/2100-1032-5091337.htmlOctober 14, 2003* Religion: RTs Prime Time current affairs programme reports that Daly, Bishop of Down and Conor, refused to accept allegations passed on to him by students of improper sexual conduct by Monsignor Ledwith, then head of Patricks College, Maynooth, Irelands major seminary. According to the programme Daly became aggressive, telling students go back and say your prayers. The TV programme confirms that Daly, and his predecessor, Cardinal  Fiaich, were centrally involved in efforts to silence critics of Ledwith, including forcing the resignation of one dean of students who informed them of allegations that Ledwith was making sexual advances against student priests. Ledwith subsequently left the college after paying damages to an under-age teenager to whom he allegedly made sexual advances.   Ledwith, once an internationally famous Catholic theologian tipped to become Catholic Archbishop of Dublin, is now associated with an American Age organization. Having been tracked down by the programme, Ledwith refuses to comment for legal reasons.* Liberia: The Inauguration of a new government takes place. The rebels are expected to disarm.* Sniper  Terrorism: Trial of Allen Muhammad, who is suspected of being the Washington DC serial sniper, begins. He pleads not guilty.http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/3189026.stm* Weapons: The BBC reports that dissident IRA groups are supplying the weapons that have led to a recent surge in UK gun crime. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/3189184.stm* Messaging: Microsoft chatrooms close today. Free unmoderated chatrooms outside the US are closed in what Microsoft claim is an attempt to safeguard children. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/technology/3189362.stm* conflict: Israel orders the expulsion of 15 Palestinian detainees from the West Bank to the Gaza Strip. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3189996.stm* British Politics: Conservative Party leader, Duncan Smith, is being investigated by Parliamentary Standards Commissioner Sir Mawer over allegations that he paid a secretarial salary to his wife without her doing sufficient work to warrant the payments. http://politics.guardian.co.uk/conservatives/story/0,9061,1062731,00.html* Law  A British HIV carrier is found guilty of causing grievous bodily harm after infecting two lovers. http://www.guardian.co.uk/aids/story/0,7369,1062772,00.html* Bartman incident  A Cubs fan, Steve Bartman intereferes with a foul ball leading to the Chicago Cubs losing to the Marlins in Game 6 of the 2003 League Baseball NLCS.October 15, 2003* 2003 occupation of Iraq: U.S. concessions to proposals from Russia, the Peoples Republic of China and Pakistan ensure their support for a Nations Security Council resolution to provide greater international legitimacy to the occupation force and the Interim Governing Council. The resolution draft, legitimizing US military and political control over Iraqs political future, was already supported by Kingdom, Spain, Cameroon, Bulgaria, Angola, Mexico, Chile and Guinea. Russia agrees to act as a mediator to achieve support for the compromise also from Germany and France.http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A32403-2003Oct15.htmlhttp://slate.msn.com/id/2089881/* conflict: Four people die in a bomb attack on a convoy of US diplomatic vehicles in the Strip. Palestinian Authority head Arafat calls the bombing dirty and shameful in an exclusive interview on BBC News. Secretary of State Powell urges Prime Minister Qurei in a telephone call to take action to put an end to violence and terrorism, according to a Palestinian official. http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1015/mideast.html http://www.reuters.com/newsArticle.jhtml;jsessionidLSUC5YQ5L5VGOCRBAEKSFEY?typetopNews&storyID3619857*exploration: China launches its first astronaut, Liwei into orbit aboard a Shenzhou spacecraft, 5. The 21-hour trip is planned to circle the planet 14 times.http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/asia-pacific/3192330.stmhttp://english.peopledaily.com.cn/200310/15/eng20031015_126043.shtml* 2003 occupation of Iraq: Japan offers  aid to Iraq in what could be the first tranche of a total of . http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/3193128.stm*The Court of the United States agreed to hear Grove Unified School District v. Newdow*Literature: The Irish-based Australian novelist Pierre (real name Peter Finlay) wins the 2003 prize with his first novel, God Little, a satire on a Texas high-school massacre. http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1015/booker.html*Religion: Anglican leaders from around the world meet in Palace in an attempt to avoid a schism on the issue of homosexuality in the clergy. The of Ireland Archbishop of Armagh, Eames says that the Communion is moving towards a consensus situation on the issue of homosexuality and the clergy at its meeting in Palace. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/3192728.stm http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/3192728.stm* relations  conflict: The United States vetoes a Nations Security Council resolution condemning the West Bank barrier. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3192762.stm*York City: A collision between the Island Ferry Andrew J. Barberi and a pier at the St. George ferry terminal on Staten Island has left at least ten people dead. http://www.cnn.com/2003/US/Northeast/10/15/ferry.accident/index.html*The Alliance and Conservative Party of Canada strike a deal to merge. The deal creating the Party of Canada must be ratified by each partys membership before December 12. http://www.cbc.ca/stories/2003/10/15/unitetheright031015*Azerbaijan: Presidential elections. http://www.cnn.com/WORLD/election.watch/europe/azerbaijan3.htmlOctober 16, 2003* of Iraq: The Security Council unanimously approves a new US resolution on Iraq. Russia, Germany and France back the resolution but will not provide troops or money. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3197688.stm.  A survey indicates poor morale amongst the US troops serving in Iraq. http://story.news.yahoo.com/news?tmplstory&cid578&ncid578&e4&u/nm/20031016/ts_nm/iraq_usa_morale_dc* Asia: President Bush re-affirms his intention to pressure China and Japan into fair policies re their exchange rates. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/3192108.stm.  Chinas trade surplus is shrinking as imports surge. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/3192982.stm At the same time India is wrestling with the implications of the sustained appreciation of the rupee against the dollar. http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/cms.dll/xml/uncomp/articleshow?msid237135* Catholicism: Tens of thousands of Catholics attend Mass celebrating the 25th anniversary of John Paul II in Rome.  The Pope will beatify Teresa on Sunday, October 19, and install 30 new Cardinals on Tuesday, October 21.  http://www.voanews.com/article.cfm?objectID26E5AB0D-518E-42BF-A4827FC71C32B705*Modified Foods: In a surprise move, Company announce their intention to quit the European cereal business. Citing lack of success, the company has decided to cut costs. http://www.guardian.co.uk/gmdebate/Story/0,2763,1064024,00.html*conflict: European Commissioner for External Relations, Patten has questioned Israels commitment to a two-states resolution to the conflict with the Palestinians. http://euobs.com/?aid13056&rk1*exploration: The Peoples Republic of Chinas first astronaut, Liwei returns to earth safely aboard a Shenzhou spacecraft, 5. During the 21-hour trip, he circled the planet 14 times. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/asia-pacific/3194892.stm*Apple launches its iTunes Music Store, an online download music store, for the Windows platform. The iTunes software can be downloaded from apple.com for free.October 17, 2003* Bolivia: Mesa is sworn in as the president of the country, after former president Snchez de Lozada was forced to resign as protests and strikes escalated in the Gas War.* US: A former employee of Diebold Election Systems (now Election Solutions) has accused the firm of violating state and federal election-certification rules during Georgias 2002 gubernatorial election, the outcome of which defied all polls. http://www.wired.com/news/print/0,1294,60563,00.html* of Iraq: Four US troops and at least two police officers are killed in an ambush in Karbala and another incident in Iraq.http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3199944.stm* security: In a challenge of airport security, box cutters turned up on Airlines planes in Orleans and Houston, prompting a search of all U.S. commercial aircraft (See Heatwole). http://www.cnn.com/2003/US/10/17/suspicious.baggage/* of the Peoples Republic of China: Peoples Republic of Chinas economy grows at 9% in the latest period, on course to become the largest economy in the world by 2050. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/3199772.stm* Sport  enhancing drugs: Several unnamed US athletes are reported to have tested positive for an steroid the athletes expected to be undetectable. http://news.bbc.co.uk/sport2/hi/athletics/3199132.stm* tallest structures: A 197 ft () spire is inserted on 101 in Taipei, Taiwan, unseating Malaysias Towers as the worlds tallest building. http://www.msnbc.com/news/981604.aspOctober 18, 2003* Asia  relations: Leaders of nations gather in Bangkok ahead of the 11th Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC) conference. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/3201744.stmhttp://interestalert.com/brand/siteia.shtml?Storyst/sn/10180000aaa07407.upi&Syssiteia&FidLATEBRKN&TypeNews&FilterLate%20Breaking http://www.nytimes.com/2003/10/18/international/asia/18CHIN.html?th President W. Bush arrives in Thailand ahead of an APEC summit of 21 Asia-Pacific government leaders which is likely to be dominated by discussions of the on Terrorism and trade friction between rich and poor nations (trade and currency).* East: New audio tapes, allegedly from bin Laden, air on the Jazeera network. http://www.reuters.com/newsArticle.jhtml;jsessionidKYCXOXMVLCADACRBAELCFEY?typetopNews&storyID3641017* of Iraq: Spains government, one of the staunchest supporters of the attack on Iraq, has pledged  over several years toward Iraqi reconstruction. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/3199684.stm* Petroleum: Zimbabwes state oil corporation is reported to have run out of fuel, aggravating the continuing acute fuel crisis. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/africa/3203836.stm* disaster: Officials declare a state of emergency due to severe flooding in Squamish, British Columbia. Parts of the town are evacuated. http://www.cbc.ca/stories/2003/10/18/squamish_031018* Canadian Prime Minister Chrtien, visiting Afghanistans President Karzai, is whisked out of Kabul owing to reports of a rocket attack. The reports turn out to be unfounded. http://www.cbc.ca/stories/2003/10/18/pm_kabul031018* Kosovo: First death of forced starvation in Europe for the last 50 years. Zhivorad Velikinac (age 65) from Urosevac died in hospital in Mitrovica after not eating for more than a month  he was disabled and not able to get out of his apartment on his own, his Albanian neighbours were threatened not to bring him food anymore, and other Serbs were too afraid to visit him.October 19, 2003* United Kingdom: A new biography, reported in The Sunday Times, claims that the prosecution of Wilde for sodomy was ordered by the then Liberal government, in a deal with the Marquess of Queensberry, the father of Alfred Douglas, to prevent his exposure of a homosexual relationship between another of his sons, Viscount Drumlanrig, and Prime Minister Lord Rosebery. According to reports, future prime minister Herbert Asquith played a key role in negotiating the deal, which led to the imprisonment of the Irish writer.* United Kingdom: Bruno leaves hospital in the UK where he has been undergoing treatment for depression. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/england/essex/3204772.stm* United Kingdom: Prime Minister Blair is rushed to hospital with heart problems. An irregular heart-beat is diagnosed. Blair is given a cardioversion in hospital, where he stays for four or five hours before going back to 10 Downing Street, and is ordered by his doctors to take 24 hours complete rest. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/3205888.stm* Catholicism: John Paul II beatifies Teresa. Hundreds of thousands attend the ceremony in Peters Square. Mother Teresa, who founded the of Charity, is now one step from sainthood. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/europe/3204362.stm* relations: Korea and the United States are reported to be discussing the possible withdrawal of thousands of US troops. http://story.news.yahoo.com/news?tmplstory&cid834&ncid731&e10&u/nm/20031019/wl_india_nm/india_132686* North Korea crisis: The United States says it is willing to give Korea security assurances in exchange for a nuclear standdown. U.S. President Bush rules out a treaty demanded by Pyongyang. http://www.voanews.com/article.cfm?objectID65A4C39E-E844-4D6E-9646832630BFDC94&titleBush%20Willing%20to%20Give%20North%20Korea%20Security%20Assurances%20in%20Exchange%20for%20Nuclear%20Standdown* Afghanistan: Bomb blows up a truck on a dirt road in Afghanistans eastern Province, killing four people, and two Afghan soldiers are killed in a separate mine explosion in the countrys south. The explosions come two days after the Taliban allegedly distributed pamphlets warning against working with the post-Taliban government of President Karzai. http://www.redding.com/news/aptop/stories/20031019aptop101.shtml* conflict: Palestinian gunmen attack an Israeli army foot patrol near a Bank village, kills three soldiers and wounds a fourth, rescue services and security sources state. Gunfire attacks near the Palestinian village of Yabrud, east of the town of Ramallah, not far from the settlement of Ofra. http://www.usatoday.com/news/world/2003-10-19-israel-attack_x.htm* of Iraq: A Fallujah roadside attack on a military convoy leaves an American armored car and truck burning wrecks. No one was reported killed. Iraqis nearby were reportedly cheering. Emerging series of threats. http://www.csmonitor.com/2003/1020/p01s04-woiq.htmlOctober 20, 2003* Canadian Prime Minister Chrtien indicates that during an informal meeting between him and Putin, the Russian president indicated that he was tentatively in favour of signing the Protocol. Russias signature is absolutely necessary for the protocol to acquire the force of law. http://www.canada.com/news/world/story.asp?id6C295231-46EB-48CF-A02B-1CCB901F2326* health in France: Cigarette prices in France go up by 20% today. Tobacconists (tobacco retailers) go on strike. http://www.cnn.com/2003/WORLD/europe/10/20/france.tobacco.reut/index.html* States deficit: The United States posts a record budget deficit of  in the year ending September 30. The figure broke the previous record of , set in 1992. The number was actually better than the U.S. governments own forecast of . http://money.cnn.com/2003/10/20/news/economy/budget.reut/* United States: The publicist of De Niro announces that the actor has prostate cancer. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/entertainment/3209434.stm* of Switzerland: Early results in Swiss elections show larger-than-predicted gains for the right-wing Peoples Party. http://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1020/switzerland.html* Archaeology  Art: An Italian archaeologist claims to have found a carved two-faced head over 200,000 years old. The carving is possible the work of erectus.http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/science/nature/3197402.stm* Exploration  The TMA-3 spacecraft docked with the Space Station bringing a new crew of three from Russia, the United States, and Spain. http://abcnews.go.com/wire/World/ap20031020_1017.html* Canada: A man survives a fall over Falls without any protective device. http://www.newsday.com/news/local/wire/ny-bc-ny--niagarafalls-surv1021oct21,0,262360.story?collny-ap-regional-wireOctober 21, 2003* on Terrorism: US officials state that they believe Street Journal reporter Pearl was killed by Sheikh Mohammed. http://www.cnn.com/2003/US/10/21/pearl.mohammed/* Sea: Scientists call for a total ban on fishing for cod in the North Sea to allow stocks to recover from near extinction. http://www.news.scotsman.com/latest.cfm?id2072259* Musician Smith was possibly murdered or committed suicide at the age of 34.* Afghanistan: The commander of UN forces in Afghanistan warns that the security of Kabul is at risk if security is not achieved in the Afghan countryside. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/south_asia/3211928.stm* of Iraq: Rights Watch (HRW) accuses US troops of using excessive force against civilians in Iraq. http://www.abc.net.au/news/newsitems/s972113.htm* Irans Supreme Council agrees to comply with the Atomic Energy Agency, allow inspections of its nuclear facilities, and suspend its uranium enrichment program. http://www.reuters.co.uk/newsPackageArticle.jhtml?typeworldNews&storyID391666&sectionnewshttp://www.cnn.com/2003/WORLD/meast/10/21/iran.nuclear/http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3211112.stm* Africa: Outbreaks of locusts are reported in Mauritania, Niger and Sudan and might spread to other areas of Africa. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/africa/3210464.stm* Ireland: In a series of moves designed to bring about final implementation of the Friday Agreement, the Government confirms that elections to the regions administration will be held on November 26. The IRA announces a further act of weapons decommissioning. Fin leader Adams declares the end to physical force republicanism. Statements from all the major parties involved are expected over the course of the day.http://politics.guardian.co.uk/northernirelandassembly/story/0,9061,1067604,00.htmlhttp://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/northern_ireland/3210160.stmhttp://www.rte.ie/news/2003/1021/north.html* conflict: The General Assembly approves a resolution demanding that Israel remove a security fence in the Bank.  The resolution passes by an overwhelming majority of 144 to 4 with the US voting against the motion. http://abcnews.go.com/wire/World/ap20031022_128.htmlhttp://www.nytimes.com/2003/10/22/international/middleeast/22NATI.html?th* and Labrador general election, 2003: The Tories of Danny Williams defeat the incumbent Liberals under Premier Grimes, taking more than two-thirds of the seats in the House of Assembly. http://www.cbc.ca/stories/2003/10/21/nfldelexn031021* Ecuador  A trial opens in Lago Agrio in which US oil company ChevronTexaco is charged with polluting a once-pristine swath of the Amazon rainforest. The plaintiffs lawyers have put a  price tag on clean up and medical care for the regions inhabitants.http://www.bayarea.com/mld/mercurynews/news/local/7097388.htmOctober 22, 2003* India: India launches a peace initiative to normalise relations with Pakistan.  Formal talks are conditional on Islamabad ending Kashmiri cross-border terrorism initiatives. http://jang.com.pk/thenews/oct2003-daily/23-10-2003/main/main1.htm* bin Mohamad, outgoing minister of Malaysia, accuses leading democratic nations of terrorising the world.  He seemed to be referring to the US, Israel, and Australia. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/asia-pacific/3204001.stm* of Iraq: The commander of US ground forces in Iraq says that Al-Qaeda is now operating in Iraq as witnessed by increasingly sophisticated attacks on US troops. http://story.news.yahoo.com/news?tmplstory&cid578&ncid578&e7&u/nm/20031022/ts_nm/iraq_dc* Union and Guantanamo Bay:  Leaders of the European Union parliament urge the EU to take action over 26 Europeans being held indefinitely by the US without charges, without trial, without legal representation at Guantanamo Bay. The detainees are experiencing increasing psychological problems. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/3205055.stm* Rights Watch (HRW) releases a report about mentally ill inmates of United States prisons. It concludes that mentally ill offenders are frequently physically abused, punished by staff for self-destructive behavior and not given the treatment they need. http://www.hrw.org/press/2003/10/us102203.htm* Afghanistan: The commander of NATO forces in Afghanistan says that his troops are increasingly facing a new excellently trained species of terrorist. http://abcnews.go.com/wire/World/ap20031022_158.html* Sport  Performance enhancing drugs:  Top British runner Chambers tests positive for the drug tetrahydrogestrinone (THG). The steroid was previously believed to be undetectable but an anonymous source provided a used syringe containing traces last week. http://news.bbc.co.uk/sport2/hi/athletics/3203005.stm* of Japan: A popular politician Makiko resigns as a member of the Liberal Democratic Party. Her membership has been suspended since last year. http://www.japantimes.co.jp/cgi-bin/getarticle.pl5?nn20031023a1.htm* Racing League: Racecar driver Tony Renna is killed in a crash during a test drive at the Motor Speedway. http://www.voanews.com/article.cfm?objectIDC2103395-30C9-4B08-B5DB5CCCEDB69F10October 23, 2003*A. Ferr, the third Democratically Elected of Puerto Rico, dies at age 99.*Canada: McGuinty is sworn in as the 24th premier of Ontario. http://www.cbc.ca/stories/2003/10/23/dalton031023*of Iraq: There is every sign that the international conference in Madrid at which pledges to re-build Iraq are hoped for will disappoint and e.g. Bremer seeks to lower expectations. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/europe/3208647.stmhttp://www.arabnews.com/?page6&section0&article34106&d24&m10&y2003&pixbusiness.jpg&categoryBusiness%22*United States Supreme Court:  Before a conservative legal organization, Supreme Court Justice Scalia ridicules the recent Supreme Court decision overturning anti-sodomy laws in Texas, saying that the Court had  held to be a constitutional right what had been a criminal offense at the time of the founding and for nearly 200 years thereafter.  According to news reports, Scalia adopted a mocking tone to read from the courts ruling. http://story.news.yahoo.com/news?tmplstory&u/ap/20031024/ap_on_go_su_co/scotus_scalia_2*Kuwait AL Arabi football club beat Qadsia in the Kuwait derby 20.October 24, 2003* Mining: 49 miners are trapped in a Russian mine as water began seeping into the mine, disabling electrical systems http://www.news.com.au/common/story_page/0,4057,7654094%255E1702,00.html.* conflict: The body of the Hamas militant killed in the attack on an Israeli military camp (that killed three Israeli soldiers) is returned to his family in their refugee camp. http://interestalert.com/brand/siteia.shtml?Storyst/sn/10240000aaa00601.upi&Syssiteia&FidLATEBRKN&TypeNews&FilterLate%20Breaking* invasion of Iraq: The US Senate Committee on Intelligence finalizes its report on pre-war intelligence and is highly critical of Tenet and the quality of US intelligence about Iraqs weapons. http://www.arabnews.com/?page4&section0&article34114&d25&m10&y2003&pixworld.jpg&categoryWorld%22* weather: Earth is hit by a solar storm, disrupting some communications but not power transmission grids as was predicted. Canada, the northern US northern Europe were treated to an exceptional display of borealis. http://www.space.com/scienceastronomy/solar_storm_031023.htmlhttp://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/science/nature/3210901.stmhttp://www.cnn.com/2003/TECH/space/10/24/solar.forecast/index.html* Aircraft: The final flights of Concorde, from New York, Edinburgh, and a loop around the Bay of Biscay, touch down at International Airport around 1600 BST, marking the end of 27 years of commercial supersonic flight. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/uk/3211053.stm* marriage: Three same-sex couples in Spain, including a Madrid city councilman, apply for marriage licenses. They state that if the registry judge does not grant them the licenses, they will appeal to Spains constitutional court, and as far as the Court of Human Rights if necessary. They describe their actions as inspired by the recent rulings on same-sex marriage in Canada. http://www.advocate.com/new_news.asp?ID10276&sd10/23/03October 25, 2003* The Indian philosopher and Hindu revivalist Shastri Athavale dies at the age of 83.* Israel: Israel publishes map of fence. http://www.news.com.au/common/story_page/0,4057,7665376%255E1702,00.html*Series: Baseball: The Marlins defeat the York Yankees, four games to two, to win the World Series. http://sportsillustrated.cnn.com/baseball/mlb/boxscores/2003/10/25/6088_boxscore.html* of Iraq: A US Blackhawk helicopter is brought down near Tikrit by Iraqi militants. The Daily Star Lebanon reports that the US is effectively plundering Iraq following the occupation. http://www.dailystar.com.lb/opinion/25_10_03_e1.asp The daily average of attacks on US troops rises and reaches about 2526 per day. http://www.thestate.com/mld/thestate/news/world/7101172.htm 100,000 march against the occupation of Iraq in Washington DC. http://www.iacenter.org/o25-media1.htm* United Kingdom: Tony Blair amazes his advisers and ignores public opinion by insisting that the UK will press ahead with technology. http://news.independent.co.uk/uk/environment/story.jsp?story457297* saving time: Many countries in the Hemisphere will end saving time in the night from October 25 to October 26. In the Hemisphere daylight saving time will start only in the Australian states of South Wales, Australia, and Victoria.* French pop star Alizee Jacotey performs her hit single A Contre-Courant live on Dans La LumiereOctober 26, 2003* California: Wildfires start to rage in California. The scheduled NFL Night Football game between the Diego Chargers and Dolphins is relocated from San Diego, California, to Tempe, Arizona, as a consequence of the fires. http://abcnews.go.com/wire/US/ap20031026_1295.html* of Iraq: The Hotel in Baghdad where US deputy defense secretary Wolfowitz was staying has been evacuated after several rockets were fired at it in the morning. one US Colonel was killed and fifteen individuals wounded (three seriously) in the attack. http://story.news.yahoo.com/news?tmplstory&u/ap/20031026/ap_on_re_mi_ea/iraq_hotel_attacked&cid540&ncid716http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3214901.stm.  Two more explosions occurred near Al Rashid hotel later towards the evening. Further investigations confirm that Iraq had no active nuclear program, but did not relinquish nuclear ambitions or technical records. http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A17707-2003Oct25.html http://www.macon.com/mld/macon/news/7105826.htm* Syria: The President of Syria says that Iran and Syria, which are increasingly close allies, are capable of neutralizing conspiracies of foreign powers (implicitly referring to the US and Israel). http://www.tehrantimes.com/Description.asp?Da10/26/03&Cat2&Num7* Russia: Khodorkovsky, the countrys wealthiest businessman, has been arrested and is being held in Moscow facing charges of fraud and tax evasion. http://www.themoscowtimes.com/stories/2003/10/27/001.htmlOctober 27, 2003* of Iraq: More than 40 people are killed and over 200 are injured in a wave of coordinated bomb attacks on the Cross compound and several local police stations in Baghdad. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3216539.stm. W. Bush states that the bombings are a sign of desperation by the insurgents. http://www.ajc.com/news/content/news/ap/ap_story.html/Intl/AP.V7797.AP-Iraq-US-Militar.html* funds:  U.S. fund group Investments fires four fund managers as scandals about improper and/or fraudulent dealings reach the mutual fund industry. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/3212941.stm* of Japan: Former Prime Ministers Kiichi and Yasuhiro announce that they are going to retire.* Territories general election, 2003: The writ is dropped for the 19 electoral districts of the Territories to elect members to the 15th session of the government.October 28, 2003* Economics: The United States Reserve leaves its key rate unchanged at todays meeting, saying that rates will be kept low for a considerable period. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/3222071.stm* system: The sun emits another mass ejection directly toward the Earth, the third largest flare on record.  The effects are projected to affect Earth on the 29th. http://www.spaceweather.com/http://www.cnn.com/2003/TECH/space/10/28/solar.flare/index.html* California: Wildfires are largest in state history; 1,500 homes are destroyed, 16 people killed and  burned. Evacuations are ordered from parts of cities in Los Angeles and San Diego counties. http://www.cnn.com/2003/US/West/10/28/california.wildfire/index.html The conflagration also spreads across the border into the Mexican state of California, where two deaths are reported.* United Kingdom: The Conservative Partys Committee announces that leader Duncan Smith will face an immediate vote of confidence in his leadership on the following day, after at least 25 backbenchers formally request it. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/politics/3221105.stm* Japan  politics: The campaign for general election, 2003 starts, lasting until a voting date, Nov 9. http://www.japantimes.co.jp/cgi-bin/getarticle.pl5?nn20031029a1.htmOctober 29, 2003* Medicine: The US FDA approves Risperdal Consta (Risperidone long-acting injection) for the treatment of schizophrenia. Although already approved in several other countries, it is the first long-acting, antipsychotic medication to be approved by the FDA.* of Ireland: The Sochna, the Irish police force, opens a criminal investigation following a hoax telephone call on 27 October from a woman claiming that she had abandoned her newborn baby in a derelict flat in Dublin. Hundreds of Garda had mounted a round the clock search of thousands of derelict sites in the working class suburb of Ballymun to find the child, as fears grew for its safety amid plummeting temperatures. Police later concluded that no such child existed and that the series of phone calls made to them and to childcare charities had been a deliberate hoax.* United Kingdom: British Conservative Party leader Duncan Smith loses a of confidence in his parliamentary party by 90 votes to 75 and, in accordance with party rules, resigns from the leadership. A new leadership election is called. Shadow Deputy Prime Minister David Davis, previously tipped as a future leader, surprises Westminster by announcing that he will not seek the leadership and endorses former Secretary Howard, who is now seen as the frontrunner to assume the leadership. Other leading politicians endorse Howard, once famously described by a colleague as having something of the night about him. http://www.reuters.com/newsArticle.jhtml?typeworldNews&storyID3717328 http://interestalert.com/brand/siteia.shtml?Storyst/sn/10290004aaa01957.upi&Syssiteia&FidLATEBRKN&TypeNews&FilterLate%20Breaking* of Iraq: The International Cross announces that it is to scale back its commitments to Iraq. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3224723.stm  Two more GIs are killed, bringing the total killed since May 1 to 115. http://abcnews.go.com/wire/World/ap20031029_421.html* magnetic field: The Earths magnetosphere is hit by the recent flare causing a brief but intense storm, provoking unusual displays of Northern Lights. http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2003/10/23/tech/main579650.shtmlOctober 30, 2003*A plastic gun, used as part of a Halloween costume, sparks a two-hour-long terrorism scare at the Capitol in D.C. http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,101712,00.html*Economics: The States Department of Commerce reports that U.S. domestic product grew at an annual rate of 7.2% in the third quarter, the fastest growth rate since 1984. http://money.cnn.com/2003/10/30/news/economy/gdp/index.htm* Russia: Putin removes his Chief of Staff as the political battle with the Russian oligarchs and between hard-liners and liberals, continues. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/europe/3229107.stmhttp://www.nytimes.com/2003/10/30/international/europe/30RUSS.html?th Russian judicial authorities have seized control of Yukos, the giant oil company. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3221079.stm* War: Officials postpone awarding two contracts to repair Iraqs oil refineries and pipelines (primarily because of sabotage and dilapidated conditions). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A38036-2003Oct29.html An investigation has been started on the high price that the United States is paying to Kellogg Brown & Root for oil imported from Kuwait. http://nu.nl/news.jsp?n225670&c20. The for Public Integrity says that firms awarded contracts in Iraq have tended to be big donors (in the past) to the Republican Party. http://www.newsday.com/news/nationworld/world/wire/sns-ap-iraq-contracts,0,5572269.story?collsns-ap-world-headlines The UN announces that it is withdrawing its remaining international staff from Baghdad, perhaps temporarily. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3227751.stm* Malaysia: After 22 years in power, Prime Minister bin Mohamad retires. He is succeeded by Dato Seri Ahmad Badawi http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/asia-pacific/3226343.stm* Israel: Israel is to train pigs to do guard work in Israeli settlements. The pigs have a better sense of smell than dogs and can be trained to walk towards perceived threats (e.g. explosives). http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3221079.stmOctober 31, 2003* Japan: The trial of Asahara, accused of involvement in the 1995 sarin gas attack on the Tokyo subway, ends in Japan with final statements from lawyers.  The next court session is to be held in mid-February 2004. http://www.lasvegassun.com/sunbin/stories/w-asia/2003/oct/31/103107417.html* Japanese supercentenarian Hongo dies from pneumonia.* Russia: The furor surrounding Yukos deepens with an outspoken statement from the Russian Minister expressing deep concern about the freezing of Yukos shares. http://www.iht.com/articles/115997.html* United Kingdom: Clarke has ruled himself out of the contest to lead the Conservative Party and the field is left potentially clear for Howard to be elected unopposed. http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/politics/3229367.stm* Surfer Hamiltons arm is bitten off by a shark.20032003de 2003200310200320032003200320032003.. 2546zh:200310
6704
Christendom
Christendom,( or the Christian world,(Marty, Martin E. The Christian World: A Global History. Modern Library chronicles, 29. New York: Modern Library, 2007.) has several meanings. In a cultural sense it refers to the worldwide community of Christians, adherents of Christianity. In a historical or geopolitical sense the term usually refers collectively to majority countries or countries in which Christianity dominates(See Merriam-Webster.com : dictionary, Christendom) or was a territorial phenomenon.Terminology and usageThe term Christendom is developed from the Latin word Christianus. The Christian world is also known collectively as the Corpus Christianum. The Latin term Corpus Christianum is often translated as the Christian body, meaning the community of all Christians. The Christian polity, embodying a less secular meaning, can be compatible with the idea of both a religious and a temporal body: Corpus Christianum. The Corpus Christianum can be seen as a Christian equivalent of the Muslim Ummah. The of God is also frequently used, denoting that the Christian world is within (or among) people.(Kingdom is within: The kingdom of God does not come with observation; nor will they say, See here! or See there! For indeed, the kingdom of God is within among you. )Christendom is used in this article to denote the global community of Biblical Christianity. Christendom as such is set on the appellation of religious aspects. However, the word is also used with its other meaning to frame-true Christianity. A more secular meaning can denote that the term Christendom refers to Christians considered as a group, the Political Christian World, as an informal hegemony that Christianity has traditionally enjoyed in the West.HistoryEarly ChristendomImage:T and O map Guntherus Ziner 1472.jpg|thumb|This map, which abstracts the then known world to a cross inscribed within an orb, remakes geography in the service of Christian iconography. More detailed versions place Jerusalem at the center of the world.In the beginning of Christendom, early Christianity was a religion spread in the Greek/Roman world and beyond as a 1st century Jewish sect,(; ; ; ; ; ; ; Tacitus, Annales xv 44; Josephus Antiquities xviii 3; Mortimer Chambers, The Western Experience Volume II chapter 5; The Oxford Dictionary of the Jewish Religion page 158.) which historians refer to as Christianity. It may be divided into two distinct phases: the apostolic period, when the first apostles were alive and organising the Church, and the period, when an early episcopal structure developed, whereby bishoprics were governed by bishops (overseers).The post-apostolic period concerns the time roughly after the death of the apostles when bishops emerged as overseers of urban Christian populations. The earliest recorded use of the terms Christianity (Greek ) and Catholic (Greek ), dates to this period, the 2nd century, attributed to of Antioch c. 107.(Walter Bauer, Greek-English Lexicon; of Antioch Letter to the Magnesians 10, Letter to the Romans (Roberts-Donaldson tr., Lightfoot tr., Greek text). However, an edition presented on some websites, one that otherwise corresponds exactly with the Roberts-Donaldson translation, renders this passage to the interpolated inauthentic longer recension of Ignatiuss letters, which does not contain the word Christianity.) Early Christendom would close at the end of imperial persecution of Christians after the ascension of the Great and the of Milan in AD 313 and the Council of Nicaea in 325.Middle Christendom      Christendom has referred to the medieval and renaissance notion of the Christian world as a sociopolitical polity. In essence, the earliest vision of Christendom was a vision of a Christian theocracy, a government founded upon and upholding values, whose institutions are spread through and over with doctrine. In this period, members of the Christian clergy wield authority. The specific relationship between the leaders and the clergy varied but, in theory, the national and political divisions were at times subsumed under the leadership of the church as an institution. This model of church-state relations was accepted by various Church leaders and political leaders in European history.(Chisholm, H. (1910). The Encyclopedia Britannica: A dictionary of arts, sciences, literature and general information. New York: The Encyclopedia Britannica Co. Pg. 700.) The christian empire was founded in 750 AD in Rome this was called the unity of brotherhood. The christian empire was the largest empire in the world. This empire streched from the coast of Portugal to India.     File:Nicaea icon.jpg|thumb|Icon depicting the Emperor Constantine and the bishops of the Council of Nicaea (325) holding the NicenoConstantinopolitan Creed of 381.     The Church gradually became a defining institution of the Empire.(The church in the Roman empire before A.D. 170, Part 170 By Sir William Mitchell Ramsay) Constantine issued the of Milan in 313 proclaiming toleration for the Christian religion, and convoked the Council of Nicaea in 325 whose Creed included belief in one holy catholic and apostolic Church. Christianity became the state religion of the Empire in 392 when Theodosius I prohibited the practice of pagan religions with the of Thessalonica.(Boyd, William Kenneth (1905). The ecclesiastical edicts of the Theodosian code, Columbia University Press.)     As the Roman Empire disintegrated into feudal kingdoms and principalities, the concept of Christendom changed as the western church became independent of the Emperor and the Christians of the Roman Empire. The Empire was the last bastion of Christendom.(The art of war in world history: from antiquity to the nuclear age By Grard Chaliand. Page 25) Christendom would take a turn with the rise of the Franks, a Germanic tribe who converted to the Christian faith and entered into with Rome. On Christmas Day 800 AD, Leo III made the fateful decision to switch his allegiance from the emperors in Constantinople and crowned Charlemagne,(West, W. M. (1904). The ancient world from the earliest times to 800 A.D. Boston: Allyn and Bacon. Pg. 551+) the king of the Franks, as the Emperor of what came to be known as the Roman Empire. The Empire created a definition of Christendom in juxtaposition with the Byzantine Empire, that of a distributed versus centralized culture respectively.(The rise of Western Christendom: triumph and diversity, A.D. 200-1000: Parts 200-1000. Page 443) After the of Charlemagnes empire, the southern remnants of the Holy Roman Empire became a collection of states loosely connected to the Holy See of Rome. Tensions between Innocent III and secular rulers ran high, as the pontiff exerted control over their temporal counterparts in the west and vice versa. The pontificate of Innocent III is considered the height of temporal power of the papacy. The Corpus Christianum described the then current notion of the community of all Christians united under the Catholic Church. The community was to be guided by Christian values in its politics, economics and social life.(Shaping a global theological mind By Darren C. Marks. Page 45) Its legal basis was the corpus iuris canonica (body of canon law).(Somerville, R. (1998). Prefaces to Canon Law books in Latin Christianity: Selected translations, 500-1245 ; commentary and translations. New Haven u.a.: Yale Univ. Press)(VanDeWiel, C. (1991). History of canon law. Leuven: Peeters Press.)(Canon law and the Christian community By Clarence Gallagher. Gregorian & Biblical BookShop, 1978.)(Catholic Church., Canon Law Society of America., Catholic Church., & Libreria editrice vaticana. (1998). Code of canon law, Latin-English edition: New English translation. Washington, DC: Canon Law Society of America.) In the East, Christendom became more defined as the Empires gradual loss of territory to an expanding Islam and the conquest of Persia. This caused Christianity to become important to the Byzantine identity. After the Schism which divided the Church religiously, there had been the notion of a universal Christendom that included the East and the West. The Byzantines divided themselves in the rite of the Orthodox Church and the eastern rite of the Church. The political reunion with the west, after the East-West schism, was put asunder by the Crusade when Crusaders conquered the Byzantine capital of Constantinople and hastened the of the Byzantine Empire on the path to its destruction.(Mango, C. (2002). The Oxford history of Byzantium. Oxford: Oxford University Press.)(Angold, M. (1997). The Byzantine Empire, 1025-1204: A political history. New York: Longman.)(Schevill, F. (1922). The history of the Balkan Peninsula: From the earliest times to the present day. New York: Harcourt, Brace and Co. Pg. 124.) With the breakup of the Byzantine Empire into individual nations with nationalist Orthodox Churches, the term Christendom described Western Europe, Catholicism, Orthodox Byzantines, and other Eastern rites of the Church.(Schaff, P. (1878). The creeds of Christendom: With a history and critical notes. New York: Harper.)(The Catholic encyclopedia. Page 699+)Late ChristendomThe Churchs peak of authority over all European Christians and their common endeavours of the Christian community  for example, the Crusades, the fight against the Moors in the Peninsula and against the Ottomans in the Balkans  helped to develop a sense of communal identity against the obstacle of Europes deep political divisions. But this authority was also sometimes abused, and fostered the Inquisition and anti-Jewish pogroms, to root out divergent elements and create a religiously uniform community. Ultimately, the Inquisition was done away with by order of the Pope III.(Catholic Encyclopedia. Inquisition.)File:Grand schisme 1378-1417.svg|thumb|right|Historical map of the Schism: red is support for Avignon, blue for RomeChristendom ultimately was led into specific crisis in the Middle Ages, when the kings of France managed to establish a French national church during the 14th century and the papacy became ever more aligned with the Roman Empire of the German Nation. Known as the Schism, western Christendom was a split between three men, who were driven by politics rather than any real theological disagreement for simultaneously claiming to be the true pope. The Papacy developed a reputation of corruption that estranged major parts of Western Christendom. The Avignon schism was ended by the of Constance.(Stump, P. H. (1994). The reforms of the Council of Constance, 1414-1418. Leiden: E.J. Brill)Before the modern period, Christendom was in a general crisis at the time of the Renaissance Popes because of the moral laxity of these pontiffs and their willingness to seek and rely on temporal power as secular rulers did. Many in the Catholic Churchs hierarchy in the Renaissance became increasingly entangled with insatiable greed for material wealth and temporal power, which led to many reform movements, some merely wanting a moral reformation of the Churchs clergy, while others repudiated the Church and separated from it in order to form new sects. The Renaissance produced ideas or institutions by which men living in society could be held together in harmony. In the early 16th century, Castiglione (The of the Courtier) laid out his vision of the ideal gentleman and lady, while Machiavelli cast a jaundiced eye on la verita effetuale delle cose  the actual truth of things  in Prince, composed, humanist style, chiefly of parallel ancient and modern examples of Virt. Some Protestant movements grew up along lines of mysticism or humanism (cf. Erasmus). The Catholic Church fell into general neglect under the Renaissance Popes, whose inability to govern the Church properly set the climate for what would ultimately become the Protestant Reformation.(The Cambridge Modern History. Vol 2: The Reformation (1903).)The Reformation and the ensuing rise of independent states caused the term Christendom to take on a new, more general, meaning in Western Europe, signifying countries which were predominantly Christian (Regardless of whether they were Catholic or Protestant) as opposed to Islamic or pagan countries. Catholics at the time advocated Christendoms restoration and argued that, with the fragmented nature of Protestantisms many denominations, Christendom could only apply to the civilization of Catholic nations that espoused the doctrine of the Social Reign of the King, and which recognised the Catholic Church. The Catholic nations did represent a large portion of European Christians and the Corpus Christianum initially was composed of the Christian community of these nations, rather than all Christians worldwide.Developments in western philosophy and European events brought change to the notion of the Corpus Christianum. The Years War accelerated the process of transforming France from a feudal monarchy to a centralized state. The rise of strong, centralized monarchies(This was presaging the modern nation-state) denoted the European transition from feudalism to capitalism. By the end of the Hundred Years War, both France and England were able to raise enough money through taxation to create independent standing armies. In the of the Roses, Henry Tudor took the crown of England. His heir, the absolute king Henry VIII establishing the English church.(The Anglican Domain: Church History)Classical cultureArt and literatureWritings and poetryliterature is writing that deals with Christian themes and incorporates the Christian world view. This constitutes a huge body of extremely varied writing. poetry is any poetry that contains Christian teachings, themes, or references. The influence of Christianity on poetry has been great in any area that Christianity has taken hold. Christian poems often directly reference the Bible, while others provide allegory.Supplemental artsart is art produced in an attempt to illustrate, supplement and portray in tangible form the principles of Christianity. Virtually all Christian groupings use or have used art to some extent. The prominence of art and the media, style, and representations change; however, the unifying theme is ultimately the representation of the life and times of Jesus and in some cases the Testament. Depictions of saints are also common, especially in Anglicanism, Catholicism, and Eastern Orthodoxy.IlluminationFile:Codex Bruchsal 1 01v cropped.jpg|thumb|Picture of in Majesty contained in an illuminated manuscript.An manuscript is a manuscript in which the text is supplemented by the addition of decoration. The earliest surviving substantive illuminated manuscripts are from the period AD 400 to 600, primarily produced in Ireland, Constantinople and Italy. The majority of surviving manuscripts are from the Ages, although many illuminated manuscripts survive from the 15th century Renaissance, along with a very limited number from Antiquity.Most illuminated manuscripts were created as codices, which had superseded scrolls; some isolated single sheets survive. A very few illuminated manuscript fragments survive on papyrus. Most medieval manuscripts, illuminated or not, were written on parchment (most commonly of calf, sheep, or goat skin), but most manuscripts important enough to illuminate were written on the best quality of parchment, called vellum, traditionally made of unsplit calfskin, though high quality parchment from other skins was also called parchment.IconographyImage:St. Theodor.jpg|thumb|There are few old ceramic icons, such as this Theodor icon which dates to ca. 900 (from Preslav, Bulgaria).Christian art began, about two centuries after Christ, by borrowing motifs from Roman Imperial imagery, classical Greek and Roman religion and popular art. images are used to some extent by the Abrahamic Christian faith, and often contain highly complex iconography, which reflects centuries of accumulated tradition. In the Antique period iconography began to be standardised, and to relate more closely to Biblical texts, although many gaps in the Gospel narratives were plugged with matter from the apocryphal gospels. Eventually the Church would succeed in weeding most of these out, but some remain, like the ox and ass in the Nativity of Christ.An icon is a religious work of art, most commonly a painting, from Eastern Orthodox Christianity or one of the Eastern Rites of the Catholic Church. Christianity has used symbolism from its very beginnings.(Catholic Encyclopedia, article Symbolism) In both East and West, numerous iconic types of Christ, Mary and saints and other subjects were developed; the number of named types of icons of Mary, with or without the infant Christ, was especially large in the East, whereas Pantocrator was much the commonest image of Christ.symbolism invests objects or actions with an inner meaning expressing Christian ideas. Christianity has borrowed from the common stock of significant symbols known to most periods and to all regions of the world. symbolism is effective when it appeals to both the intellect and the emotions. Especially important depictions of Mary include the Hodegetria and Panagia types. Traditional models evolved for narrative paintings, including large cycles covering the events of the Life of Christ, the of the Virgin, parts of the Old Testament, and, increasingly, the lives of popular saints. Especially in the West, a system of attributes developed for identifying individual figures of saints by a standard appearance and symbolic objects held by them; in the East they were more likely to identified by text labels.Each saint has a story and a reason why he or she led an exemplary life. Symbols have been used to tell these stories throughout the history of the Church. A number of Christian saints are traditionally represented by a symbol or iconic motif associated with their life, termed an attribute or emblem, in order to identify them. The study of these forms part of iconography in history. They were particularlyArchitecturethumb|The structure of a typical Gothic cathedral.architecture encompasses a wide range of both secular and religious styles from the foundation of Christianity to the present day, influencing the design and construction of buildings and structures in Christian culture.Buildings were at first adapted from those originally intended for other purposes but, with the rise of distinctively ecclesiastical architecture, church buildings came to influence secular ones which have often imitated religious architecture. In the 20th century, the use of new materials, such as concrete, as well as simpler styles has had its effect upon the design of churches and arguably the flow of influence has been reversed. From the birth of Christianity to the present, the most significant period of transformation for Christian architecture in the west was the Gothic cathedral. In the east, architecture was a continuation of architecture. Philosophy philosophy is a term to describe the fusion of various fields of philosophy with the theological doctrines of Christianity. Scholasticism, which means that which belongs to the school, and was a method of learning taught by the academics (or school people) of medieval universities c. 11001500. Scholasticism originally started to reconcile the philosophy of the ancient classical philosophers with medieval Christian theology. Scholasticism is not a philosophy or theology in itself but a tool and method for learning which places emphasis on reasoning.Christian civilizationImage:God the Geometer.jpg|thumb|Science, and particularly geometry and astronomy, was linked directly to the divine for most medieval scholars. Since God created the universe after geometric and harmonic principles, to seek these principles was therefore to seek and worship God. Medieval conditions The Empire, which was the most sophisticated culture during antiquity, suffered under conquests limiting its scientific prowess during the Medieval period. Christian Europe had suffered a catastrophic loss of knowledge following the fall of the Roman Empire. But thanks to the Church scholars such as Aquinas and Buridan, the West carried on at least the spirit of scientific inquiry which would later lead to Europes taking the lead in science during the Revolution using translations of medieval works.technology refers to the technology used in medieval Europe under Christian rule. After the of the 12th century, medieval Europe saw a radical change in the rate of new inventions, innovations in the ways of managing traditional means of production, and economic growth.(Alfred Crosby described some of this technological revolution in his The Measure of Reality : Quantification in Western Europe, 12501600 and other major historians of technology have also noted it.) The period saw major technological advances, including the adoption of gunpowder and the astrolabe, the invention of spectacles, and greatly improved mills, building techniques, agriculture in general, clocks, and ships. The latter advances made possible the dawn of the of Exploration. The development of water mills was impressive, and extended from agriculture to sawmills both for timber and stone, probably derived from technology. By the time of the Book, most large villages in Britain had mills. They also were widely used in mining, as described by Agricola in Re Metallica for raising ore from shafts, crushing ore, and even powering bellows.Significant in this respect were advances within the fields of navigation. The compass and astrolabe along with advances in shipbuilding, enabled the navigation of the World Oceans and thus domination of the worlds economic trade. Gutenbergs press made possible a dissemination of knowledge to a wider population, that would not only lead to a gradually more egalitarian society, but one more able to dominate other cultures, drawing from a vast reserve of knowledge and experience. Renaissance innovationsDuring the Renaissance, great advances occurred in geography, astronomy, chemistry, physics, math, manufacturing, and engineering.  The rediscovery of ancient scientific texts was accelerated after the Fall of Constantinople, and the invention of printing which would democratize learning and allow a faster propagation of new ideas. technology is the set of artifacts and customs, spanning roughly the 14th through the 16th century. The era is marked by such profound technical advancements like the press, linear perspectivity, law, double shell domes or fortresses. Draw-books of the Renaissance artist-engineers such as Taccola and da Vinci give a deep insight into the mechanical technology then known and applied.Renaissance science spawned the Revolution; science and technology began a cycle of mutual advancement. The Scientific Renaissance was the early phase of the Scientific Revolution. In the two-phase model of modern science: a Scientific Renaissance of the 15th and 16th centuries, focused on the restoration of the natural knowledge of the ancients; and a Scientific Revolution of the 17th century, when scientists shifted from recovery to innovation.Modern ChristendomIn history, Reformation and rise of modernity in the early 16th century entailed a change in the Corpus Christianum. The of Augsburg in 1555 officially ended the idea among secular leaders that all Christians must be united under one church. The principle of regio, eius religio (whose the region is, his religion) established the religious, political and geographic divisions of Christianity, and this was established in law with the of Westphalia in 1648, which legally ended the concept of a single Christian hegemony, despite the Catholic Churchs doctrine that it alone is the one true Church founded by Christ. Subsequently, each government determined the religion of their own state. Christians living in states where their denomination was not the established one were guaranteed the right to practice their faith in public during allotted hours and in private at their will. With the Treaty of Westphalia, the Wars of Religion came to an end, and in the of Utrecht of 1713 the concept of the sovereign national state was born. The Corpus Christianum has since existed with the modern idea of a tolerant and diverse society consisting of many different communities.Geographic spreadChristianity is the predominant religion in Europe, Russia, the Americas, Oceania, the Philippines, Eastern Indonesia, Africa, Africa and Africa.(Encyclopedia Britannica table of religions, by region; retrieved November 2007) There are also large Christian communities in other parts of the world, such as Asia, where Christianity is the second-largest religion after Islam. The States is the largest Christian country in the world by population, followed by Brazil and Mexico.(https://china.alivenotdead.com/skinph55/Largest-Christian-Population-in-the-world-profile-584201.html Largest Christian Population in the world; retrieved April 2009)Many Christians not only live under, but also have an official status in, a religion of the following nations: Argentina (Catholic Church),(Argientine - Religion. argentina.gov.ar. (cf., juridical status different from the rest of churches in line with the National Constitution))() Armenia (Apostolic Church),() Bolivia (Roman Catholic Church),() Rica (Roman Catholic Church),() Denmark (National Church),() Salvador (Roman Catholic Church),() England (of England),() Greece (of Greece), Iceland (of Iceland),() Liechtenstein (Roman Catholic Church),() Malta (Roman Catholic Church),() Monaco (Roman Catholic Church),() Romania (Romanian Orthodox Church), Norway (of Norway),() City (Roman Catholic Church),() Switzerland (Roman Catholic Church, Reformed Church and Catholic Church of Switzerland) and Georgia (Orthodox Church).DemographicsThe estimated number of Christians in the world ranges from 1.5 billion() to 3.0 billion people.( Composed of around 34,000 different denominations, Christianity is the worlds largest religion.() Christians have composed about 33 percent of the worlds population for around 100 years.Notable Christian organizations A order is a lineage of communities and organizations of people who live in some way set apart from society in accordance with their specific religious devotion, usually characterized by the principles of its founders religious practice. In contrast, the term Orders is used by many Christian churches to refer to ordination or to a group of individuals who are set apart for a special role or ministry. Historically, the word order designated an established civil body or corporation with a hierarchy, and ordinatio meant legal incorporation into an ordo. The word holy refers to the Church. In context, therefore, a holy order is set apart for ministry in the Church. Religious orders are composed of initiates (laity) and, in some traditions, ordained clergies.Various organizations include:* Catholic religious orders are the major form of consecrated life in the Roman Catholic Church. They are organisations of laity and/or clergy who live a common life following a religious rule under the leadership of a religious superior. (ed., see Roman Catholic orders and societies for a particular listing.)* religious orders are communities of laity and/or clergy in the Anglican churches who live under a common rule of life. (ed., see Anglican organizations for a particular listing)Christianity law and ethicsChurch and state framingWithin the framework of Christianity, there are at least three possible definitions for Church law. One is the Torah/Mosaic Law (from what Christians consider to be the Testament) also called Law or law. Another is the instructions of Jesus of Nazareth in the Gospel (sometimes referred to as Law of Christ or the Commandment or the Covenant). A third is law which is the internal ecclesiastical law governing the Catholic Church, the Eastern Orthodox churches, and the Anglican Communion of churches.() The way that such church law is legislated, interpreted and at times adjudicated varies widely among these three bodies of churches. In all three traditions, a canon was initially a rule adopted by a council (From Greek kanon / , Hebrew kaneh / , for rule, standard, or measure); these canons formed the foundation of canon law.ethics in general has tended to stress the need for grace, mercy, and forgiveness because of human weakness and developed while Christians were subjects of the Empire. From the time Nero blamed Christians for setting Rome ablaze (64 AD) until Galarius (311 AD), persecutions against Christians erupted periodically. Consequently, Early Christian ethics included discussions of how believers should relate to Roman authority and to the empire.Under the Emperor Constantine I (312-337), Christianity became a legal religion. While some scholars debate whether Constantines conversion to Christianity was authentic or simply matter of political expediency, Constantines decree made the empire safe for Christian practice and belief. Consequently, issues of Christian doctrine, ethics and church practice were debated openly, see for example the Council of Nicaea and the seven Ecumenical Councils. By the time of I (379-395), Christianity had become the religion of the empire. With Christianity in power, ethical concerns broaden and included discussions of the proper role of the state.unto Caesar is the beginning of a phrase attributed to Jesus in the gospels which reads in full, Render unto Caesar the things which are Caesars, and unto God the things that are Gods. This phrase has become a widely quoted summary of the relationship between Christianity and secular authority. The gospels say that when Jesus gave his response, his interrogators marvelled, and left him, and went their way. Time has not resolved an ambiguity in this phrase, and people continue to interpret this passage to support various positions that are poles apart. The traditional division, carefully determined, in Christian thought is the state and church have separate spheres of influence.Aquinas thoroughly discussed that human law is law which means that it is law applied by governments to societies. All human laws were to be judged by their conformity to the natural law. An unjust law was in a sense no law at all. At this point, the natural law was not only used to pass judgment on the moral worth of various laws, but also to determine what the law said in the first place. This could result in some tension.(Burns, Aquinass Two Doctrines of Natural Law.) Hardly a single portion of ethics does Aquinas present to us but is enriched with his keen philosophical commentaries. Late ecclesiastical writers followed in his footsteps.Democratic ideologydemocracy is a political ideology that seeks to apply Christian principles to public policy. It emerged in 19th-century Europe, largely under the influence of social teaching. In a number of countries, the democracys Christian ethos has been diluted by secularisation. In practice, Christian democracy is often considered conservative on cultural, social and moral issues and progressive on fiscal and economic issues. In places, where their opponents have traditionally been secularist socialists and social democrats, Christian democratic parties are moderately conservative, whereas in other cultural and political environments they can lean to the left.Women rolesAttitudes and beliefs about the roles and responsibilities of in Christianity vary considerably today as they have throughout the last two millennia  evolving along with or counter to the societies in which Christians have lived. The Bible and Christianity historically have been interpreted as excluding women from church leadership and placing them in submissive roles in marriage. Male leadership has been assumed in the church and within marriage, society and government.(Blevins, Carolyn DeArmond, Women in Christian History: A Bibliography. Macon, Georgia: Mercer Univ Press, 1995. ISBN 086554493X)Some contemporary writers describe the role of women in the life of the church as having been downplayed, overlooked, or denied throughout much of Christian history. shifts in gender roles in society and also many churches has inspired reevaluation by many Christians of some long-held attitudes to the contrary. Christian egalitarians have increasingly argued for equal roles for men and women in marriage, as well as for the of women to the clergy. Contemporary conservatives meanwhile have reasserted what has been termed a complementarian position, promoting the traditional belief that the Bible ordains different roles and responsibilities for women and men in the Church and family.Major Christian denominationsA denomination is an identifiable religious body under a common name, structure, and doctrine within Christianity. Worldwide, Christians are divided, often along ethnic and linguistic lines, into separate churches and traditions. Various denominations, such as the Jehovahs Witnesses, make particular distinctions in their literature.(While the generally-accepted definition of Christendom is sometimes intended, Watchtower and other publications of Jehovahs Witnesses more often intend the term to indicate merely professed Christianity as distinct from true Christianity. Although they self-identify as Christian, Witnesses claim to be no part of Christendom. They explain their use of the term:What is the definition of Christendom as used in Watch Tower publications?Most often the term Christendom is used in the Societys publications in the more restricted way in which the word is first defined in the dictionary: Christianity; actually, professed Christianity, in contrast to the true Christianity of the Bible. This focuses primarily on the religious aspects. However, the word is sometimes used in our publications in its enlarged second meaning: the portion of the world in which Christianity prevails. (Questions From Readers, The Watchtower, August 1, 1981, page 31) For details, see True Christianity Is Flourishing, The Watchtower, March 1, 2004, page 7 As retrieved 2009-04-09, While Christendoms theologians, missionaries, and churchgoers continue to grapple with the gathering storm of controversy in their churches, true Christianity is flourishing worldwide. Indeed, true Christians ... invite you to join Jehovahs Witnesses in united Christian worship of the only true God, Jehovah.; and Watchtower, April 1, 2001, page 18, Equally striking is the contrast between Jehovahs Witnesses and Christendom today. ... The very features that Christendom lacks abound among Jehovahs Witnesses!; Also The Watchtower, April 15, 1962, page 229, It is out of date to define Christendom as meaning Christianity. True Christians today do not confuse Christendom with Christianity or make them identical.) Technically, divisions between one group and another are defined by church doctrine and authority. Centering on language of professed Christianity and true Christianity, issues that separate one group of followers of Jesus from another include:* succession,* authority,* criticism,* inerrancy,* infallibility,* inspiration,* interpretation,* primacy, and* Views of Jesus (Christology).Christianity is composed of, but not limited to, five major branches of Churches: Catholicism, Orthodox and Oriental Orthodox,  Anglican, Protestant, and Catholicism. Some listings include Anglicans among Protestants while others list the Eastern Orthodox and Oriental Orthodox separately. The Church of the East (Nestorians) and the Old Catholic churches are also distinct Christian bodies of historic importance, but much smaller in adherents and geographic scope. Each of these five branches has important subdivisions. Because the Protestant subdivisions do not maintain a common theology or earthly leadership, they are far more distinct than the subdivisions of the other four groupings. Denomination typically refers to one of the many Christian groupings including each of the multitude of Protestant subdivisions.Sizes of denominationCatholicism is the largest denomination, comprising just over half of Christians worldwide.In Christendom, the largest denominations are:#Catholicism  1.2 billion#Protestantism  540 million#Eastern Orthodoxy  210 million#Anglicanism  115 million#Orthodoxy  75 million#Nontrinitarianism  26 million#Nestorianism  1 million#Catholicism - .4 millionChristendom and other beliefsIn the interaction between Christendom and other belief systems,(These belief systems include various non-Christian stances, views, ideologies, philosophies, and religions.) men and women when not at war with their neighbors have always made an effort to understand the Other (not least because understanding is a strategy for defense, but also because for as long as there is dialogue wars are delayed). Such interactions have led to various dialogue events. History records many examples of interfaith initiatives and dialogue throughout the ages. In the field of religion, the interactions connects fundamental ideas in Christianity with similar ones in other religions. and other religions appear to share some elements. Regarding Christianitys relationship with other world beliefs, Christianity and other beliefs have differences and similarities in connection with each other.Judaic worldAlthough and Judaism share historical roots, these two religions diverge in fundamental ways. Though Judeo-Christian tradition emphasizes continuities and convergences between the two religions, there are many other areas in which the faiths diverge.Muslim worldand Islam share their origins in the tradition, as well as Judaism. Islam accepts Jesus and his miracles and other aspects of Christianity as part of its faith - with some differences in interpretation, and rejects other aspects.Buddhist worldthumb|222px|Percentage adherents of Buddhism.There has been much speculation regarding a possible connection between both the Buddha and the Christ, and between and Christianity. Buddhism originated in India about 500 years before the Age and the of Christianity.Hindu worldright|222px|thumb|Hinduism - Percentage by countryThe declaration Aetate officially established inter-religious dialogue between Catholics and Hindus. It has promoted common values between religions. There are over 17.3 million Catholics in India, which represents less than 2% of the total population and is the largest Christian Church within India. However, the Holy See has expressed concern with regards to religious violence in the state of Orissa, which is closely related to the ideology of Hindutva.Secular worldFile:Irreligion map.png|thumb|222px|Atheists, agnostics and nonreligious, by the Dentsu Institute (2006) and Zuckerman (2005)Irreligion is an absence of religion, indifference to religion, and/or hostility to religion. Secularism, in one sense, may assert the right to be free from religious rule and teachings and freedom from the imposition of religion upon the people. In its most prominent form, secularism is critical of religious orthodoxy and asserts that religion impedes human progress because of its focus on superstition and dogma rather than on reason and the method. Humanism refers to a philosophy centered on humankind. Much of Humanisms life stance upholds human reason, ethics, and justice, and rejects supernaturalism (mythology).See also;Main:of Christianity, Apologetics, of Christianity;General: Ecumenism, and other religions, Flag, Crusade, pilgrimage, The Good News, The City of God;History: of Christianity, shift, I and Christianity;Roman Catholic Church: Papism, militant and church triumphant, of Christendom, Church and ecumenism, Catholicism, (Roman Catholic Church);Western concepts: world, Western nationalism;Muslim world:Caliphate, Ummah, Mohammadan;Church and State: of religion, Caesaropapism, Ecumene, Dominionism, publica christiana;Other:Charlemagne and the Roman Empire (Roman Emperor)References;20th century sources* The Return of Christendom, By a Group of Churchmen. New York: Macmillan Co, 1922.* White, Andrew Dickson. A History of the Warfare of Science with Theology in Christendom: In Two Volumes. V. 1-2. New York: D. Appleton & Co, 1903. (ed., Volume One; Volume Two)* Cole, F. G. Mother of All Churches A Brief and Comprehensive Handbook of the Holy Eastern Orthodox Church. London: Skeffington, 1908.;19th century sources*Hull, Moses. Encyclopedia of Biblical Spiritualism; Or, A Concordance to the Principal Passages of the Old and New Testament Scriptures Which Prove or Imply Spiritualism; Together with a Brief History of the Origin of Many of the Important Books of the Bible. Chicago: M. Hull, 1895. (ed., reprint version is available)* Bosanquet, Bernard. The Civilization of Christendom, And Other Studies. London: S. Sonnenschein, 1893.* Church Club of New York. The History of Teachings of the Early Church, As a Basis for the Re-Union of Christendom; Lectures. Church Club lectures. New York: E. & J.B. Young, 1893.* Egar, John Hodson. Christendom; Ecclesiastical and Political, from Constantine to the Reformation. New York: J. Pott, 1887.* The Churches of Christendom. Edinburgh: Macniven and Wallace, 1884.* Charles, Elizabeth Rundle. Sketches of the Women of Christendom. New York: Dodd, Mead and Co, 1880.* Naville, Ernest. The Christ: Seven Lectures. Edinburgh: T. & T. Clark, 1880.* Cox, George W. Latin and Teutonic Christendom: An Historical Sketch. London: Longmans, Green & Co, 1870.* Girdlestone, Charles. Christendom; Sketched from History in the Light of Holy Scripture. London: Published for the Author by Sampson Low, Son, & Marston, 1870.* Thomson, John Radford. Symbols of Christendom. 1867.* Allies, T. W. The Formation of Christendom. London: Burns & Oates, 1865.* Stearns, George. The Mistake of Christendom; or, Jesus and His Gospel Before Paul and Christianity. Boston: B. Marsh, 1857.* Johnson, Richard, The Renowned History of the Seven Champions of Christendom. W. Baynes and son, 1824.FootnotesExternal links;Websites*Catholic Encyclopedia: Christendom*Catholic Encyclopedia: Union of Christendomes:Cristiandadfr:Chrtientia:Christianitatenl:Christenheidsimple:Christendomsvijet
6834
List_of_computer_scientists
This is a list of well-known computer scientists, people who do work in science, in particular researchers and authors.Some persons notable as programmers are included here because they work in research as well as program. A few of these people pre-date the invention of the digital computer; they are now regarded as computer scientists because their work can be seen as leading to the invention of the computer. Others are mathematicians whose work falls within what would now be called theoretical computer science, such as complexity theory and information theory.A* van der Aalst  process management, mining, nets* Abelson  intersection of computing and teaching* Abiteboul  database theory* Abramsky  semantics* Adleman  RSA, computing* Agrawal  polynomial-time testing* von Ahn  computation* Aho  compilers book, the a in AWK* Nuwasiima  PHP Programming book* E. Allen  optimization* Scaranti  Image Processing, Image Retrieval* Amdahl  supercomputer developer, founder of Corporation* Annerl  multidimensional processing, computational complexity theory* Appel  compilers text books* Arora  theorem* E. Hugo - computing on heterogeneous multicore architectures * Vincent Atanasoff  computer pioneerB* Babbage  invented first mechanical computer* Bachman* Carl Backhouse  mathematics of program construction* Backus  FORTRAN, form* A. Bader* James Barr  System* Bayer  B-tree* C. Beatty, Jr.  compiler optimization,(http://www-03.ibm.com/press/us/en/pressrelease/22052.wss) super-computing(http://www.cs.clemson.edu/~mark/acs_people.html)* Bell  DEC VAX, Computer Structures* M. Bellovin  security* Berners-Lee  Wide Web* Bernus* Bjrner  Development Method (VDM), RAISE* Blaauw  one of the principal designers of the IBM 360 line of computers* Blum  cryptography* Boehm  software engineering economics, spiral development* Booch  Modeling Language, Management Group* Boole  logic* Bos  Style Sheets* Bowen  notation, methods* R. Bourne  shell, portable 68C compiler* S. Boyer  string searching, theorem prover* E. Bresenham  early computer graphics contributions including algorithm* J. Brown  Memory Architecture, Compatibility* Brinch Hansen (surname Brinch Hansen)  concurrency* Brinkkemper  methodology of product software development* Brooks  360, OS/360, Mythical Man-Month, Silver Bullet* Brooks* Burns  computing* Aaron Mwale  computer systemsC* Campbell-Kelly  of computing* Cardelli  objects* Cardie  language processing, summarization, learning* Catmull  graphics* Vinton Cerf  Internet, TCP/IP* Chaitin* Chaochen  calculus* (Susan) Cheng  networks* Church  mathematics of combinators, calculus* Ciobanu  process calculi, membrane computing* M. Clarke  checking* Cocke  RISC* F. Codd  formulated the database model* Colton  Computational Creativity* Justin Compton  Down Rules* Cormack  co-inventor of Markov compression* Cook  NP-completeness* Cooley  Fourier transform (FFT)* J. Corbat  Time-Sharing System (CTSS), Multics* Cousot  interpretation* Cray  Research, supercomputer* Cristianini  Machine learning, pattern analysis, intelligenceD* Dahl  Simula* van Dam  graphics, hypertext* J. Date  proponent of database model* Demaine  origami* DeMarco* E. Denning  security* J. Denning  identified the use of an systems set and balance set, President of ACM* Dertouzos  Director of Institute of Technology (MIT) Laboratory for Computer Science (LCS) from 1974 to 2001* Dewdney* Dham  P5 Pentium processor* Dietz* Diffie  cryptography* Dijkstra  algorithms, considered harmful, (programming)* Dongarra  algebra performance computing* Dorigo  colony optimization* Dourish  computer interaction* Stark Draper  Guidance Computer* Dumais  Retrieval* Dunkels  Protothreads* Dix  literally wrote the book on HCIE* Annie J. Easley* Ebbinkhuijsen  COBOL* Presper Eckert  ENIAC* Philip-Emeagwali  supercomputing* Allen Emerson  model checking* Engelbart  tiled windows, hypertext, mouse* Ershov* Riche Evans* C. Evans  graphics* EvenF* Fahlman* Fakhfakh* Feigenbaum  intelligence* Felten  security* Finin* Finkel* Firesmith* Flowers  computer* Floyd  NP-completeness* D. Foley* Forbus* W. Franke* P. FriedmanG* Gabriel* Galil* Galler  (programming language)* Garcia-Molina* Garey  NP-completeness* de Garis* Gelernter* Geschke* Ginsburg  languages, theory, AFL theory, theory* L. Glass* Gdel  computability  not a computer scientist per se, but his work was invaluable in the field* Goguen* Adele Goldberg  Smalltalk* Goldberg  cryptographer, messaging* Goldreich  cryptography, complexity theory* Goldwasser  cryptography, complexity theory* Golub  (math) computation* Charles Golumbic  graph theory* Gosling  NeWS, (programming language)* Paul Graham  Viaweb, Lisp, Arc* L. Graham  compilers, programming environments* Jim Gray  database* Greibach  normal form, AFL theory* Griswold  SNOBOL* Gropp  Passing Interface, PETSc* J. Grosz  Language Processing, Planning, Theory* Gruber* V. Guha  RDF, Netscape, (file format), Epinions* J. Gunther  performance analysis, planning* G. Gyarmati  adaptivity in operating systems and networkingH* Matthus Hahn  mechanical calculator* C. Hall  Guidance Computer* Halpern* Hamming  code, founder of the for Computing Machinery* Han  mining* Hartmanis  complexity theory* Hstad  complexity theory* Hatton  failure and vulnerabilities* Jifeng  provably correct systems* Hellman  encryption* Heiser  Development of L4 and founder of Labs* Hendler  Web* L. Hennessy  architecture* Herbert* Hillis  Machine* Hinton* B. Hirschberg  Linguistics* A. R. Hoare  Logic, rigor, sequential processes (CSP)* Henry Holland  algorithms* Hollerith  invented recording of data on a machine readable medium, using cards* Hopcroft  compilers* Admiral Hopper  compilers, COBOL* Horvitz - Intelligence* Householder* A. Huffman  codeI* Ichbiah  (programming language)* Ingalls - Bit_blit, Lively_Kernel* E. Iverson  (programming language), (programming language)J* Jacobson  Modeling Language, Management Group* Jain* James* S. Johnson* C. Johnson* Cliff Jones  Development Method (VDM)* I. Jordan* K. Joshi* Joy  Microsystems, BSD UNIX, vi, cshK* Kahan  analysis* E. Kahn  TCP/IP* Kak  image processing* Mopati Kapeng  web designing principles* Karger* Kay  Dynabook, Smalltalk, overlapping windows* Karp  NP-completeness* Karmarkar  algorithm* Karpinski  NP optimization problems* George Kemeny  BASIC* Ken Kennedy  compiling for parallel and vector machines* Kernighan  Unix, the k in AWK* Kesselman  computing* Kiczales  CLOS, (computer science), programming* Cole Kleene  closure, theory* Kleinrock  ARPANET, theory, switching, routing* Knuth  Art of Computer Programming, MIX/MMIX, TeX, programming* Andrew Koenig  C++* Klling  BlueJ* L. Kolodner  reasoning* David Korn  shell* Kees Koster  68* Koza  programming* Nikolaevich Kolmogorov  complexity theory* Kowalski  programming* Krogstie  framework* Kruskal  algorithm* E. Kurtz  BASICL* S. Lam* Lamport  algorithms for computing, LaTeX.* W. Lampson* J. Landin* Lane (computer scientist)* Langefors* Lederberg* M Lehman  Laws of Software Evolution* E. Leiserson  algorithms, provably good work-stealing, coauthor of to Algorithms* Lenat  intelligence, Cyc* Lerdorf  PHP* Levin  complexity theory* Licklider* Liddle* Lions  Lions Book* J. Lipton  complexity theory* Liskov  languages* R. Litman  planning, language processing* Lovelace  first programmer* LynchM* Medhat* Manna  logic* Levchin  Test and PayPal* James Martin  engineering* Mashey* Matiyasevich  solving tenth problem* Matsumoto  (programming language)* John McCarthy  (programming language), intelligence* McIlroy  pipes* R. McKeown  Language Processing  Summarization* McKinstry  intelligence, Mindpixel* Kirk McKusick  BSD, Fast File System* Meertens  68, (programming language)* Meyer  (programming language)* Micali  cryptography* Milner  (programming language)* Minsky  intelligence, perceptrons, of Mind* Mockapetris  Name System (DNS)* Moler  analysis, MATLAB* F. Moore  machine* Moore  law* Strother Moore  string searching, theorem prover* Moravec  robotics* Tappan Morris  worm* Moses  Macsyma* Muggleton* Mukhopadhyay  interoperability, web miningN* Nadin  anticipation research* Nagao  machine translation, natural language processing, digital library* Nake  pioneered computer arts* Naur  BNF, 60* Needham* G. Nell  GERAM* de Neumann  massively parallel autonomous cellular processor, software engineering research* von Neumann  early computers, von Neumann machine* Newell  intelligence, Computer Structures* Newman  Colossus, MADM* Ng  intelligence, learning, robotics* Nils Nilsson  intelligence* Nijssen  NIAM* Noe* Noether* Nordin  intelligence, programming, robotics* Norman  interfaces, usability* Novacky  Assistant Department Chair and Senior Lecturer in Computer Science, Assistant Dean of CAS for Undergraduate Studies at University of Pittsburgh* Nygaard  SimulaO* William Olle  Ferranti Mercury* Overmars  game programmingP* Papadimitriou* Parnas  hiding, programming* Patt  Level Parallelism, speculative architectures* David A. Patterson* Pearl  intelligence, Search* Perlis  Programming Pearls* Perlman  tree protocol* Peyton Jones  programming* Plotkin* Pnueli  logic* van der Poel  computer graphics, robotics, geographic information systems, imaging, multimedia, virtual environments, games* Pollack  intentions in planning* Post  mathematics* Postel  Internet* Preparata* H. Press - numerical algorithmsQR* O. Rabin  machines* R. Radev  Language Processing, Retrieval* V. Raman   accessibility, Emacspeak, etc.* Randell  dependability* Raz  databases: ordering (or commit ordering) for guaranteeing distributed and serializability* Reddy  AI* P. Reed* C. Reynolds* K. Reynolds  Internet* Riese* Ritchie  (programming language), UNIX* Rivest  RSA, MD5, RC4* Rolland  REMORA methodology, meta modelling* Rosenfeld* T. Ross  Analysis and Design Technique* van Rossum  (programming language)* W. Royce  Waterfall model* Rucker  mathematician, Writer, Educator* Rudich  complexity theory, cryptography* Rulifson* Rumbaugh  Modeling Language, Management GroupS* Kotnala  Languages, System* Sadowsky* Salton  retrieval* E. Sammet  languages* Sammut  Intelligence researcher* Sassenrath  systems, languages, Amiga, REBOL* Schaeffer* Schickard  one of first machines* Schneier  cryptography, security* B. Schneider  concurrent and distributed computing* I. Schwartzbach  computer scientist at University* Scott  theory* L. Scott  languages, algorithms, computing* Sethi  compilers, 2nd Dragon Book* Shamir  RSA, cryptanalysis* Shannon  theory* E. Shaw  computational finance, computational biochemistry, parallel architectures* Shenker  networking* Shneiderman  interaction, visualization* H. Shortliffe  MYCIN (Medical diagnostoc expert system)* Sifakis  model checking* Simon  intelligence* Sleator  tree, analysis* Slvberg  information modelling* Cantwell Smith  (computer science), 3lisp* Sparck-Jones  Retrieval, Language Processing* Spewak  Architecture Planning* Sproull* Stachowiak  GNOME, Safari, WebKit* Stallman  Project* Stamper* Richard Stearns  complexity theory* L. Steele, Jr.  Scheme, Lisp* Thomas Sterling  Creator of Beowulf clusters* Stockmeyer  computational complexity, distributed computing* Stonebraker  database practice and theory* Strachey  semantics* Stroustrup  C++* Sudan  complexity theory, theory* Jay Sussman  Scheme* Sutherland  graphics, Internet* Sutherland  graphics* Szegedy  complexity theory, computingT* S. Tanenbaum  systems, MINIX* Tarjan  splay tree* Teevan* Teng  analysis of algorithms* Tesler  human-computer interaction, graphical user interface, Apple Macintosh* Tevanian  Mach kernel team, NeXT, Mac OS X* H. Thomas  computers, reality* Ken Thompson  Unix* F. Tichy  RCS* Toda  computation complexity, recipient of 1998 Prize* Torvalds  Linux kernel, Git* Toussaint  computational geometry  computational music therory* F Traub  computational complexity of scientific problems* Tukey  FFT* Turoff  communication* Turing  British pioneer, MachineU* D. Ullman  compilers, databases, complexity theoryV* Valiant  complexity theory, learning theory* Varadarajan  System X: VirginiaTechs Mac G5 Supercluster* Vernadat  modeling* Veryard  modeling* Valduriez  data managementW* Wadler  programming* David Wagner  security, cryptography* A. Walker  language processing, dialogue systems, virtual agents* Wall  Perl* Z. Wang* K. Warmuth  learning theory* H. D. Warren  AI, programming, Prolog, the W in WAM* Warwick  intelligence* Weglarz* Wu  networks* Wegner  programming, (computer science)* J. Weinberger  programming language design, the w in AWK* Weiser  computing* Weizenbaum  intelligence, ELIZA* Whittaker  Computer Interaction, Support for Cooperative Work, Media* Widom  nontraditional data management* Wiebe  subjectivity, language processing, summarization,* Wiederhold  management systems* van Wijngaarden  Dutch pioneer; ARRA, ALGOL* Allen Wilkes  LINC developer, assembler-linker designer* Vincent Wilkes  microprogramming, EDSAC* Wilks  linguistics, intelligence* H. Wilkinson  analysis* Wilson  architecture* Winograd  algorithm* Winograd  intelligence, SHRDLU* Wirth  Pascal, Modula, (programming language)* E. Wisnosky  Computer-Aided Manufacturing (ICAM), IDEF* Wolfram  Mathematica* Wulf  compilersXY* Tao Yang* Chi-Chih Yao* Yourdon  Systems Analysis and Design MethodZ* Zadeh  logic* Zaman  number generator* Zomaya  Australian pioneer of scheduling in parallel and distributed systems* Zuse  German pioneer of hardware and softwareSee also* genealogy of computer scientists* of pioneers in computer science* of programming language researchers* of members of the National Academy of Sciences (Computer and information sciences)* of programmers* of computing people* of important publications in computer science* of Russian IT developersReferencesExternal links*Most cited authors in computer science*Computer scientists with h-index > 40 raunarskih naunikatericosdinformaticiens et prcurseurs de linformatiqueraunalnih znanstvenikailmuwan komputervan informaticide cientistas da computaoe shkenctarve t kompjuteritzh:
